Maine, session 132, LD609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $772,957 $772,957
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $772,957 $772,957
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $116,951,295 $116,951,295
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $116,951,295 $116,951,295
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,122,079 $2,246,530
All Other $1,607,403 $1,607,403
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $3,729,482 $3,853,933
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
Page 1 - 132LR1775(23)

FIREFIGHTERS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
OFFICERS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $110,563 $118,679
All Other $57,876 $57,876
__________ __________
FIREFIGHTERS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT $168,439 $176,555
OFFICERS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
FUND TOTAL
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,063 $6,063
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $6,063 $6,063
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
All Other $43,266 $43,266
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $43,266 $43,266
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance 0455
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $696 $2,374
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $696 $2,374
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
All Other $2,088 $7,121
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $2,088 $7,121
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
ACCIDENT - SICKNESS - HEALTH INSURANCE 0455
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 2 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $772,957 $772,957
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $772,957 $772,957
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $116,958,054 $116,959,732
__________ __________
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND TOTAL $116,958,054 $116,959,732
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,122,079 $2,246,530
All Other $1,652,757 $1,657,790
__________ __________
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $3,774,836 $3,904,320
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND TOTAL
FIREFIGHTERS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
OFFICERS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $110,563 $118,679
All Other $57,876 $57,876
__________ __________
FIREFIGHTERS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT $168,439 $176,555
OFFICERS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
FUND TOTAL
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 28.000 28.000
Personal Services $4,013,689 $4,229,248
All Other $403,330 $403,330
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,417,019 $4,632,578
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Page 3 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,229 $1,229
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,229 $1,229
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,436 $9,848
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,436 $9,848
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,227 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,227 $0
Administration - Human Resources 0038
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position in the Human Resources
General Fund account.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,370 $15,220
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,370 $15,220
ADMINISTRATION - HUMAN RESOURCES 0038
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 28.000 28.000
Personal Services $4,032,286 $4,244,468
All Other $411,995 $414,407
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,444,281 $4,658,875
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Page 4 - 132LR1775(23)

Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety Fund and Municipal Opt-In Fund
Z263
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $135,420 $11,566
All Other $4,179,310 $4,179,310
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,314,730 $4,190,876
ADULT USE CANNABIS PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY FUND AND
MUNICIPAL OPT-IN FUND Z263
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $135,420 $11,566
All Other $4,179,310 $4,179,310
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,314,730 $4,190,876
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.000 25.000
Personal Services $3,281,029 $3,451,272
All Other $20,331 $20,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,301,360 $3,471,603
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $455,794 $479,518
All Other $1,219,568 $1,219,568
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,675,362 $1,699,086
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $255,395 $255,395
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $255,395 $255,395
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
Page 5 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,421 $10,678
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,421 $10,678
Adult Use Cannabis Regulatory Coordination Fund Z264
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator I position to a Public Service Manager II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,283 $10,680
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,283 $10,680
ADULT USE CANNABIS REGULATORY COORDINATION FUND Z264
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.000 25.000
Personal Services $3,291,312 $3,461,952
All Other $20,331 $20,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,311,643 $3,482,283
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $455,794 $479,518
All Other $1,482,384 $1,485,641
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,938,178 $1,965,159
Alcoholic Beverages - General Operation 0015
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,522,322 $1,605,771
All Other $712,950 $712,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,235,272 $2,318,721
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,190 $19,190
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,190 $19,190
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Page 6 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $1,342,332 $1,433,296
All Other $192,908,719 $192,908,719
__________ __________
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL $194,251,051 $194,342,015
Alcoholic Beverages - General Operation 0015
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,625 $11,442
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,625 $11,442
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,485 $29,457
__________ __________
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL $21,485 $29,457
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES - GENERAL OPERATION 0015
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,522,322 $1,605,771
All Other $721,575 $724,392
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,243,897 $2,330,163
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,190 $19,190
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,190 $19,190
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,342,332 $1,433,296
All Other $192,930,204 $192,938,176
__________ __________
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND TOTAL $194,272,536 $194,371,472
American Rescue Plan Audit, Controller and Program Management Z302
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000 $1,000
__________ __________
Page 7 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000 $1,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN AUDIT, CONTROLLER AND PROGRAM
MANAGEMENT Z302
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000 $1,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000 $1,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Budget - Bureau of the 0055
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,765,475 $1,847,809
All Other $110,083 $110,083
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,875,558 $1,957,892
Budget - Bureau of the 0055
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,962 $6,962
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,962 $6,962
Budget - Bureau of the 0055
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $202 $1,544
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $202 $1,544
BUDGET - BUREAU OF THE 0055
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,765,475 $1,847,809
All Other $117,247 $118,589
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,882,722 $1,966,398
Page 8 - 132LR1775(23)

Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $7,705,104 $8,096,677
All Other $8,168,650 $8,168,650
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,873,754 $16,265,327
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $996,277 $996,277
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $996,277 $996,277
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $372,385 $400,687
All Other $30,076,711 $30,076,711
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $30,449,096 $30,477,398
FUND TOTAL
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $58,334 $58,334
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,334 $58,334
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
All Other $7,854 $7,854
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $7,854 $7,854
FUND TOTAL
Buildings and Grounds Operations 0080
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,221 $17,441
__________ __________
Page 9 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,221 $17,441
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,476 $6,591
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,476 $6,591
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
All Other $130,188 $145,954
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $130,188 $145,954
FUND TOTAL
BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS OPERATIONS 0080
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $7,705,104 $8,096,677
All Other $8,234,205 $8,244,425
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,939,309 $16,341,102
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,753 $1,002,868
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,000,753 $1,002,868
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $372,385 $400,687
All Other $30,214,753 $30,230,519
__________ __________
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL SERVICE $30,587,138 $30,631,206
FUND TOTAL
Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement Reserve Fund
0883
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $310,587 $310,587
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $310,587 $310,587
Page 10 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $645,000 $645,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $645,000 $645,000
Bureau of General Services - Capital Construction and Improvement Reserve Fund
0883
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $39 $39
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $39 $39
BUREAU OF GENERAL SERVICES - CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION AND
IMPROVEMENT RESERVE FUND 0883
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $310,626 $310,626
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $310,626 $310,626
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $645,000 $645,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $645,000 $645,000
Bureau of Revenue Services Fund 0885
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $151,720 $151,720
__________ __________
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND TOTAL $151,720 $151,720
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND 0885
PROGRAM SUMMARY
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $151,720 $151,720
__________ __________
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND TOTAL $151,720 $151,720
Capital Construction/Repairs/Improvements - Administration 0059
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 11 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $301,836 $301,836
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $301,836 $301,836
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $948,359 $948,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $948,359 $948,359
Capital Construction/Repairs/Improvements - Administration 0059
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,047 $2,047
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,047 $2,047
CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION/REPAIRS/IMPROVEMENTS -
ADMINISTRATION 0059
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $303,883 $303,883
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $303,883 $303,883
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $948,359 $948,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $948,359 $948,359
Central Administrative Applications Z234
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $24,837,597 $24,837,597
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,837,597 $24,837,597
Central Administrative Applications Z234
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,340 $7,959
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,340 $7,959
CENTRAL ADMINISTRATIVE APPLICATIONS Z234
Page 12 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $24,842,937 $24,845,556
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,842,937 $24,845,556
Central Fleet Management 0703
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,568,743 $1,662,009
All Other $8,414,202 $8,414,202
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $9,982,945 $10,076,211
Central Fleet Management 0703
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,090 $7,490
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $8,090 $7,490
Central Fleet Management 0703
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,224 $6,127
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $2,224 $6,127
CENTRAL FLEET MANAGEMENT 0703
PROGRAM SUMMARY
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,568,743 $1,662,009
All Other $8,424,516 $8,427,819
__________ __________
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL TOTAL $9,993,259 $10,089,828
Central Services - Purchases 0004
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $74,256 $77,525
All Other $98,262 $98,262
Page 13 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $172,518 $175,787
POSTAL, PRINTING AND SUPPLY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 32.000 32.000
Personal Services $2,993,600 $3,161,084
All Other $1,542,220 $1,542,220
__________ __________
POSTAL, PRINTING AND SUPPLY FUND TOTAL $4,535,820 $4,703,304
CENTRAL SERVICES - PURCHASES 0004
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $74,256 $77,525
All Other $98,262 $98,262
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $172,518 $175,787
POSTAL, PRINTING AND SUPPLY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 32.000 32.000
Personal Services $2,993,600 $3,161,084
All Other $1,542,220 $1,542,220
__________ __________
POSTAL, PRINTING AND SUPPLY FUND TOTAL $4,535,820 $4,703,304
Centralized Imaging Services Z372
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
CENTRALIZED IMAGING SERVICES Z372
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
County Tax Reimbursement 0263
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
Page 14 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,000,000 $2,000,000
COUNTY TAX REIMBURSEMENT 0263
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $2,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,000,000 $2,000,000
Debt Service - Government Facilities Authority 0893
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,155,674 $28,155,674
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,155,674 $28,155,674
DEBT SERVICE - GOVERNMENT FACILITIES AUTHORITY 0893
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,155,674 $28,155,674
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,155,674 $28,155,674
Departments and Agencies - Statewide 0016
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $984,444 $984,444
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $984,444 $984,444
Departments and Agencies - Statewide 0016
Initiative: Deappropriates funds included in the baseline as a placeholder to record funding
adjustments that are subsequently reallocated to the appropriate programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($984,444) ($984,444)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($984,444) ($984,444)
DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES - STATEWIDE 0016
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Developmental Services Oversight and Advisory Board Z363
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 15 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $137,682 $137,682
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $137,682 $137,682
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES OVERSIGHT AND ADVISORY BOARD Z363
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $137,682 $137,682
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $137,682 $137,682
Elderly Tax Deferral Program 0650
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
ELDERLY TAX DEFERRAL PROGRAM 0650
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
Page 16 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 282.000 282.000
Personal Services $30,956,352 $32,900,402
All Other $1,893,381 $1,893,381
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $32,849,733 $34,793,783
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $359,589 $359,589
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $359,589 $359,589
TOTAL
Financial and Personnel Services - Division of 0713
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,657 $31,671
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $29,657 $31,671
TOTAL
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES - DIVISION OF 0713
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 282.000 282.000
Personal Services $30,956,352 $32,900,402
All Other $2,282,627 $2,284,641
__________ __________
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES FUND $33,238,979 $35,185,043
TOTAL
Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement 0886
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 17 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $105,364,497 $105,364,497
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $105,364,497 $105,364,497
Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement 0886
Initiative: Reduces funding for the Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($13,364,497) ($10,364,497)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($13,364,497) ($10,364,497)
HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION REIMBURSEMENT 0886
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,000,000 $95,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $92,000,000 $95,000,000
Information Services 0155
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 22.000 22.000
Personal Services $3,218,048 $3,423,740
All Other $14,643,752 $14,643,752
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,861,800 $18,067,492
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 425.000 425.000
Personal Services $57,901,315 $61,280,283
All Other $7,373,077 $7,373,077
__________ __________
Page 18 - 132LR1775(23)

OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $65,274,392 $68,653,360
TOTAL
Information Services 0155
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $155,631 $250,537
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $155,631 $250,537
TOTAL
INFORMATION SERVICES 0155
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 22.000 22.000
Personal Services $3,218,048 $3,423,740
All Other $14,643,752 $14,643,752
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,861,800 $18,067,492
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 425.000 425.000
Personal Services $57,901,315 $61,280,283
All Other $7,528,708 $7,623,614
__________ __________
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $65,430,023 $68,903,897
TOTAL
Leased Space Reserve Fund Program Z145
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 19 - 132LR1775(23)

LEASED SPACE RESERVE FUND PROGRAM Z145
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Lottery Operations 0023
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,254,579 $2,395,475
All Other $2,623,009 $2,623,009
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $4,877,588 $5,018,484
Lottery Operations 0023
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,754 $1,754
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $1,754 $1,754
Lottery Operations 0023
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($12,476) $3,529
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL ($12,476) $3,529
LOTTERY OPERATIONS 0023
PROGRAM SUMMARY
STATE LOTTERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,254,579 $2,395,475
All Other $2,612,287 $2,628,292
__________ __________
STATE LOTTERY FUND TOTAL $4,866,866 $5,023,767
Maine Board of Tax Appeals Z146
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $391,002 $412,916
Page 20 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $47,948 $47,948
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $438,950 $460,864
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $45,000 $45,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $45,000 $45,000
Maine Board of Tax Appeals Z146
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,179 $5,179
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,179 $5,179
MAINE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS Z146
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $391,002 $412,916
All Other $53,127 $53,127
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $444,129 $466,043
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $45,000 $45,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $45,000 $45,000
Maine Developmental Disabilities Council Z185
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,155 $160,155
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,155 $160,155
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $480,465 $480,465
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $480,465 $480,465
MAINE DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL Z185
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 21 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,155 $160,155
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,155 $160,155
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $480,465 $480,465
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $480,465 $480,465
Mandate BETE - Reimburse Municipalities Z065
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,000 $28,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,000 $28,000
MANDATE BETE - REIMBURSE MUNICIPALITIES Z065
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $28,000 $28,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,000 $28,000
Medical Use of Cannabis Fund Z265
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,058,220 $2,181,243
All Other $1,348,262 $1,348,262
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,406,482 $3,529,505
Medical Use of Cannabis Fund Z265
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $164,051 $164,051
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $164,051 $164,051
Medical Use of Cannabis Fund Z265
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,421 $10,677
Page 22 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,421 $10,677
MEDICAL USE OF CANNABIS FUND Z265
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,058,220 $2,181,243
All Other $1,519,734 $1,522,990
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,577,954 $3,704,233
Office of the Commissioner - Administrative and Financial Services 0718
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $2,048,344 $2,150,987
All Other $169,237 $169,237
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,217,581 $2,320,224
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Office of the Commissioner - Administrative and Financial Services 0718
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,997 $8,997
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,997 $8,997
Office of the Commissioner - Administrative and Financial Services 0718
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,502 $3,788
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,502 $3,788
OFFICE OF THE COMMISSIONER - ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES 0718
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 23 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $2,048,344 $2,150,987
All Other $180,736 $182,022
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,229,080 $2,333,009
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Public Improvements - Planning/Construction - Administration 0057
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,635,874 $1,722,433
All Other $1,064,951 $1,064,951
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,700,825 $2,787,384
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,000 $31,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $31,000 $31,000
Public Improvements - Planning/Construction - Administration 0057
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90 $90
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $90 $90
PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS - PLANNING/CONSTRUCTION -
ADMINISTRATION 0057
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,635,874 $1,722,433
All Other $1,065,041 $1,065,041
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,700,915 $2,787,474
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,000 $31,000
Page 24 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $31,000 $31,000
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.500 13.500
Personal Services $1,659,157 $1,765,935
All Other $549,261 $549,261
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,208,418 $2,315,196
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000 $4,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,000 $4,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,677 $33,677
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,677 $33,677
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,245 $2,655
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,245 $2,655
Purchases - Division of 0007
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Public Service Manager I
positions from range 27 to range 30.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,833 $24,428
Page 25 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,833 $24,428
PURCHASES - DIVISION OF 0007
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.500 13.500
Personal Services $1,676,990 $1,790,363
All Other $584,183 $585,593
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,261,173 $2,375,956
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000 $4,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,000 $4,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Renewable Energy Facilities Property Tax Exemption Z296
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,772,000 $3,772,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,772,000 $3,772,000
RENEWABLE ENERGY FACILITIES PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION Z296
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,772,000 $3,772,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,772,000 $3,772,000
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 303.500 303.500
Personal Services $36,561,168 $38,556,042
All Other $18,346,244 $18,346,244
__________ __________
Page 26 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,907,412 $56,902,286
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,463,848 $9,463,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,463,848 $9,463,848
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $5,000,500 $5,000,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $5,000,500 $5,000,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,602,675 $2,706,022
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,602,675 $2,706,022
Revenue Services, Bureau of 0002
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $54,787 $81,455
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,787 $81,455
REVENUE SERVICES, BUREAU OF 0002
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 303.500 303.500
Personal Services $36,561,168 $38,556,042
All Other $22,003,706 $21,133,721
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,564,874 $59,689,763
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,463,848 $9,463,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,463,848 $9,463,848
Page 27 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $5,000,500 $5,000,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $5,000,500 $5,000,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Risk Management - Claims 0008
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $855,754 $902,463
All Other $5,444,799 $5,444,799
__________ __________
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND TOTAL $6,300,553 $6,347,262
STATE-ADMINISTERED FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,042,515 $2,042,515
__________ __________
STATE-ADMINISTERED FUND TOTAL $2,042,515 $2,042,515
Risk Management - Claims 0008
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,333 $15,852
__________ __________
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND TOTAL $12,333 $15,852
RISK MANAGEMENT - CLAIMS 0008
PROGRAM SUMMARY
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $855,754 $902,463
All Other $5,457,132 $5,460,651
__________ __________
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND TOTAL $6,312,886 $6,363,114
STATE-ADMINISTERED FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,042,515 $2,042,515
__________ __________
STATE-ADMINISTERED FUND TOTAL $2,042,515 $2,042,515
Snow Grooming Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement Z024
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 28 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
SNOW GROOMING PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION REIMBURSEMENT Z024
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
Solid Waste Management Fund 0659
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $916,851 $916,851
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $916,851 $916,851
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $133,309 $143,494
All Other $250,531 $250,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $383,840 $394,025
SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT FUND 0659
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $916,851 $916,851
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $916,851 $916,851
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $133,309 $143,494
All Other $250,531 $250,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $383,840 $394,025
State Benefit Mandate Defrayal Z373
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,800,000 $3,800,000
__________ __________
Page 29 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,800,000 $3,800,000
State Benefit Mandate Defrayal Z373
Initiative: Reduces funding for the cost of the benefit mandate to provide coverage for
infertility treatment under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 24-A, section 4320-U.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,600,000) ($2,600,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,600,000) ($2,600,000)
STATE BENEFIT MANDATE DEFRAYAL Z373
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,200,000 $1,200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,200,000 $1,200,000
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 28.000 28.000
Personal Services $3,868,229 $4,056,931
All Other $213,006 $213,006
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,081,235 $4,269,937
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,000 $11,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,000 $11,000
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,999 $50,999
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,999 $50,999
State Controller - Office of the 0056
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,107 $5,233
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,107 $5,233
Page 30 - 132LR1775(23)

STATE CONTROLLER - OFFICE OF THE 0056
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 28.000 28.000
Personal Services $3,868,229 $4,056,931
All Other $267,112 $269,238
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,135,341 $4,326,169
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,000 $11,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,000 $11,000
Statewide Radio Network System 0112
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,199,151 $4,199,151
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,199,151 $4,199,151
STATEWIDE RADIO AND NETWORK SYSTEM 2025-26 2026-27
RESERVE FUND
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
STATEWIDE RADIO AND NETWORK SYSTEM $500 $500
RESERVE FUND TOTAL
STATEWIDE RADIO NETWORK SYSTEM 0112
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,199,151 $4,199,151
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,199,151 $4,199,151
STATEWIDE RADIO AND NETWORK SYSTEM 2025-26 2026-27
RESERVE FUND
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
STATEWIDE RADIO AND NETWORK SYSTEM $500 $500
RESERVE FUND TOTAL
Trade Adjustment Assistance Health Insurance Z001
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 31 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,385 $8,385
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,385 $8,385
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
TRADE ADJUSTMENT ASSISTANCE HEALTH INSURANCE Z001
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,385 $8,385
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,385 $8,385
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Tree Growth Tax Reimbursement 0261
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,200,000 $13,200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,200,000 $13,200,000
TREE GROWTH TAX REIMBURSEMENT 0261
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,200,000 $13,200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,200,000 $13,200,000
Unorganized Territory Education and Services Fund - Finance 0573
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,000,000 $29,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $29,000,000 $29,000,000
UNORGANIZED TERRITORY EDUCATION AND SERVICES FUND -
FINANCE 0573
Page 32 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,000,000 $29,000,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $29,000,000 $29,000,000
Veterans' Organizations Tax Reimbursement Z062
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
VETERANS' ORGANIZATIONS TAX REIMBURSEMENT Z062
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Veterans Tax Reimbursement 0407
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,400,000 $1,400,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,400,000 $1,400,000
VETERANS TAX REIMBURSEMENT 0407
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,400,000 $1,400,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,400,000 $1,400,000
Waste Facility Tax Reimbursement 0907
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,000 $16,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,000 $16,000
WASTE FACILITY TAX REIMBURSEMENT 0907
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,000 $16,000
__________ __________
Page 33 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,000 $16,000
Workers' Compensation Management Fund Program 0802
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $2,729,474 $2,824,134
All Other $18,162,695 $18,162,695
__________ __________
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT $20,892,169 $20,986,829
FUND TOTAL
Workers' Compensation Management Fund Program 0802
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Office of
Information Technology.
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
All Other $14,228 $8,242
__________ __________
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT $14,228 $8,242
FUND TOTAL
Workers' Compensation Management Fund Program 0802
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the department.
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
All Other $96,041 $106,121
__________ __________
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT $96,041 $106,121
FUND TOTAL
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT FUND PROGRAM 0802
PROGRAM SUMMARY
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $2,729,474 $2,824,134
All Other $18,272,964 $18,277,058
__________ __________
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT $21,002,438 $21,101,192
FUND TOTAL
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Page 34 - 132LR1775(23)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $289,687,598 $295,499,049
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $489,350 $489,350
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $53,498,852 $53,540,558
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $5,002,500 $5,002,500
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FINANCIAL AND PERSONNEL SERVICES $33,238,979 $35,185,043
FUND
POSTAL, PRINTING AND SUPPLY FUND $4,535,820 $4,703,304
OFFICE OF INFORMATION SERVICES FUND $65,430,023 $68,903,897
RISK MANAGEMENT FUND $6,312,886 $6,363,114
WORKERS' COMPENSATION MANAGEMENT $21,002,438 $21,101,192
FUND
CENTRAL MOTOR POOL $9,993,259 $10,089,828
REAL PROPERTY LEASE INTERNAL $30,587,138 $30,631,206
SERVICE FUND
BUREAU OF REVENUE SERVICES FUND $151,720 $151,720
RETIREE HEALTH INSURANCE FUND $116,958,054 $116,959,732
ACCIDENT, SICKNESS AND HEALTH $3,774,836 $3,904,320
INSURANCE INTERNAL SERVICE FUND
STATEWIDE RADIO AND NETWORK $500 $500
SYSTEM RESERVE FUND
STATE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE FUND $194,272,536 $194,371,472
STATE-ADMINISTERED FUND $2,042,515 $2,042,515
STATE LOTTERY FUND $4,866,866 $5,023,767
FIREFIGHTERS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT $168,439 $176,555
OFFICERS HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
FUND
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $842,014,309 $854,139,622
Sec. A-2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.500 13.500
Personal Services $1,339,485 $1,420,860
All Other $1,476,299 $1,476,299
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,815,784 $2,897,159
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
Page 35 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,207 $5,885
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,207 $5,885
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,077 $1,077
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,077 $1,077
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,246 $0
All Other $220 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,466 $0
ANIMAL WELFARE FUND 0946
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.500 13.500
Personal Services $1,344,731 $1,420,860
All Other $1,479,803 $1,483,261
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,824,534 $2,904,121
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Personal Services $7,839,947 $8,273,714
All Other $2,855,803 $2,855,803
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,695,750 $11,129,517
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.500 8.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.815 0.815
Personal Services $1,151,650 $1,221,748
All Other $2,975,591 $2,975,491
Page 36 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,127,241 $4,197,239
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 8.652 8.652
Personal Services $2,637,948 $2,817,352
All Other $2,982,713 $2,982,713
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,620,661 $5,800,065
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000 $1,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000 $1,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,050 $15,050
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,050 $15,050
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $242 $242
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $242 $242
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $51,980 $68,950
__________ __________
Page 37 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $51,980 $68,950
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $593 $1,579
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $593 $1,579
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $818 $2,177
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $818 $2,177
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,372 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,372 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,246 $0
All Other $178 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,424 $0
Bureau of Agriculture 0393
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Volunteer Services
Coordinator position to a Volunteer Services Program Director position. This initiative also
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,092 $6,710
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,092 $6,710
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,731 $4,476
All Other $115 $188
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,846 $4,664
BUREAU OF AGRICULTURE 0393
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Page 38 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $7,850,411 $8,280,424
All Other $2,922,833 $2,939,803
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,773,244 $11,220,227
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.500 8.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.815 0.815
Personal Services $1,158,627 $1,226,224
All Other $2,976,719 $2,977,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,135,346 $4,203,724
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 8.652 8.652
Personal Services $2,637,948 $2,817,352
All Other $2,983,531 $2,984,890
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,621,479 $5,802,242
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000 $1,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000 $1,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Certified Seed Fund 0787
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $637,697 $674,850
All Other $367,828 $367,828
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,005,525 $1,042,678
CERTIFIED SEED FUND 0787
Page 39 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $637,697 $674,850
All Other $367,828 $367,828
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,005,525 $1,042,678
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $1,370,331 $1,430,512
All Other $4,364,037 $4,364,037
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,734,368 $5,794,549
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $1,981,327 $2,085,220
All Other $57,374,299 $57,374,299
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $59,355,626 $59,459,519
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $647,668 $663,321
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $647,668 $663,321
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $134,681 $137,936
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $134,681 $137,936
DACF Administration 0401
Page 40 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $86,535 $132,844
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $86,535 $132,844
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $96,543 $148,277
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $96,543 $148,277
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in the cost of legal services provided by the
Department of the Attorney General.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $27,776
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $27,776
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,583 $0
All Other $2,240 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $14,823 $0
DACF ADMINISTRATION 0401
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $1,370,331 $1,430,512
All Other $5,098,240 $5,187,978
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,468,571 $6,618,490
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 41 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $1,993,910 $2,085,220
All Other $57,607,763 $57,660,512
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $59,601,673 $59,745,732
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 78.000 78.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.691 1.691
Personal Services $10,878,783 $11,464,651
All Other $3,165,605 $3,165,605
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,044,388 $14,630,256
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 3.135 3.135
Personal Services $478,471 $501,421
All Other $1,843,368 $1,843,368
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,321,839 $2,344,789
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $227,529 $227,529
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $227,529 $227,529
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for equipment installation in vehicles, including
radios.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,000 $0
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division for
essential aircraft liability coverage based on claims experience, coverage increases,
attorney's fees on claims and actuarially recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,601 $8,601
__________ __________
Page 42 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,601 $8,601
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,469 $20,469
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,469 $20,469
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $124,277 $158,824
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $124,277 $158,824
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for increased fees from the Department of Public Safety for
dispatch services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,912 $66,046
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $48,912 $66,046
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,016 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,016 $0
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of an approved range change.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $643,343 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $643,343 $0
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 43 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $5,624 $6,031
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,624 $6,031
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 48 Forest Ranger II positions
from range 19 to range 21.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $477,616 $507,002
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $477,616 $507,002
DIVISION OF FOREST PROTECTION Z232
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 78.000 78.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.691 1.691
Personal Services $12,014,382 $11,977,684
All Other $3,385,864 $3,419,545
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,400,246 $15,397,229
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 3.135 3.135
Personal Services $478,471 $501,421
All Other $1,843,368 $1,843,368
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,321,839 $2,344,789
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $227,529 $227,529
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $227,529 $227,529
Emergency Food Assistance Program Fund Z332
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
EMERGENCY FOOD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FUND Z332
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 44 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Farmers Drought Relief Grant Program Fund Z364
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,000 $300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FARMERS DROUGHT RELIEF GRANT PROGRAM FUND Z364
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,000 $300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.000 41.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.904 2.904
Personal Services $5,110,603 $5,402,442
All Other $897,709 $897,709
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,008,312 $6,300,151
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.711 2.711
Personal Services $932,928 $979,413
All Other $1,635,679 $1,635,679
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,568,607 $2,615,092
Page 45 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $290,829 $290,829
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $290,829 $290,829
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,863 $5,863
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,863 $5,863
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,676 $15,135
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,676 $15,135
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,971 $10,586
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,971 $10,586
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $36,678 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,678 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $24,352 $0
All Other $540 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $24,892 $0
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position.
Page 46 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,803 $6,029
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,803 $6,029
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Senior Planner position
to a Resource Management Coordinator position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,362 $10,761
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,362 $10,761
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Eliminates 2 seasonal Conservation Aide positions and reorganizes one seasonal
Conservation Aide position to a full-time Entomology Technician position. This initiative
also reallocates the cost of the reorganized position from 100% General Fund to 87%
General Fund and 13% Federal Expenditures Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.885) (0.885)
Personal Services ($3,976) ($357)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($3,976) ($357)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (0.327) (0.327)
Personal Services ($1,063) ($534)
All Other ($24) ($12)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($1,087) ($546)
FOREST RESOURCE MANAGEMENT Z233
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 42.000 42.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.019 2.019
Personal Services $5,159,470 $5,418,875
All Other $909,248 $918,707
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,068,718 $6,337,582
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.384 2.384
Page 47 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $956,217 $978,879
All Other $1,640,166 $1,646,253
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,596,383 $2,625,132
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $290,829 $290,829
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $290,829 $290,829
Fund To Address Food Insecurity and Provide Nutrition Incentives Z329
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
FUND TO ADDRESS FOOD INSECURITY AND PROVIDE NUTRITION
INCENTIVES Z329
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,456,114 $1,535,201
All Other $243,991 $243,991
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,700,105 $1,779,192
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $406,058 $434,287
All Other $896,173 $896,173
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,302,231 $1,330,460
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $145,427 $151,564
All Other $89,220 $89,220
Page 48 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $234,647 $240,784
Geology and Resource Information Z237
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,044 $2,044
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,044 $2,044
GEOLOGY AND RESOURCE INFORMATION Z237
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,456,114 $1,535,201
All Other $246,035 $246,035
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,702,149 $1,781,236
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $406,058 $434,287
All Other $896,173 $896,173
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,302,231 $1,330,460
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $145,427 $151,564
All Other $89,220 $89,220
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $234,647 $240,784
Harness Racing Commission 0320
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.597 2.597
Personal Services $842,332 $887,948
All Other $20,580,392 $20,580,392
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $21,422,724 $21,468,340
Page 49 - 132LR1775(23)

HARNESS RACING COMMISSION 0320
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.597 2.597
Personal Services $842,332 $887,948
All Other $20,580,392 $20,580,392
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $21,422,724 $21,468,340
Land for Maine's Future Z162
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $215,911 $228,162
All Other $34,630 $34,630
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,541 $262,792
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $111,378 $119,325
All Other $19,549 $19,549
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $130,927 $138,874
LAND FOR MAINE'S FUTURE Z162
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $215,911 $228,162
All Other $34,630 $34,630
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,541 $262,792
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $111,378 $119,325
All Other $19,549 $19,549
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $130,927 $138,874
Land For Maine's Future Trust Fund Z377
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 50 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $49,560 $49,560
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $49,560 $49,560
LAND FOR MAINE'S FUTURE TRUST FUND Z377
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $49,560 $49,560
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $49,560 $49,560
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $590,000 $590,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $590,000 $590,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 43.000 43.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.808 1.808
Personal Services $4,944,981 $5,214,857
All Other $14,630,332 $14,630,332
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,575,313 $19,845,189
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,180 $5,180
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,180 $5,180
Land Management and Planning Z239
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $56,834 $72,735
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $56,834 $72,735
LAND MANAGEMENT AND PLANNING Z239
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 51 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $590,000 $590,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $590,000 $590,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 43.000 43.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.808 1.808
Personal Services $4,944,981 $5,214,857
All Other $14,692,346 $14,708,247
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,637,327 $19,923,104
Maine Conservation Corps Z149
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $258,445 $271,181
All Other $163,096 $163,096
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $421,541 $434,277
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,389 $16,033
All Other $1,008,973 $1,008,973
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,024,362 $1,025,006
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $134,383 $141,993
All Other $684,125 $684,125
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $818,508 $826,118
MAINE CONSERVATION CORPS Z149
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $258,445 $271,181
All Other $163,096 $163,096
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $421,541 $434,277
Page 52 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,389 $16,033
All Other $1,008,973 $1,008,973
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,024,362 $1,025,006
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $134,383 $141,993
All Other $684,125 $684,125
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $818,508 $826,118
Maine Farms for the Future Program 0925
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $142,589 $142,589
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $142,589 $142,589
MAINE FARMS FOR THE FUTURE PROGRAM 0925
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $142,589 $142,589
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $142,589 $142,589
Maine Forestry Operations Cleanup and Response Fund Z327
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,000 $20,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
MAINE FORESTRY OPERATIONS CLEANUP AND RESPONSE FUND Z327
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,000 $20,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
Maine Healthy Soils Fund Z328
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
Page 53 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE HEALTHY SOILS FUND Z328
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.000 23.000
Personal Services $2,641,288 $2,811,283
All Other $223,993 $223,993
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,865,281 $3,035,276
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,300 $3,300
All Other $108,178 $108,178
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,478 $111,478
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,667 $2,667
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,667 $2,667
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Page 54 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $93,786 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $93,786 $0
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 6 Environmental Specialist
II positions to Environmental Licensing Specialist I positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $32,200 $33,853
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $32,200 $33,853
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 4 Environmental Specialist
III positions to Environmental Licensing Specialist II positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $34,197 $36,871
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $34,197 $36,871
Maine Land Use Planning Commission Z236
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 2 Environmental Specialist
IV positions to Environmental Licensing Supervisor positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,113 $16,975
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,113 $16,975
MAINE LAND USE PLANNING COMMISSION Z236
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.000 23.000
Personal Services $2,817,584 $2,898,982
All Other $226,660 $226,660
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,044,244 $3,125,642
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,300 $3,300
All Other $108,178 $108,178
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,478 $111,478
Milk Commission 0188
Page 55 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,468 $148,346
All Other $42,994,324 $42,994,324
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $43,136,792 $43,142,670
MILK COMMISSION 0188
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $142,468 $148,346
All Other $42,994,324 $42,994,324
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $43,136,792 $43,142,670
Natural Areas Program Z821
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $411,728 $434,598
All Other $66,242 $66,242
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $477,970 $500,840
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $166,136 $179,238
All Other $133,082 $133,082
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $299,218 $312,320
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $280,134 $302,202
All Other $605,699 $605,699
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $885,833 $907,901
NATURAL AREAS PROGRAM Z821
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $411,728 $434,598
All Other $66,242 $66,242
Page 56 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $477,970 $500,840
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $166,136 $179,238
All Other $133,082 $133,082
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $299,218 $312,320
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $280,134 $302,202
All Other $605,699 $605,699
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $885,833 $907,901
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 5.731 5.731
Personal Services $2,492,861 $2,638,687
All Other $12,656,339 $12,656,339
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,149,200 $15,295,026
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,179 $3,179
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,179 $3,179
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Reorganizes 2 26-week Navigational Aides Assistant positions to one full-time
Navigational Aides Assistant position.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($10,019) ($13,477)
All Other ($967) ($1,309)
__________ __________
Page 57 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($10,986) ($14,786)
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Reorganizes 2 26-week Recreation Trails Coordinator positions to one full-time
Recreation Trails Coordinator position and reallocates the cost of the reorganized position
between Other Special Revenue Funds accounts within the same program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($10,328) ($13,031)
All Other ($992) ($1,256)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($11,320) ($14,287)
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Reorganizes one seasonal Recreation Trails Coordinator position to a year-round
position using savings from eliminating one Heavy Equipment Operator position. This
initiative also reallocates the cost of the Recreation Trails Coordinator position between
Other Special Revenue Funds accounts within the same program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (1.154) (1.154)
Personal Services ($6,283) ($6,979)
All Other ($601) ($665)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($6,884) ($7,644)
OFF-ROAD RECREATIONAL VEHICLES PROGRAM Z224
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 22.000 22.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.577 2.577
Personal Services $2,466,231 $2,605,200
All Other $12,656,958 $12,656,288
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,123,189 $15,261,488
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 49.000 49.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 80.579 80.579
Personal Services $10,362,157 $11,164,869
All Other $1,709,525 $1,709,525
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,071,682 $12,874,394
Page 58 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $251,974 $264,689
All Other $6,799,139 $6,799,139
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,051,113 $7,063,828
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $638,421 $686,612
All Other $2,410,440 $2,410,440
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,048,861 $3,097,052
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $412,720 $412,720
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $412,720 $412,720
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,776 $27,776
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,776 $27,776
Parks - General Operations Z221
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,052 $24,136
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,052 $24,136
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $148 $392
__________ __________
Page 59 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $148 $392
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,965 $13,503
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,965 $13,503
PARKS - GENERAL OPERATIONS Z221
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 49.000 49.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 80.579 80.579
Personal Services $10,362,157 $11,164,869
All Other $1,746,353 $1,761,437
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,108,510 $12,926,306
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $251,974 $264,689
All Other $6,799,287 $6,799,531
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,051,261 $7,064,220
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $638,421 $686,612
All Other $2,424,405 $2,423,943
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,062,826 $3,110,555
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $412,720 $412,720
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $412,720 $412,720
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Pesticides Control - Board of 0287
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.018 2.018
Page 60 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $321,453 $340,356
All Other $218,007 $218,007
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $539,460 $558,363
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.500 10.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.893 2.893
Personal Services $1,381,767 $1,472,673
All Other $1,394,864 $1,394,864
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,776,631 $2,867,537
Pesticides Control - Board of 0287
Initiative: Provides funding for increased information technology system costs related to
pesticides licensing.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,054 $28,295
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,054 $28,295
PESTICIDES CONTROL - BOARD OF 0287
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.018 2.018
Personal Services $321,453 $340,356
All Other $218,007 $218,007
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $539,460 $558,363
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.500 10.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 2.893 2.893
Personal Services $1,381,767 $1,472,673
All Other $1,409,918 $1,423,159
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,791,685 $2,895,832
Statewide Hunger Relief Program Z288
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Page 61 - 132LR1775(23)

STATEWIDE HUNGER RELIEF PROGRAM Z288
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Submerged Lands and Island Registry Z241
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $360,019 $379,487
All Other $713,753 $713,753
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,073,772 $1,093,240
SUBMERGED LANDS AND ISLAND REGISTRY Z241
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $360,019 $379,487
All Other $713,753 $713,753
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,073,772 $1,093,240
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $58,658,323 $60,547,210
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $20,991,027 $21,192,888
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $177,991,410 $179,115,701
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $1,000,000 $1,000,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $413,720 $413,720
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $259,054,480 $262,269,519
Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Page 62 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $825,106 $866,908
All Other $319,241 $319,241
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,144,347 $1,186,149
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,727 $8,727
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,727 $8,727
Arts - Administration 0178
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,203 $11,371
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,203 $11,371
ARTS - ADMINISTRATION 0178
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $825,106 $866,908
All Other $336,171 $339,339
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,161,277 $1,206,247
Arts - General Grants Program 0177
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $357,051 $357,051
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $357,051 $357,051
ARTS - GENERAL GRANTS PROGRAM 0177
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $357,051 $357,051
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $357,051 $357,051
Arts - Sponsored Program 0176
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 63 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $435,274 $463,885
All Other $759,000 $759,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,194,274 $1,222,885
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $102,168 $102,168
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $102,168 $102,168
ARTS - SPONSORED PROGRAM 0176
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $435,274 $463,885
All Other $759,000 $759,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,194,274 $1,222,885
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $102,168 $102,168
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $102,168 $102,168
ARTS COMMISSION, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,161,277 $1,206,247
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $1,551,325 $1,579,936
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $102,168 $102,168
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,814,770 $2,888,351
Sec. A-4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 67.000 67.000
Personal Services $9,524,060 $10,091,196
All Other $1,216,981 $1,216,981
Page 64 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,741,041 $11,308,177
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,723,953 $1,824,039
All Other $319,340 $319,340
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,043,293 $2,143,379
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 54.000 54.000
Personal Services $9,218,352 $9,806,800
All Other $1,007,412 $1,007,412
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,225,764 $10,814,212
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $722,762 $790,073
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $722,762 $790,073
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,488 $38,793
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $35,488 $38,793
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $111,687 $122,089
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,687 $122,089
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,233 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,233 $0
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Page 65 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Research Assistant
MSEA-B position to a Research Assistant MSEA-D position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $31,815 $33,879
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $31,815 $33,879
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Research Assistant
MSEA-B position to a Research Assistant MSEA-D position and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,182 $19,368
All Other $406 $458
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,588 $19,826
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one part-time Research
Assistant MSEA-B position from range 22 to range 26.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,590 $8,924
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,590 $8,924
ADMINISTRATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL 0310
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 67.000 67.000
Personal Services $9,574,698 $10,133,999
All Other $1,939,743 $2,007,054
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,514,441 $12,141,053
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,723,953 $1,824,039
All Other $354,828 $358,133
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,078,781 $2,182,172
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 54.000 54.000
Personal Services $9,235,534 $9,826,168
All Other $1,119,505 $1,129,959
Page 66 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,355,039 $10,956,127
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,840,405 $1,966,972
All Other $969,485 $969,485
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,809,890 $2,936,457
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $82,050 $85,442
All Other $279,637 $279,637
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $361,687 $365,079
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $185,003 $185,003
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $185,003 $185,003
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,360 $32,094
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $29,360 $32,094
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding for the cost of full coverage insurance on the morgue trailer.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $513 $513
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $513 $513
CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER - OFFICE OF 0412
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,840,405 $1,966,972
All Other $999,358 $1,002,092
Page 67 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,839,763 $2,969,064
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $82,050 $85,442
All Other $279,637 $279,637
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $361,687 $365,079
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $185,003 $185,003
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $185,003 $185,003
Civil Rights 0039
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $184,940 $199,982
All Other $100,589 $100,589
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $285,529 $300,571
Civil Rights 0039
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,812 $5,261
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,812 $5,261
CIVIL RIGHTS 0039
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $184,940 $199,982
All Other $105,401 $105,850
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $290,341 $305,832
District Attorneys Salaries 0409
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 100.000 100.000
Page 68 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $17,555,846 $18,140,565
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,555,846 $18,140,565
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $818,257 $857,053
All Other $41,483 $41,483
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $859,740 $898,536
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $134,955 $141,566
All Other $11,157 $11,157
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $146,112 $152,723
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS SALARIES 0409
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 100.000 100.000
Personal Services $17,555,846 $18,140,565
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,555,846 $18,140,565
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $818,257 $857,053
All Other $41,483 $41,483
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $859,740 $898,536
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $134,955 $141,566
All Other $11,157 $11,157
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $146,112 $152,723
FHM - Attorney General 0947
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Page 69 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $179,598 $194,883
All Other $23,456 $23,456
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $203,054 $218,339
FHM - ATTORNEY GENERAL 0947
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $179,598 $194,883
All Other $23,456 $23,456
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $203,054 $218,339
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $68,750 $74,033
All Other $4,184 $4,184
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $72,934 $78,217
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 86.500 86.500
Personal Services $13,114,366 $14,013,502
All Other $1,649,967 $1,649,967
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $14,764,333 $15,663,469
Human Services Division 0696
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $186,768 $204,161
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $186,768 $204,161
HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION 0696
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $68,750 $74,033
All Other $4,184 $4,184
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $72,934 $78,217
Page 70 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 86.500 86.500
Personal Services $13,114,366 $14,013,502
All Other $1,836,735 $1,854,128
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $14,951,101 $15,867,630
Maine Mass Violence Care Fund Z400
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE MASS VIOLENCE CARE FUND Z400
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Recovery Fund Z343
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE RECOVERY FUND Z343
PROGRAM SUMMARY
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Road Commission Fund Z353
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
ROAD COMMISSION FUND Z353
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 71 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Victims' Compensation Board 0711
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $135,000 $135,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $135,000 $135,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $225,549 $225,549
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $225,549 $225,549
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $305,234 $319,803
All Other $604,503 $604,503
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $909,737 $924,306
VICTIMS' COMPENSATION BOARD 0711
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $135,000 $135,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $135,000 $135,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $225,549 $225,549
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $225,549 $225,549
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $305,234 $319,803
All Other $604,503 $604,503
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $909,737 $924,306
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Page 72 - 132LR1775(23)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $32,408,325 $33,769,731
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $3,525,757 $3,671,336
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $203,054 $218,339
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $26,547,992 $28,086,789
MAINE RECOVERY FUND $500 $500
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $62,685,628 $65,746,695
Sec. A-5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AUDITOR, OFFICE OF THE STATE
Audit Bureau 0067
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,996,475 $2,101,531
All Other $90,767 $90,767
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,087,242 $2,192,298
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 22.000 22.000
Personal Services $2,931,881 $3,110,581
All Other $368,775 $368,775
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,300,656 $3,479,356
Audit Bureau 0067
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,417 $24,377
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,417 $24,377
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $38,561 $36,984
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,561 $36,984
AUDIT BUREAU 0067
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 73 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,996,475 $2,101,531
All Other $116,184 $115,144
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,112,659 $2,216,675
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 22.000 22.000
Personal Services $2,931,881 $3,110,581
All Other $407,336 $405,759
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,339,217 $3,516,340
Unorganized Territory 0075
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $198,284 $207,771
All Other $94,089 $94,089
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $292,373 $301,860
Unorganized Territory 0075
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,753 $2,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,753 $2,640
UNORGANIZED TERRITORY 0075
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $198,284 $207,771
All Other $96,842 $96,729
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $295,126 $304,500
AUDITOR, OFFICE OF THE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,112,659 $2,216,675
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $3,634,343 $3,820,840
__________ __________
Page 74 - 132LR1775(23)

DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $5,747,002 $6,037,515
Sec. A-6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
BAXTER STATE PARK AUTHORITY
Baxter State Park Authority 0253
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.000 25.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 22.370 22.370
Personal Services $4,459,442 $4,763,721
All Other $1,566,487 $1,566,487
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,025,929 $6,330,208
BAXTER STATE PARK AUTHORITY 0253
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.000 25.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 22.370 22.370
Personal Services $4,459,442 $4,763,721
All Other $1,566,487 $1,566,487
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,025,929 $6,330,208
Sec. A-7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
BLUEBERRY COMMISSION OF MAINE, WILD
Blueberry Commission 0375
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,780,000 $1,780,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,780,000 $1,780,000
BLUEBERRY COMMISSION 0375
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,780,000 $1,780,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,780,000 $1,780,000
Sec. A-8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CENTERS FOR INNOVATION
Page 75 - 132LR1775(23)

Centers for Innovation 0911
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $118,009 $118,009
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $118,009 $118,009
CENTERS FOR INNOVATION 0911
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $118,009 $118,009
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $118,009 $118,009
Sec. A-9. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION, STATE
Maine Charter School Commission Z137
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,400 $15,400
All Other $679,409 $679,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $694,809 $694,809
MAINE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION Z137
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,400 $15,400
All Other $679,409 $679,409
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $694,809 $694,809
Sec. A-10. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CHILDREN'S TRUST INCORPORATED, BOARD OF THE MAINE
Maine Children's Trust Incorporated 0798
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,300 $48,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $48,300 $48,300
MAINE CHILDREN'S TRUST INCORPORATED 0798
Page 76 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,300 $48,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $48,300 $48,300
Sec. A-11. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $86,102,572 $86,102,572
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $86,102,572 $86,102,572
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,639,838 $4,639,838
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,639,838 $4,639,838
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $4,106,600 $4,106,600
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $4,106,600 $4,106,600
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
MAINE COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM - BOARD OF TRUSTEES 0556
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $86,102,572 $86,102,572
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $86,102,572 $86,102,572
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,639,838 $4,639,838
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,639,838 $4,639,838
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $4,106,600 $4,106,600
Page 77 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $4,106,600 $4,106,600
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
MCCS Free Community College - Two Enrollment Years Z335
Initiative: Provides funding for the State's 7 community colleges to continue offering
student scholarships through the State's free community college tuition program. Funding
is necessary to maintain the program established in Public Law 2023, chapter 412, Part
QQQ, which covers eligible persons who graduate high school or obtain the equivalent of
a high school diploma in 2024 or 2025.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,300,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,300,000 $0
MCCS FREE COMMUNITY COLLEGE - TWO ENROLLMENT YEARS Z335
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,300,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,300,000 $0
Regional Fire Service Training Fund Z356
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
REGIONAL FIRE SERVICE TRAINING FUND Z356
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $86,302,572 $86,302,572
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,939,838 $4,639,838
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $4,106,600 $4,106,600
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $102,349,010 $95,049,010
Page 78 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. A-12. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CONNECTMAINE AUTHORITY
ConnectMaine Fund Z294
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,716,285 $1,716,285
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,716,285 $1,716,285
CONNECTMAINE FUND Z294
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,716,285 $1,716,285
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,716,285 $1,716,285
Sec. A-13. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $7,482,010 $7,670,397
All Other $10,608,865 $10,608,865
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,090,875 $18,279,262
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $98,043 $102,510
All Other $879,205 $879,205
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $977,248 $981,715
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $404,206 $412,346
All Other $633,625 $633,625
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,037,831 $1,045,971
Page 79 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,380,827 $1,235,969
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,380,827 $1,235,969
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,514 $10,514
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,514 $10,514
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $466,941 $720,849
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $466,941 $720,849
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,121 $20,250
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,121 $20,250
Administration - Corrections 0141
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,760 $4,760
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,760 $4,760
ADMINISTRATION - CORRECTIONS 0141
Page 80 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $7,482,010 $7,670,397
All Other $12,471,907 $12,580,957
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,953,917 $20,251,354
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $98,043 $102,510
All Other $879,205 $879,205
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $977,248 $981,715
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $404,206 $412,346
All Other $646,746 $653,875
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,050,952 $1,066,221
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 120.000 120.000
Personal Services $14,707,137 $15,100,297
All Other $1,679,187 $1,679,187
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,386,324 $16,779,484
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $516,000 $516,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $516,000 $516,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $305,959 $305,959
Page 81 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $305,959 $305,959
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,619 $6,619
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,619 $6,619
Adult Community Corrections 0124
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,318 $18,318
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,318 $18,318
ADULT COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS 0124
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 120.000 120.000
Personal Services $14,707,137 $15,100,297
All Other $1,704,124 $1,704,124
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,411,261 $16,804,421
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $516,000 $516,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $516,000 $516,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $305,959 $305,959
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $305,959 $305,959
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $6,493,241 $6,652,829
Page 82 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $458,342 $458,342
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,951,583 $7,111,171
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,971 $85,971
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $85,971 $85,971
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $24,180 $24,180
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,180 $24,180
Bolduc Correctional Facility Z155
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,812 $17,812
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,812 $17,812
BOLDUC CORRECTIONAL FACILITY Z155
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 53.000 53.000
Personal Services $6,493,241 $6,652,829
All Other $500,334 $500,334
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,993,575 $7,153,163
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,971 $85,971
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $85,971 $85,971
Capital Construction/Repairs/Improvements - Corrections 0432
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
Page 83 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION/REPAIRS/IMPROVEMENTS - CORRECTIONS
0432
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Correctional Center 0162
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 285.000 285.000
Personal Services $34,798,828 $35,799,544
All Other $2,274,436 $2,274,436
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,073,264 $38,073,980
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,971 $60,971
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,971 $60,971
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $245,875 $256,374
All Other $151,393 $151,393
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $397,268 $407,767
Correctional Center 0162
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $118,685 $118,685
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $118,685 $118,685
CORRECTIONAL CENTER 0162
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 84 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 285.000 285.000
Personal Services $34,798,828 $35,799,544
All Other $2,393,121 $2,393,121
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,191,949 $38,192,665
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,971 $60,971
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,971 $60,971
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $245,875 $256,374
All Other $151,393 $151,393
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $397,268 $407,767
Correctional Medical Services Fund 0286
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $44,135,181 $44,135,181
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,135,181 $44,135,181
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,914 $11,914
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,914 $11,914
CORRECTIONAL MEDICAL SERVICES FUND 0286
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $44,135,181 $44,135,181
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,135,181 $44,135,181
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 85 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,914 $11,914
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,914 $11,914
Corrections Food Z177
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,793,704 $4,793,704
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,793,704 $4,793,704
CORRECTIONS FOOD Z177
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,793,704 $4,793,704
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,793,704 $4,793,704
Corrections Fuel Z366
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,272,460 $2,272,460
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,272,460 $2,272,460
CORRECTIONS FUEL Z366
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,272,460 $2,272,460
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,272,460 $2,272,460
Corrections Industries Z166
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $651,696 $671,556
All Other $1,974,290 $1,974,290
__________ __________
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND TOTAL $2,625,986 $2,645,846
Page 86 - 132LR1775(23)

Corrections Industries Z166
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,521 $28,584
__________ __________
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND TOTAL $18,521 $28,584
CORRECTIONS INDUSTRIES Z166
PROGRAM SUMMARY
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $651,696 $671,556
All Other $1,992,811 $2,002,874
__________ __________
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND TOTAL $2,644,507 $2,674,430
County Jails Operation Fund Z227
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,342,104 $20,342,104
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,342,104 $20,342,104
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $565,503 $565,503
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $565,503 $565,503
COUNTY JAILS OPERATION FUND Z227
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,342,104 $20,342,104
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,342,104 $20,342,104
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $565,503 $565,503
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $565,503 $565,503
Departmentwide - Overtime 0032
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 87 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,500,260 $1,549,783
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,500,260 $1,549,783
DEPARTMENTWIDE - OVERTIME 0032
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,500,260 $1,549,783
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,500,260 $1,549,783
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $1,927,648 $1,970,196
All Other $312,854 $312,854
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,240,502 $2,283,050
Downeast Correctional Facility 0542
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,979 $4,979
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,979 $4,979
DOWNEAST CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 0542
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $1,927,648 $1,970,196
All Other $317,833 $317,833
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,245,481 $2,288,029
Justice - Planning, Projects and Statistics 0502
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $56,281 $57,428
All Other $2,045 $2,045
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,326 $59,473
Page 88 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $164,176 $168,236
All Other $688,760 $688,760
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $852,936 $856,996
Justice - Planning, Projects and Statistics 0502
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $714 $714
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $714 $714
JUSTICE - PLANNING, PROJECTS AND STATISTICS 0502
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $56,281 $57,428
All Other $2,759 $2,759
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $59,040 $60,187
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $164,176 $168,236
All Other $688,760 $688,760
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $852,936 $856,996
Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 63.000 63.000
Personal Services $8,207,188 $8,430,918
All Other $5,670,477 $5,670,477
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,877,665 $14,101,395
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,032 $90,032
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $90,032 $90,032
Page 89 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $223,622 $223,622
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $223,622 $223,622
Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,574 $20,574
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,574 $20,574
Juvenile Community Corrections 0892
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,965 $6,965
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,965 $6,965
JUVENILE COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS 0892
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 63.000 63.000
Personal Services $8,207,188 $8,430,918
All Other $5,698,016 $5,698,016
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,905,204 $14,128,934
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,032 $90,032
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $90,032 $90,032
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $223,622 $223,622
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $223,622 $223,622
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 90 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 144.000 144.000
Personal Services $16,943,049 $17,424,457
All Other $1,239,763 $1,239,763
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,182,812 $18,664,220
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $227,640 $227,640
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $227,640 $227,640
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $38,694 $38,694
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,694 $38,694
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,239 $33,239
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,239 $33,239
Long Creek Youth Development Center 0163
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 4 Juvenile Program
Manager positions from range 26 to range 28, retroactive to April 19, 2019.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $159,121 $36,365
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $159,121 $36,365
LONG CREEK YOUTH DEVELOPMENT CENTER 0163
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 144.000 144.000
Personal Services $17,102,170 $17,460,822
All Other $1,273,002 $1,273,002
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,375,172 $18,733,824
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 91 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $227,640 $227,640
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $227,640 $227,640
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $38,694 $38,694
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $38,694 $38,694
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 161.000 161.000
Personal Services $19,531,609 $20,031,150
All Other $1,519,962 $1,519,962
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,051,571 $21,551,112
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $73,408 $73,408
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $73,408 $73,408
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $136,897 $136,897
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $136,897 $136,897
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,503 $5,503
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,503 $5,503
Mountain View Correctional Facility 0857
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $60,137 $60,137
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,137 $60,137
Page 92 - 132LR1775(23)

MOUNTAIN VIEW CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 0857
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 161.000 161.000
Personal Services $19,531,609 $20,031,150
All Other $1,585,602 $1,585,602
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,117,211 $21,616,752
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $73,408 $73,408
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $73,408 $73,408
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $136,897 $136,897
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $136,897 $136,897
Office of Victim Services 0046
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $438,227 $451,647
All Other $299,510 $299,510
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $737,737 $751,157
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $34,974 $34,974
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,974 $34,974
Office of Victim Services 0046
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $906 $906
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $906 $906
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES 0046
Page 93 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $438,227 $451,647
All Other $300,416 $300,416
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $738,643 $752,063
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $34,974 $34,974
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,974 $34,974
Parole Board 0123
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,650 $1,650
All Other $2,828 $2,828
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,478 $4,478
PAROLE BOARD 0123
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,650 $1,650
All Other $2,828 $2,828
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,478 $4,478
State Prison 0144
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 309.000 309.000
Personal Services $37,711,270 $38,734,619
All Other $4,154,526 $4,154,526
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $41,865,796 $42,889,145
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 94 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $34,034 $34,034
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,034 $34,034
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,974 $53,974
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,974 $53,974
State Prison 0144
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,585 $92,585
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $92,585 $92,585
STATE PRISON 0144
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 309.000 309.000
Personal Services $37,711,270 $38,734,619
All Other $4,301,085 $4,301,085
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $42,012,355 $43,035,704
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $34,034 $34,034
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,034 $34,034
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $252,051,995 $256,114,806
Page 95 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $2,799,735 $2,808,262
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,885,788 $2,911,556
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $500,000 $500,000
PRISON INDUSTRIES FUND $2,644,507 $2,674,430
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $260,882,025 $265,009,054
Sec. A-14. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CULTURAL AFFAIRS COUNCIL, MAINE STATE
New Century Program Fund 0904
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,246 $40,246
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $40,246 $40,246
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $65,424 $65,424
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $65,424 $65,424
New Century Program Fund 0904
Initiative: Reduces funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resource centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($312) ($278)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($312) ($278)
NEW CENTURY PROGRAM FUND 0904
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $39,934 $39,968
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $39,934 $39,968
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $65,424 $65,424
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $65,424 $65,424
State of Maine Bicentennial Celebration Z260
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 96 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
STATE OF MAINE BICENTENNIAL CELEBRATION Z260
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
CULTURAL AFFAIRS COUNCIL, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $39,934 $39,968
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $65,924 $65,924
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $105,858 $105,892
Sec. A-15. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management 0109
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $501,672 $522,443
All Other $67,120 $67,120
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $568,792 $589,563
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100 $100
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $100 $100
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Administration - Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management 0109
Page 97 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for an increase to statewide technology services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Administration - Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management 0109
Initiative: Provides funding for workers' compensation premiums for emergency
management volunteers in the Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency
program and deappropriates related All Other in the Administration - Defense, Veterans
and Emergency Management program in the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($36,026) ($36,026)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($36,026) ($36,026)
ADMINISTRATION - DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT 0109
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $501,672 $522,443
All Other $36,094 $36,094
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $537,766 $558,537
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100 $100
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $100 $100
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,603,033 $1,704,429
All Other $447,539 $447,539
__________ __________
Page 98 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,050,572 $2,151,968
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $2,178,777 $2,316,278
All Other $31,492,137 $31,492,137
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $33,670,914 $33,808,415
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $289,660 $308,169
All Other $464,640 $464,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $754,300 $772,809
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Reallocates funding for statewide technology services provided by the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
from 30% General Fund and 70% Federal Expenditures Fund to 100% General Fund and
provides additional funding to support the increased cost of these services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $392,377 $393,963
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $392,377 $393,963
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($299,962) ($299,962)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($299,962) ($299,962)
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $80,622 $80,622
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $80,622 $80,622
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding for workers' compensation premiums for emergency
management volunteers in the Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency
program and deappropriates related All Other in the Administration - Defense, Veterans
and Emergency Management program in the same fund.
Page 99 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $140,600 $140,600
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $140,600 $140,600
ADMINISTRATION - MAINE EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY 0214
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,603,033 $1,704,429
All Other $1,061,138 $1,062,724
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,664,171 $2,767,153
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $2,178,777 $2,316,278
All Other $31,192,175 $31,192,175
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $33,370,952 $33,508,453
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $289,660 $308,169
All Other $464,640 $464,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $754,300 $772,809
Emergency Response Operations 0918
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $73,950 $79,681
All Other $13,473 $13,473
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $87,423 $93,154
EMERGENCY RESPONSE OPERATIONS 0918
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $73,950 $79,681
All Other $13,473 $13,473
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $87,423 $93,154
Page 100 - 132LR1775(23)

Maine National Guard Postsecondary Fund Z190
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE NATIONAL GUARD POSTSECONDARY FUND Z190
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $750,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Veterans' Homes Stabilization Fund Z358
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE VETERANS' HOMES STABILIZATION FUND Z358
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,152,870 $1,222,585
All Other $3,450,278 $3,450,278
Page 101 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,603,148 $4,672,863
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 122.000 122.000
Personal Services $12,614,436 $13,453,927
All Other $13,319,279 $13,319,279
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,933,715 $26,773,206
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $113,966 $119,713
All Other $487,218 $487,218
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $601,184 $606,931
MAINE MILITARY AUTHORITY ENTERPRISE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
Personal Services $114,525 $119,302
All Other $395,042 $395,042
__________ __________
MAINE MILITARY AUTHORITY ENTERPRISE $509,567 $514,344
FUND TOTAL
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase to statewide technology services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,000 $15,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,000 $15,000
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,127 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $11,127 $0
Military Training and Operations 0108
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Environmental
Specialist II position to an Environmental Specialist III position, retroactive to March 2024.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 102 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $8,490 $8,833
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,490 $8,833
MILITARY TRAINING AND OPERATIONS 0108
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,152,870 $1,222,585
All Other $3,465,278 $3,465,278
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,618,148 $4,687,863
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 122.000 122.000
Personal Services $12,634,053 $13,462,760
All Other $13,319,279 $13,319,279
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,953,332 $26,782,039
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $113,966 $119,713
All Other $487,218 $487,218
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $601,184 $606,931
MAINE MILITARY AUTHORITY ENTERPRISE 2025-26 2026-27
FUND
Personal Services $114,525 $119,302
All Other $395,042 $395,042
__________ __________
MAINE MILITARY AUTHORITY ENTERPRISE $509,567 $514,344
FUND TOTAL
Stream Gaging Cooperative Program 0858
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $175,005 $175,005
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $175,005 $175,005
STREAM GAGING COOPERATIVE PROGRAM 0858
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 103 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $175,005 $175,005
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $175,005 $175,005
Veterans' Homelessness Prevention Partnership Fund Z298
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
VETERANS' HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION PARTNERSHIP FUND Z298
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 46.000 46.000
Personal Services $4,759,022 $5,081,835
All Other $1,334,084 $1,334,084
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,093,106 $6,415,919
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $289,523 $308,225
All Other $320,629 $320,629
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $610,152 $628,854
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $530,684 $530,684
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $530,684 $530,684
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Provides funding for an increase to statewide technology services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information
Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $94,000 $94,000
Page 104 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $94,000 $94,000
VETERANS SERVICES 0110
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 46.000 46.000
Personal Services $4,759,022 $5,081,835
All Other $1,428,084 $1,428,084
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,187,106 $6,509,919
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $289,523 $308,225
All Other $320,629 $320,629
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $610,152 $628,854
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $530,684 $530,684
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $530,684 $530,684
Veterans Temporary Assistance Fund Z268
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
VETERANS TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FUND Z268
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $15,282,196 $15,798,477
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $59,934,536 $60,919,446
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,975,091 $2,005,078
Page 105 - 132LR1775(23)

MAINE MILITARY AUTHORITY $509,567 $514,344
ENTERPRISE FUND
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $77,701,390 $79,237,345
Sec. A-16. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEVELOPMENT FOUNDATION, MAINE
Development Foundation 0198
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $58,444 $58,444
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,444 $58,444
DEVELOPMENT FOUNDATION 0198
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $58,444 $58,444
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,444 $58,444
Sec. A-17. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DIRIGO HEALTH
Dirigo Health Fund 0988
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $409,147 $425,658
All Other $852,590 $852,590
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,261,737 $1,278,248
Dirigo Health Fund 0988
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $899 $899
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $899 $899
Dirigo Health Fund 0988
Page 106 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $356 $602
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $356 $602
DIRIGO HEALTH FUND 0988
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $409,147 $425,658
All Other $853,845 $854,091
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,262,992 $1,279,749
DIRIGO HEALTH
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,262,992 $1,279,749
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,262,992 $1,279,749
Sec. A-18. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DISABILITY RIGHTS MAINE
Disability Rights Maine 0523
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $146,045 $146,045
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $146,045 $146,045
DISABILITY RIGHTS MAINE 0523
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $146,045 $146,045
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $146,045 $146,045
Sec. A-19. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DOWNEAST INSTITUTE FOR APPLIED MARINE RESEARCH AND
EDUCATION
Page 107 - 132LR1775(23)

Downeast Institute for Applied Marine Research and Education 0993
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,554 $12,554
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,554 $12,554
DOWNEAST INSTITUTE FOR APPLIED MARINE RESEARCH AND
EDUCATION 0993
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,554 $12,554
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,554 $12,554
Sec. A-20. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Economic and Community Development 0069
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $875,163 $917,194
All Other $1,102,448 $1,102,448
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,977,611 $2,019,642
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $273,432 $273,432
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $273,432 $273,432
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $147,602 $147,602
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $147,602 $147,602
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 108 - 132LR1775(23)

Administration - Economic and Community Development 0069
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,488 $23,488
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,488 $23,488
Administration - Economic and Community Development 0069
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,950 $28,642
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,950 $28,642
ADMINISTRATION - ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT 0069
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $875,163 $917,194
All Other $1,140,886 $1,154,578
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,016,049 $2,071,772
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $273,432 $273,432
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $273,432 $273,432
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $30,000 $30,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,000 $30,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $147,602 $147,602
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $147,602 $147,602
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Applied Technology Development Center System 0929
Page 109 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $178,838 $178,838
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $178,838 $178,838
APPLIED TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CENTER SYSTEM 0929
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $178,838 $178,838
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $178,838 $178,838
Business Development 0585
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,156,287 $1,212,792
All Other $869,604 $869,604
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,025,891 $2,082,396
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $2,500 $2,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $2,500 $2,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT 0585
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,156,287 $1,212,792
All Other $869,604 $869,604
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,025,891 $2,082,396
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $2,500 $2,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $2,500 $2,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Communities for Maine's Future Fund Z108
Page 110 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
COMMUNITIES FOR MAINE'S FUTURE FUND Z108
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Community Development Block Grant Program 0587
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $232,752 $242,185
All Other $88,262 $88,262
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $321,014 $330,447
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $616,011 $616,011
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $616,011 $616,011
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $440,609 $458,292
All Other $21,260,658 $21,260,658
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $21,701,267 $21,718,950
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM 0587
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $232,752 $242,185
Page 111 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $88,262 $88,262
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $321,014 $330,447
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $616,011 $616,011
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $616,011 $616,011
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $440,609 $458,292
All Other $21,260,658 $21,260,658
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $21,701,267 $21,718,950
Energy Rate Relief Fund Z344
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
ENERGY RATE RELIEF FUND Z344
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Housing Opportunity Program Z336
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,387,354 $2,387,354
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,387,354 $2,387,354
HOUSING OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM Z336
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 112 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,387,354 $2,387,354
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,387,354 $2,387,354
International Commerce 0674
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $389,116 $406,026
All Other $924,709 $924,709
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,313,825 $1,330,735
INTERNATIONAL COMMERCE 0674
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $389,116 $406,026
All Other $924,709 $924,709
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,313,825 $1,330,735
Leadership and Entrepreneurial Development Program Z071
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
LEADERSHIP AND ENTREPRENEURIAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM Z071
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Coworking Development Fund Z195
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
Page 113 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE COWORKING DEVELOPMENT FUND Z195
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Economic Development Evaluation Fund Z057
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
MAINE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT EVALUATION FUND Z057
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
Maine Economic Growth Council 0727
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,395 $90,395
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $90,395 $90,395
MAINE ECONOMIC GROWTH COUNCIL 0727
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,395 $90,395
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $90,395 $90,395
Maine Small Business and Entrepreneurship Commission 0675
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 114 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $683,684 $683,684
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $683,684 $683,684
MAINE SMALL BUSINESS AND ENTREPRENEURSHIP COMMISSION 0675
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $683,684 $683,684
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $683,684 $683,684
Maine State Film Office 0590
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $136,837 $144,763
All Other $170,605 $170,605
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $307,442 $315,368
MAINE STATE FILM OFFICE 0590
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $136,837 $144,763
All Other $170,605 $170,605
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $307,442 $315,368
Municipal Grant Fund Z323
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MUNICIPAL GRANT FUND Z323
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
Page 115 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Office of Broadband Development Z245
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $286,890 $310,605
All Other $1,068,000 $1,068,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,354,890 $1,378,605
OFFICE OF BROADBAND DEVELOPMENT Z245
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $286,890 $310,605
All Other $1,068,000 $1,068,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,354,890 $1,378,605
Office of Innovation 0995
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $335,776 $349,784
All Other $6,794,260 $6,794,260
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,130,036 $7,144,044
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500 $1,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500 $1,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
OFFICE OF INNOVATION 0995
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Page 116 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $335,776 $349,784
All Other $6,794,260 $6,794,260
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,130,036 $7,144,044
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500 $1,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500 $1,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,239,045 $1,306,224
All Other $23,053,025 $23,053,025
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $24,292,070 $24,359,249
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $82,701 $0
All Other $2,004,375 $2,004,375
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,087,076 $2,004,375
OFFICE OF TOURISM 0577
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,239,045 $1,306,224
All Other $23,053,025 $23,053,025
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $24,292,070 $24,359,249
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $82,701 $0
All Other $2,004,375 $2,004,375
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,087,076 $2,004,375
Renewable Energy Resources Fund Z072
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 117 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $88,000 $88,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $88,000 $88,000
RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES FUND Z072
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $88,000 $88,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $88,000 $88,000
Rural Workforce Recruitment and Retention Grant Fund Z322
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
RURAL WORKFORCE RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION GRANT FUND
Z322
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Social Equity Program Z409
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
SOCIAL EQUITY PROGRAM Z409
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $150,000 $150,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $150,000 $150,000
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $16,247,086 $16,399,665
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $1,773,932 $1,773,932
Page 118 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $27,041,413 $27,140,233
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $21,701,267 $21,718,950
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $151,602 $151,602
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $2,087,076 $2,004,375
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $69,002,376 $69,188,757
Sec. A-21. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Adult Education 0364
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $498,385 $521,817
All Other $8,075,898 $8,075,898
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,574,283 $8,597,715
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $230,193 $243,503
All Other $1,873,181 $1,873,181
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,103,374 $2,116,684
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
ADULT EDUCATION 0364
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $498,385 $521,817
All Other $8,075,898 $8,075,898
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,574,283 $8,597,715
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 119 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $230,193 $243,503
All Other $1,873,181 $1,873,181
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,103,374 $2,116,684
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Charter School Program Z129
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
CHARTER SCHOOL PROGRAM Z129
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Child Development Services 0449
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $51,622,725 $51,622,725
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $51,622,725 $51,622,725
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,433,483 $2,433,483
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,433,483 $2,433,483
Child Development Services 0449
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in staff costs attributed to collective bargaining.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,378,865 $1,436,808
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,378,865 $1,436,808
Page 120 - 132LR1775(23)

CHILD DEVELOPMENT SERVICES 0449
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,001,590 $53,059,533
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,001,590 $53,059,533
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,433,483 $2,433,483
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,433,483 $2,433,483
Climate Education Professional Development Pilot Program Fund Z361
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,998 $8,998
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,998 $8,998
CLIMATE EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT PILOT
PROGRAM FUND Z361
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,998 $8,998
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,998 $8,998
Community Schools Program Z284
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 121 - 132LR1775(23)

COMMUNITY SCHOOLS PROGRAM Z284
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Criminal History Record Check Fund Z014
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,754 $9,114
All Other $25,700 $25,700
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,454 $34,814
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK FUND Z014
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,754 $9,114
All Other $25,700 $25,700
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,454 $34,814
Digital Literacy Fund Z130
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $456,115 $456,115
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $456,115 $456,115
DIGITAL LITERACY FUND Z130
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $456,115 $456,115
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $456,115 $456,115
Early Childhood Infrastructure Z315
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $21,404 $21,404
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $21,404 $21,404
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 122 - 132LR1775(23)

EARLY CHILDHOOD INFRASTRUCTURE Z315
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $21,404 $21,404
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $21,404 $21,404
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Early Childhood Special Education Pathways Pilot Project Z410
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,425 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,425 $0
EARLY CHILDHOOD SPECIAL EDUCATION PATHWAYS PILOT PROJECT
Z410
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,425 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,425 $0
Education in Unorganized Territory 0220
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.500 23.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 26.540 26.540
Personal Services $4,377,187 $4,584,671
All Other $11,912,381 $11,912,381
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,289,568 $16,497,052
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.707 0.707
Personal Services $155,115 $164,390
All Other $211,445 $211,445
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $366,560 $375,835
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,135 $8,135
__________ __________
Page 123 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,135 $8,135
EDUCATION IN UNORGANIZED TERRITORY 0220
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.500 23.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 26.540 26.540
Personal Services $4,377,187 $4,584,671
All Other $11,912,381 $11,912,381
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,289,568 $16,497,052
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.707 0.707
Personal Services $155,115 $164,390
All Other $211,445 $211,445
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $366,560 $375,835
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,135 $8,135
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,135 $8,135
ELA and Workforce Training Z312
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
ELA AND WORKFORCE TRAINING Z312
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 124 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FHM - School Breakfast Program Z068
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $213,720 $213,720
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $213,720 $213,720
FHM - SCHOOL BREAKFAST PROGRAM Z068
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $213,720 $213,720
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $213,720 $213,720
Fund for the Efficient Delivery of Educational Services Z005
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FUND FOR THE EFFICIENT DELIVERY OF EDUCATIONAL SERVICES Z005
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
Personal Services $3,142,788 $3,119,163
All Other $1,414,038,198 $1,414,038,198
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,417,180,986 $1,417,157,361
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,019,955 $25,019,955
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,019,955 $25,019,955
Page 125 - 132LR1775(23)

General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding to maintain the statutory requirement of funding the state share
of the total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 at 55%.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $63,893,687 $92,610,521
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $63,893,687 $92,610,521
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $572,450 $572,450
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $572,450 $572,450
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager II position from the Office of Workforce
Development and Innovative Pathways program to the General Purpose Aid for Local
Schools program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $172,611 $179,690
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $172,611 $179,690
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of one Deputy Commissioner
of Education position from range 38 to range 39.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,570 $2,645
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,570 $2,645
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Education Specialist III
position to a Public Service Coordinator I position, increases the hours of the position from
57 hours to 80 hours biweekly and transfers All Other to Personal Services to fund the
reorganization.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $49,512 $52,951
All Other ($49,512) ($52,951)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
GENERAL PURPOSE AID FOR LOCAL SCHOOLS 0308
Page 126 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $3,367,481 $3,354,449
All Other $1,478,454,823 $1,507,168,218
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,481,822,304 $1,510,522,667
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,019,955 $25,019,955
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,019,955 $25,019,955
Higher Education and Educator Support Services Z082
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,537,890 $1,624,075
All Other $401,280 $401,280
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,939,170 $2,025,355
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,929 $35,929
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $35,929 $35,929
HIGHER EDUCATION AND EDUCATOR SUPPORT SERVICES Z082
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,537,890 $1,624,075
All Other $401,280 $401,280
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,939,170 $2,025,355
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,929 $35,929
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $35,929 $35,929
Higher Education Interpersonal Violence Advisory Commission Fund Z351
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 127 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $36,000 $76,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,000 $76,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HIGHER EDUCATION INTERPERSONAL VIOLENCE ADVISORY
COMMISSION FUND Z351
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $36,000 $76,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,000 $76,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Innovative Instruction and Tutoring Grant Program Fund Z345
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
INNOVATIVE INSTRUCTION AND TUTORING GRANT PROGRAM FUND
Z345
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
Page 128 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,843,042 $1,930,562
All Other $180,440 $180,440
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,023,482 $2,111,002
INNOVATIVE TEACHING AND LEARNING Z394
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,843,042 $1,930,562
All Other $180,440 $180,440
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,023,482 $2,111,002
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.500 25.500
Personal Services $3,656,950 $3,842,408
All Other $808,079 $808,079
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,465,029 $4,650,487
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $173,138 $184,636
All Other $2,233,712 $2,233,712
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,406,850 $2,418,348
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $36,979 $283,375
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,979 $283,375
Leadership Team Z077
Page 129 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,906 $20,906
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,906 $20,906
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of one Deputy Commissioner
of Education position from range 38 to range 39.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,570 $2,643
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,570 $2,643
Leadership Team Z077
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Coordinator I position from range 25 to range 27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,299 $9,030
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,299 $9,030
LEADERSHIP TEAM Z077
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 25.500 25.500
Personal Services $3,667,819 $3,854,081
All Other $865,964 $1,112,360
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,533,783 $4,966,441
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $173,138 $184,636
All Other $2,233,712 $2,233,712
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,406,850 $2,418,348
Learning Systems Team Z081
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $144,747 $153,755
Page 130 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $2,774,086 $2,774,086
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,918,833 $2,927,841
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $2,192,905 $1,983,743
All Other $109,081,034 $109,081,034
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $111,273,939 $111,064,777
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $83,629 $83,629
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $83,629 $83,629
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $55,960 $55,960
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $55,960 $55,960
LEARNING SYSTEMS TEAM Z081
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $144,747 $153,755
All Other $2,774,086 $2,774,086
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,918,833 $2,927,841
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $2,192,905 $1,983,743
All Other $109,081,034 $109,081,034
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $111,273,939 $111,064,777
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $83,629 $83,629
__________ __________
Page 131 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $83,629 $83,629
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $55,960 $55,960
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $55,960 $55,960
Learning Through Technology Z029
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,141,815 $12,141,815
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,141,815 $12,141,815
LEARNING THROUGH TECHNOLOGY Z029
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,141,815 $12,141,815
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,141,815 $12,141,815
Local Foods Program Z297
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $111,233 $119,645
All Other $326,000 $326,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $437,233 $445,645
LOCAL FOODS PROGRAM Z297
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $111,233 $119,645
All Other $326,000 $326,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $437,233 $445,645
Maine Climate Corps Prog - ME Commission for Comm Svc Z350
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $81,310 $81,310
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $81,310 $81,310
Page 132 - 132LR1775(23)

MAINE CLIMATE CORPS PROG - ME COMMISSION FOR COMM SVC Z350
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $81,310 $81,310
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $81,310 $81,310
Maine Commission for Community Service Z134
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $42,239 $45,535
All Other $53,276 $53,276
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,515 $98,811
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $598,691 $634,069
All Other $2,269,136 $2,269,136
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,867,827 $2,903,205
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,506 $24,281
All Other $194,282 $194,282
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $216,788 $218,563
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,864 $2,864
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,864 $2,864
MAINE COMMISSION FOR COMMUNITY SERVICE Z134
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $42,239 $45,535
All Other $53,276 $53,276
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $95,515 $98,811
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Page 133 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $598,691 $634,069
All Other $2,269,136 $2,269,136
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,867,827 $2,903,205
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,506 $24,281
All Other $194,282 $194,282
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $216,788 $218,563
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,864 $2,864
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,864 $2,864
Maine HIV Prevention Education Program Z182
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $134,400 $134,400
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $134,400 $134,400
MAINE HIV PREVENTION EDUCATION PROGRAM Z182
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $134,400 $134,400
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $134,400 $134,400
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $757,166 $792,295
All Other $740,895 $740,895
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,498,061 $1,533,190
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $161,385 $168,015
All Other $151,496 $151,496
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $312,881 $319,511
Page 134 - 132LR1775(23)

Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,085 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,085 $0
Maine School Safety Center Z293
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one State Education
Representative position to a Public Service Coordinator II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,686 $20,742
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,686 $20,742
MAINE SCHOOL SAFETY CENTER Z293
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $782,937 $813,037
All Other $740,895 $740,895
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,523,832 $1,553,932
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $161,385 $168,015
All Other $151,496 $151,496
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $312,881 $319,511
Maine Service Fellows Program Z311
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE SERVICE FELLOWS PROGRAM Z311
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 135 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
National Board Certification Salary Supplement Fund Z147
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $953,800 $953,800
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $953,800 $953,800
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION SALARY SUPPLEMENT FUND Z147
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $953,800 $953,800
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $953,800 $953,800
National Board Certification Scholarship Fund Z148
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION SCHOLARSHIP FUND Z148
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Obesity and Chronic Disease Fund Z111
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OBESITY AND CHRONIC DISEASE FUND Z111
Page 136 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Office of Innovation Z333
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $463,546 $244,772
All Other $47,219 $47,219
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $510,765 $291,991
OFFICE OF INNOVATION Z333
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $463,546 $244,772
All Other $47,219 $47,219
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $510,765 $291,991
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $733,644 $763,458
All Other $3,082,237 $3,082,237
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,815,881 $3,845,695
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $530,092 $553,326
All Other $6,739,502 $6,739,502
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,269,594 $7,292,828
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,554,640 $1,554,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,554,640 $1,554,640
Office of Workforce Development and Innovative Pathways Z334
Page 137 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Transfers one Public Service Manager II position from the Office of Workforce
Development and Innovative Pathways program to the General Purpose Aid for Local
Schools program within the same fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($172,611) ($179,690)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($172,611) ($179,690)
OFFICE OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND INNOVATIVE PATHWAYS
Z334
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $561,033 $583,768
All Other $3,082,237 $3,082,237
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,643,270 $3,666,005
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $530,092 $553,326
All Other $6,739,502 $6,739,502
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,269,594 $7,292,828
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,554,640 $1,554,640
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,554,640 $1,554,640
Preschool Special Education Z399
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,000,000 $9,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,000,000 $9,000,000
PRESCHOOL SPECIAL EDUCATION Z399
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,000,000 $9,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,000,000 $9,000,000
Retired Teachers Group Life Insurance Z033
Page 138 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,992,883 $4,992,883
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,992,883 $4,992,883
Retired Teachers Group Life Insurance Z033
Initiative: Provides funding for group life insurance for retired teachers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $56,067 $194,913
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $56,067 $194,913
RETIRED TEACHERS GROUP LIFE INSURANCE Z033
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,048,950 $5,187,796
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,048,950 $5,187,796
Retired Teachers' Health Insurance 0854
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,268,715 $48,268,715
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $48,268,715 $48,268,715
RETIRED TEACHERS' HEALTH INSURANCE 0854
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,268,715 $48,268,715
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $48,268,715 $48,268,715
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $2,056,111 $2,150,038
All Other $1,642,430 $1,642,430
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,698,541 $3,792,468
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.500 1.500
Page 139 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.577 0.577
Personal Services $215,898 $228,019
All Other $3,213,070 $3,213,070
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,428,968 $3,441,089
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $122,500 $129,327
All Other $316,933 $316,933
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $439,433 $446,260
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $195,327 $203,393
All Other $16,564 $16,564
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $211,891 $219,957
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,440 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,440 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,475 $0
All Other $91 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,566 $0
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Education Specialist
III position to a State Education Representative position and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,960 $6,202
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,960 $6,202
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,556 $2,658
Page 140 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $61 $63
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,617 $2,721
SCHOOL AND STUDENT SUPPORTS Z270
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $2,072,511 $2,156,240
All Other $1,642,430 $1,642,430
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,714,941 $3,798,670
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.500 1.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.577 0.577
Personal Services $215,898 $228,019
All Other $3,213,070 $3,213,070
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,428,968 $3,441,089
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $129,531 $131,985
All Other $317,085 $316,996
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $446,616 $448,981
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $195,327 $203,393
All Other $16,564 $16,564
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $211,891 $219,957
School Facilities Z271
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $742,923 $776,276
All Other $391,619 $391,619
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,134,542 $1,167,895
SCHOOL FACILITIES Z271
Page 141 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $742,923 $776,276
All Other $391,619 $391,619
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,134,542 $1,167,895
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $750,512 $791,824
All Other $59,050,664 $59,050,664
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $59,801,176 $59,842,488
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,540,198 $1,620,386
All Other $84,327,755 $84,327,755
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $85,867,953 $85,948,141
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,545 $15,545
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,545 $15,545
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $698,955 $698,955
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $698,955 $698,955
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $341,744 $341,744
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $341,744 $341,744
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
Page 142 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,357 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,357 $0
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Specialist I
position to a Secretary Specialist position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,542 $7,830
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,542 $7,830
SCHOOL FINANCE AND OPERATIONS Z078
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $766,411 $799,654
All Other $59,392,408 $59,392,408
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $60,158,819 $60,192,062
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,540,198 $1,620,386
All Other $84,327,755 $84,327,755
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $85,867,953 $85,948,141
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,545 $15,545
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,545 $15,545
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $698,955 $698,955
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $698,955 $698,955
School Meal Equipment and Program Improvement Fund Z386
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 143 - 132LR1775(23)

SCHOOL MEAL EQUIPMENT AND PROGRAM IMPROVEMENT FUND Z386
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics Council Z175
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING AND MATHEMATICS COUNCIL
Z175
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Special Services Team Z080
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $142,354 $148,238
All Other $3,044,443 $3,044,443
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,186,797 $3,192,681
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 26.500 26.500
Personal Services $3,586,111 $3,752,973
All Other $62,934,285 $62,934,285
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $66,520,396 $66,687,258
SPECIAL SERVICES TEAM Z080
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $142,354 $148,238
All Other $3,044,443 $3,044,443
__________ __________
Page 144 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,186,797 $3,192,681
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 26.500 26.500
Personal Services $3,586,111 $3,752,973
All Other $62,934,285 $62,934,285
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $66,520,396 $66,687,258
State Mandate Reimbursement - Collective Bargaining Z355
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,200 $52,200
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,200 $52,200
STATE MANDATE REIMBURSEMENT - COLLECTIVE BARGAINING Z355
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,200 $52,200
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,200 $52,200
Teacher Retirement 0170
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $220,827,975 $220,827,975
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $220,827,975 $220,827,975
Teacher Retirement 0170
Initiative: Provides funding for teacher retirement costs based upon actuarial estimates
from the Maine Public Employees Retirement System.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,412,047 $17,798,648
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,412,047 $17,798,648
TEACHER RETIREMENT 0170
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $232,240,022 $238,626,623
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $232,240,022 $238,626,623
Page 145 - 132LR1775(23)

EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,939,239,207 $1,975,374,447
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $282,448,975 $282,586,811
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $213,720 $213,720
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $44,512,182 $44,561,533
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $211,891 $219,957
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $105,533 $105,533
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $757,779 $757,779
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,267,489,287 $2,303,819,780
Sec. A-22. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, STATE BOARD OF
State Board of Education 0614
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $114,410 $121,670
All Other $81,844 $81,844
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $196,254 $203,514
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION 0614
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $114,410 $121,670
All Other $81,844 $81,844
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $196,254 $203,514
Sec. A-23. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EFFICIENCY MAINE TRUST
Efficiency Maine Trust Z100
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $166,016 $173,247
All Other $15,747 $15,747
__________ __________
Page 146 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $181,763 $188,994
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $17,000,000 $17,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $17,000,000 $17,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
EFFICIENCY MAINE TRUST Z100
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $166,016 $173,247
All Other $15,747 $15,747
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $181,763 $188,994
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $17,000,000 $17,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $17,000,000 $17,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Sec. A-24. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $1,003,685 $1,057,523
All Other $1,230,902 $1,230,902
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,234,587 $2,288,425
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,983,228 $3,154,543
All Other $3,840,178 $3,840,178
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,823,406 $6,994,721
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Page 147 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $501,472 $501,472
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $501,472 $501,472
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $466,320 $466,320
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $466,320 $466,320
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48,653 $88,074
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $48,653 $88,074
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,155 $19,155
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,155 $19,155
Administration - Environmental Protection 0251
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Associate II Supervisor position and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,864 $4,016
All Other $133 $138
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,997 $4,154
ADMINISTRATION - ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 0251
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $1,003,685 $1,057,523
Page 148 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $1,800,182 $1,839,603
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,803,867 $2,897,126
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,987,092 $3,158,559
All Other $4,306,631 $4,306,636
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,293,723 $7,465,195
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,987,375 $2,096,276
All Other $91,711 $91,711
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,079,086 $2,187,987
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $301,673 $321,749
All Other $685,774 $685,774
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $987,447 $1,007,523
Air Quality 0250
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $202 $470
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $202 $470
AIR QUALITY 0250
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,987,375 $2,096,276
All Other $91,913 $92,181
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,079,288 $2,188,457
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 149 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $301,673 $321,749
All Other $685,774 $685,774
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $987,447 $1,007,523
Board of Environmental Protection Fund 0025
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $319,764 $335,351
All Other $100,587 $100,587
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $420,351 $435,938
BOARD OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FUND 0025
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $319,764 $335,351
All Other $100,587 $100,587
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $420,351 $435,938
Eelgrass and Salt Marsh Vegetation Mapping Fund Z324
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
EELGRASS AND SALT MARSH VEGETATION MAPPING FUND Z324
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Lake Water Quality Restoration and Protection Fund Z385
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
LAKE WATER QUALITY RESTORATION AND PROTECTION FUND Z385
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 150 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Fund Z325
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
LAND APPLICATION CONTAMINANT MONITORING FUND Z325
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Land Resources Z188
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,782,103 $2,939,991
All Other $118,799 $118,799
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,900,902 $3,058,790
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $354,519 $378,692
All Other $18,756 $18,756
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $373,275 $397,448
Land Resources Z188
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,360 $16,134
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,360 $16,134
LAND RESOURCES Z188
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 151 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,782,103 $2,939,991
All Other $130,159 $134,933
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,912,262 $3,074,924
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $354,519 $378,692
All Other $18,756 $18,756
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $373,275 $397,448
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 31.000 31.000
Personal Services $3,201,108 $3,417,846
All Other $54,144 $54,144
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,255,252 $3,471,990
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 61.000 61.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.654 0.654
Personal Services $6,823,023 $7,220,835
All Other $9,556,068 $9,556,068
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,379,091 $16,776,903
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,003,500 $1,003,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,003,500 $1,003,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $211 $489
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $211 $489
Page 152 - 132LR1775(23)

Maine Environmental Protection Fund 0421
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Environmental
Specialist III position to an Environmental Specialist IV position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,283 $16,775
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,283 $16,775
MAINE ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FUND 0421
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 31.000 31.000
Personal Services $3,216,391 $3,434,621
All Other $54,355 $54,633
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,270,746 $3,489,254
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 61.000 61.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.654 0.654
Personal Services $6,823,023 $7,220,835
All Other $9,556,068 $9,556,068
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,379,091 $16,776,903
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,003,500 $1,003,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,003,500 $1,003,500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Performance Partnership Grant 0851
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 52.000 52.000
Personal Services $5,951,075 $6,309,702
All Other $3,490,808 $3,490,808
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,441,883 $9,800,510
PERFORMANCE PARTNERSHIP GRANT 0851
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 52.000 52.000
Page 153 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $5,951,075 $6,309,702
All Other $3,490,808 $3,490,808
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,441,883 $9,800,510
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,514,038 $1,603,153
All Other $199,175 $199,175
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,713,213 $1,802,328
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.000 23.000
Personal Services $2,618,984 $2,762,256
All Other $2,377,306 $2,377,306
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,996,290 $5,139,562
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 93.000 93.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.308 0.308
Personal Services $10,719,646 $11,318,321
All Other $18,006,939 $18,006,939
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $28,726,585 $29,325,260
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000,000 $1,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,951 $2,951
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,951 $2,951
Page 154 - 132LR1775(23)

Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,105 $8,162
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,105 $8,162
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,277 $0
All Other $77 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,354 $0
REMEDIATION AND WASTE MANAGEMENT 0247
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,514,038 $1,603,153
All Other $209,231 $210,288
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,723,269 $1,813,441
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 23.000 23.000
Personal Services $2,618,984 $2,762,256
All Other $2,377,306 $2,377,306
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,996,290 $5,139,562
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 93.000 93.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.308 0.308
Personal Services $10,721,923 $11,318,321
All Other $18,007,016 $18,006,939
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $28,728,939 $29,325,260
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
Page 155 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,000,000 $1,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 30.000 30.000
Personal Services $3,545,849 $3,749,898
All Other $4,496,410 $4,496,410
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,042,259 $8,246,308
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,997 $132,130
All Other $1,502,091 $1,502,091
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,629,088 $1,634,221
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $2,016,136 $2,123,947
All Other $2,173,285 $2,173,285
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,189,421 $4,297,232
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,128 $2,128
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,128 $2,128
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,909 $6,972
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,909 $6,972
Water Quality 0248
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
Page 156 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,775 $0
All Other $162 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,937 $0
WATER QUALITY 0248
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 30.000 30.000
Personal Services $3,545,849 $3,749,898
All Other $4,501,447 $4,505,510
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,047,296 $8,255,408
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $126,997 $132,130
All Other $1,502,091 $1,502,091
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,629,088 $1,634,221
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $2,020,911 $2,123,947
All Other $2,173,447 $2,173,285
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,194,358 $4,297,232
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $20,836,728 $21,718,610
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $17,427,983 $17,979,264
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $57,017,962 $58,302,028
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $2,003,500 $2,003,500
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $97,286,173 $100,003,402
Sec. A-25. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES, COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENTAL
Governmental Ethics and Election Practices - Commission on 0414
Page 157 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $432,537 $456,974
All Other $178,013 $178,013
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $610,550 $634,987
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $459,578 $483,638
All Other $3,006,480 $3,006,480
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,466,058 $3,490,118
Governmental Ethics and Election Practices - Commission on 0414
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,392 $4,392
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,392 $4,392
Governmental Ethics and Election Practices - Commission on 0414
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,019 $18,870
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,019 $18,870
GOVERNMENTAL ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES - COMMISSION
ON 0414
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $432,537 $456,974
All Other $178,013 $178,013
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $610,550 $634,987
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $459,578 $483,638
Page 158 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $3,023,891 $3,029,742
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,483,469 $3,513,380
ETHICS AND ELECTION PRACTICES,
COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENTAL
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $610,550 $634,987
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $3,483,469 $3,513,380
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $4,094,019 $4,148,367
Sec. A-26. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
Administration - Executive - Governor's Office 0165
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.500 24.500
Personal Services $4,226,935 $4,474,573
All Other $494,770 $499,770
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,721,705 $4,974,343
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $115,014 $115,014
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $115,014 $115,014
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Administration - Executive - Governor's Office 0165
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,350 $6,128
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,350 $6,128
Administration - Executive - Governor's Office 0165
Page 159 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,119 $25,119
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,119 $25,119
ADMINISTRATION - EXECUTIVE - GOVERNOR'S OFFICE 0165
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.500 24.500
Personal Services $4,226,935 $4,474,573
All Other $523,239 $531,017
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,750,174 $5,005,590
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $115,014 $115,014
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $115,014 $115,014
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Blaine House 0072
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.540 0.540
Personal Services $933,762 $978,792
All Other $72,055 $72,055
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,005,817 $1,050,847
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,240 $5,240
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,240 $5,240
Blaine House 0072
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
Page 160 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,871 $2,871
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,871 $2,871
Blaine House 0072
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,087 $8,681
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,087 $8,681
BLAINE HOUSE 0072
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.540 0.540
Personal Services $933,762 $978,792
All Other $82,013 $83,607
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,015,775 $1,062,399
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,240 $5,240
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,240 $5,240
Distributed Solar and Energy Storage Program Z388
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
DISTRIBUTED SOLAR AND ENERGY STORAGE PROGRAM Z388
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
GOPIF - Community Resilience Partnership Z376
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 161 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $155,944 $167,760
All Other $3,003,660 $3,003,660
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,159,604 $3,171,420
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,500 $5,000,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000,500 $5,000,500
GOPIF - COMMUNITY RESILIENCE PARTNERSHIP Z376
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $155,944 $167,760
All Other $3,003,660 $3,003,660
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,159,604 $3,171,420
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,500 $5,000,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,000,500 $5,000,500
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $801,731 $854,282
All Other $1,659,418 $1,659,418
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,461,149 $2,513,700
Page 162 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,440,429 $1,521,531
All Other $3,240,473 $3,240,473
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,680,902 $4,762,004
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $20,356 $21,185
All Other $350,607 $350,607
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $370,963 $371,792
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $163,745 $163,745
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $163,745 $163,745
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,519 $27,519
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $27,519 $27,519
Governor's Energy Office Z122
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,698 $24,389
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,698 $24,389
GOVERNOR'S ENERGY OFFICE Z122
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $801,731 $854,282
All Other $1,659,418 $1,659,418
__________ __________
Page 163 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,461,149 $2,513,700
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $1,440,429 $1,521,531
All Other $3,240,473 $3,240,473
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,680,902 $4,762,004
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $20,356 $21,185
All Other $397,824 $402,515
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $418,180 $423,700
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $163,745 $163,745
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $163,745 $163,745
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Maine Offshore Wind Renewable Energy and Economic Development Program
Z389
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE OFFSHORE WIND RENEWABLE ENERGY AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM Z389
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Office of New Americans Z398
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $289,347 $301,370
All Other $24,546 $24,546
Page 164 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $313,893 $325,916
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OFFICE OF NEW AMERICANS Z398
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $289,347 $301,370
All Other $24,546 $24,546
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $313,893 $325,916
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $2,076,624 $2,189,274
All Other $410,930 $410,930
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,487,554 $2,600,204
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $287,744 $287,744
Page 165 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $287,744 $287,744
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $140,255 $151,465
All Other $261,008 $261,008
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $401,263 $412,473
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $388,801 $388,801
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $388,801 $388,801
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $56,063 $56,063
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $56,063 $56,063
Office of Policy Innovation and the Future Z135
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,917 $12,568
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,917 $12,568
OFFICE OF POLICY INNOVATION AND THE FUTURE Z135
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $2,076,624 $2,189,274
All Other $475,910 $479,561
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,552,534 $2,668,835
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $287,744 $287,744
Page 166 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $287,744 $287,744
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $140,255 $151,465
All Other $261,008 $261,008
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $401,263 $412,473
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $388,801 $388,801
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $388,801 $388,801
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Offshore Wind Research Consortium Fund Z314
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OFFSHORE WIND RESEARCH CONSORTIUM FUND Z314
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Ombudsman Program 0103
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $341,539 $341,539
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $341,539 $341,539
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $57,150 $57,150
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $57,150 $57,150
OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM 0103
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 167 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $341,539 $341,539
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $341,539 $341,539
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $57,150 $57,150
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $57,150 $57,150
Public Advocate 0410
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,923,205 $2,026,514
All Other $2,180,729 $2,180,729
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,103,934 $4,207,243
Public Advocate 0410
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,908 $16,015
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,908 $16,015
Public Advocate 0410
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's proportionate share of the cost for the
financial and human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,887 $13,055
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,887 $13,055
PUBLIC ADVOCATE 0410
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,923,205 $2,026,514
All Other $2,207,524 $2,209,799
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,130,729 $4,236,313
Page 168 - 132LR1775(23)

EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $14,594,668 $15,089,399
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $5,141,810 $5,222,912
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $9,958,412 $10,080,726
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $552,546 $552,546
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $30,247,436 $30,945,583
Sec. A-27. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Dairy Improvement Fund Z143
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $465,182 $465,182
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $465,182 $465,182
DAIRY IMPROVEMENT FUND Z143
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $465,182 $465,182
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $465,182 $465,182
Educational Opportunity Tax Credit Marketing Fund Z174
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY TAX CREDIT MARKETING FUND Z174
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
FHM - Dental Education 0951
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $237,740 $237,740
Page 169 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $237,740 $237,740
FHM - DENTAL EDUCATION 0951
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $237,740 $237,740
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $237,740 $237,740
FHM - Health Education Centers 0950
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $110,000 $110,000
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $110,000 $110,000
FHM - HEALTH EDUCATION CENTERS 0950
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $110,000 $110,000
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $110,000 $110,000
Foreign Credentialing and Skills Recognition Revolving Loan Program Fund Z286
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
FOREIGN CREDENTIALING AND SKILLS RECOGNITION REVOLVING
LOAN PROGRAM FUND Z286
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $75,000 $75,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $75,000 $75,000
Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Program Fund Z330
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
Page 170 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM FUND
Z330
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Small Enterprise Growth Fund Z235
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
SMALL ENTERPRISE GROWTH FUND Z235
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Student Financial Assistance Programs 0653
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,890,394 $27,890,394
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,890,394 $27,890,394
STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS 0653
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,890,394 $27,890,394
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,890,394 $27,890,394
Page 171 - 132LR1775(23)

FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $28,540,394 $28,540,394
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $500 $500
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $347,740 $347,740
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $465,682 $465,682
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $29,354,316 $29,354,316
Sec. A-28. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES COMMISSION, MAINE
Firefighter Safety Equipment Fund Z387
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FIREFIGHTER SAFETY EQUIPMENT FUND Z387
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Fire Protection Services Commission 0936
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000 $2,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000 $2,000
MAINE FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES COMMISSION 0936
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000 $2,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000 $2,000
FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES COMMISSION,
MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 172 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND $2,000 $2,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $500 $500
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,500 $2,500
Sec. A-29. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH DATA ORGANIZATION, MAINE
Maine Health Data Organization 0848
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $688,128 $743,343
All Other $1,462,940 $1,462,940
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,151,068 $2,206,283
Maine Health Data Organization 0848
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,930 $1,930
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,930 $1,930
Maine Health Data Organization 0848
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,122 $1,870
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,122 $1,870
MAINE HEALTH DATA ORGANIZATION 0848
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $688,128 $743,343
All Other $1,465,992 $1,466,740
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,154,120 $2,210,083
HEALTH DATA ORGANIZATION, MAINE
Page 173 - 132LR1775(23)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,154,120 $2,210,083
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,154,120 $2,210,083
Sec. A-30. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Additional Support for People in Retraining and Employment 0146
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,090,651 $7,090,651
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,090,651 $7,090,651
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 26.000 26.000
Personal Services $2,834,249 $2,884,709
All Other $33,014,435 $33,014,435
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $35,848,684 $35,899,144
ADDITIONAL SUPPORT FOR PEOPLE IN RETRAINING AND
EMPLOYMENT 0146
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,090,651 $7,090,651
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,090,651 $7,090,651
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 26.000 26.000
Personal Services $2,834,249 $2,884,709
All Other $33,014,435 $33,014,435
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $35,848,684 $35,899,144
Aids Lodging House 0518
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,496 $37,496
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,496 $37,496
Page 174 - 132LR1775(23)

AIDS LODGING HOUSE 0518
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,496 $37,496
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,496 $37,496
Brain Injury Z213
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
BRAIN INJURY Z213
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
Breast Cancer Services Special Program Fund Z069
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $212,328 $212,328
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $212,328 $212,328
BREAST CANCER SERVICES SPECIAL PROGRAM FUND Z069
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $212,328 $212,328
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $212,328 $212,328
Bridging Rental Assistance Program Z205
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,989,836 $6,989,836
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,989,836 $6,989,836
BRIDGING RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM Z205
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,989,836 $6,989,836
Page 175 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,989,836 $6,989,836
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $588,964 $606,481
All Other $43,967,696 $43,967,696
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,556,660 $44,574,177
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $431,090 $0
All Other $5,680,008 $5,680,008
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,111,098 $5,680,008
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.500 41.500
Personal Services $4,217,891 $4,339,606
All Other $40,283,260 $40,283,260
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $44,501,151 $44,622,866
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $107,942 $107,942
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $107,942 $107,942
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,920,284 $40,920,284
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $40,920,284 $40,920,284
CHILD CARE SERVICES 0563
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $588,964 $606,481
All Other $43,967,696 $43,967,696
__________ __________
Page 176 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,556,660 $44,574,177
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $431,090 $0
All Other $5,680,008 $5,680,008
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,111,098 $5,680,008
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.500 41.500
Personal Services $4,217,891 $4,339,606
All Other $40,283,260 $40,283,260
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $44,501,151 $44,622,866
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $107,942 $107,942
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $107,942 $107,942
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,920,284 $40,920,284
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $40,920,284 $40,920,284
Child Support 0100
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 126.500 126.500
Personal Services $4,388,329 $4,528,900
All Other $1,017,801 $1,017,801
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,406,130 $5,546,701
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $14,080,259 $14,540,883
All Other $5,597,054 $5,597,054
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,677,313 $20,137,937
Page 177 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $2,864,998 $2,961,825
All Other $108,359,359 $108,359,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,224,357 $111,321,184
CHILD SUPPORT 0100
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 126.500 126.500
Personal Services $4,388,329 $4,528,900
All Other $1,017,801 $1,017,801
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,406,130 $5,546,701
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $14,080,259 $14,540,883
All Other $5,597,054 $5,597,054
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,677,313 $20,137,937
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $2,864,998 $2,961,825
All Other $108,359,359 $108,359,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $111,224,357 $111,321,184
Community Services Block Grant 0716
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,434 $104,988
All Other $8,433,454 $8,433,454
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $8,536,888 $8,538,442
COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT 0716
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,434 $104,988
All Other $8,433,454 $8,433,454
Page 178 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $8,536,888 $8,538,442
Consent Decree Z204
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,615,080 $6,615,080
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,615,080 $6,615,080
CONSENT DECREE Z204
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,615,080 $6,615,080
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,615,080 $6,615,080
Crisis Outreach Program Z216
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.000 57.000
Personal Services $3,348,453 $3,419,882
All Other $171,509 $171,509
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,519,962 $3,591,391
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,042,629 $3,107,622
All Other $238,269 $238,269
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,280,898 $3,345,891
Crisis Outreach Program Z216
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,124 $18,124
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,124 $18,124
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,848 $16,848
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,848 $16,848
Crisis Outreach Program Z216
Page 179 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 Human Services
Casework Supervisor positions to 4 Social Services Manager I positions and one
Community Response Worker position to a Social Services Program Manager position
funded 52.4% General Fund and 47.6% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Crisis
Outreach Program and one Public Service Manager II from range 30 to range 32 serving
as the crisis team program administrator in the Developmental Services - Community
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $31,910 $33,347
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $31,910 $33,347
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,983 $30,294
All Other $673 $703
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $29,656 $30,997
CRISIS OUTREACH PROGRAM Z216
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.000 57.000
Personal Services $3,380,363 $3,453,229
All Other $189,633 $189,633
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,569,996 $3,642,862
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,071,612 $3,137,916
All Other $255,790 $255,820
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,327,402 $3,393,736
Data, Research and Vital Statistics Z037
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $643,752 $656,691
All Other $970,475 $970,475
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,614,227 $1,627,166
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Page 180 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $245,782 $249,682
All Other $441,735 $441,735
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $687,517 $691,417
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $880,782 $901,447
All Other $772,926 $772,926
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,653,708 $1,674,373
DATA, RESEARCH AND VITAL STATISTICS Z037
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $643,752 $656,691
All Other $970,475 $970,475
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,614,227 $1,627,166
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $245,782 $249,682
All Other $441,735 $441,735
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $687,517 $691,417
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $880,782 $901,447
All Other $772,926 $772,926
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,653,708 $1,674,373
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 155.000 155.000
Personal Services $11,959,792 $12,244,326
All Other $17,577,380 $17,577,380
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $29,537,172 $29,821,706
Page 181 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $152,100 $152,100
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $152,100 $152,100
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $8,250,434 $8,448,750
All Other $14,540,989 $14,540,989
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $22,791,423 $22,989,739
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $851,000 $851,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $851,000 $851,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $858,694 $1,096,327
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $858,694 $1,096,327
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $585,744 $747,842
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $585,744 $747,842
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $242,871 $255,481
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $242,871 $255,481
Department of Health and Human Services Central Operations 0142
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Specialist II
position to a Public Service Coordinator I position funded 60% General Fund and 40%
Other Special Revenue Funds in the Department of Health and Human Services Central
Page 182 - 132LR1775(23)

Operations program and one Public Service Manager II position from range 30 to range 31.
This initiative also transfers and reallocates the Public Service Manager II position from
100% General Fund in the Multicultural Services program to 60% General Fund and 40%
Other Special Revenue Funds in the Department of Health and Human Services Central
Operations program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $99,561 $100,156
All Other $4,354 $4,354
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $103,915 $104,510
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $66,373 $66,771
All Other $4,674 $4,718
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $71,047 $71,489
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES CENTRAL
OPERATIONS 0142
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 156.000 156.000
Personal Services $12,059,353 $12,344,482
All Other $18,683,299 $18,933,542
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $30,742,652 $31,278,024
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $152,100 $152,100
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $152,100 $152,100
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $8,316,807 $8,515,521
All Other $15,131,407 $15,293,549
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,448,214 $23,809,070
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $851,000 $851,000
__________ __________
Page 183 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $851,000 $851,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Personal Services $7,365,792 $7,531,212
All Other $8,776,864 $8,776,864
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,142,656 $16,308,076
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,747 $400,747
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $400,747 $400,747
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 Human Services
Casework Supervisor positions to 4 Social Services Manager I positions and one
Community Response Worker position to a Social Services Program Manager position
funded 52.4% General Fund and 47.6% Other Special Revenue Funds in the Crisis
Outreach Program and one Public Service Manager II from range 30 to range 32 serving
as the crisis team program administrator in the Developmental Services - Community
program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,577 $11,582
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,577 $11,582
Developmental Services - Community Z208
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Social Services Program
Specialist II positions to 3 Social Services Manager I positions in the Developmental
Services - Community program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $26,937 $25,234
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $26,937 $25,234
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES - COMMUNITY Z208
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Personal Services $7,404,306 $7,568,028
All Other $8,776,864 $8,776,864
__________ __________
Page 184 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,181,170 $16,344,892
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,747 $400,747
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $400,747 $400,747
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $201,839,573 $201,839,573
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $201,839,573 $201,839,573
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,693,181 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,693,181 $0
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,898,992 $4,913,798
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,898,992 $4,913,798
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding for agency home supports in the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 21, Allowances for Home and
Community Benefits for Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum
Disorder.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,795,066 $22,906,999
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,795,066 $22,906,999
Developmental Services Waiver - MaineCare Z211
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for
reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96 and 97, Appendix C.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $657,465 $671,100
Page 185 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $657,465 $671,100
DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES WAIVER - MAINECARE Z211
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $246,884,277 $230,331,470
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $246,884,277 $230,331,470
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,156,732 $52,156,732
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,156,732 $52,156,732
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $196,000 $196,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $196,000 $196,000
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,011,312 $1,274,531
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,011,312 $1,274,531
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $878,480 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $878,480 $0
Developmental Services Waiver - Supports Z212
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for
reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96 and 97, Appendix C.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $288,984 $294,945
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $288,984 $294,945
Page 186 - 132LR1775(23)

DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES WAIVER - SUPPORTS Z212
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $54,335,508 $53,726,208
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,335,508 $53,726,208
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $196,000 $196,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $196,000 $196,000
Disability Determination - Division of 0208
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.500 57.500
Personal Services $6,302,702 $6,520,994
All Other $5,270,313 $5,270,313
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $11,573,015 $11,791,307
DISABILITY DETERMINATION - DIVISION OF 0208
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.500 57.500
Personal Services $6,302,702 $6,520,994
All Other $5,270,313 $5,270,313
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $11,573,015 $11,791,307
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $11,210,149 $11,432,756
All Other $2,220,860 $2,220,860
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,431,009 $13,653,616
Disproportionate Share - Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z225
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $458,808 $525,182
Page 187 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $458,808 $525,182
DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE - DOROTHEA DIX PSYCHIATRIC CENTER
Z225
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $11,668,957 $11,957,938
All Other $2,220,860 $2,220,860
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,889,817 $14,178,798
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,770,272 $15,133,964
All Other $3,291,007 $3,291,007
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,061,279 $18,424,971
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,172 $1,315
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,172 $1,315
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $388,730 $475,897
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $388,730 $475,897
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $145,229 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $145,229 $0
Disproportionate Share - Riverview Psychiatric Center Z220
Page 188 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 4 Psychologist III positions
and one Psychologist IV position to Psychologist positions and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,552 $17,851
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $17,552 $17,851
DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE - RIVERVIEW PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z220
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,322,955 $15,629,027
All Other $3,291,007 $3,291,007
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,613,962 $18,920,034
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $3,433,999 $3,527,444
All Other $920,152 $920,152
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,354,151 $4,447,596
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,406,743 $1,406,743
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,406,743 $1,406,743
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 85.000 85.000
Personal Services $5,955,238 $6,117,789
All Other $3,605,552 $3,605,552
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,560,790 $9,723,341
DIVISION OF LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION Z036
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $3,433,999 $3,527,444
All Other $920,152 $920,152
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,354,151 $4,447,596
Page 189 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,406,743 $1,406,743
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,406,743 $1,406,743
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 85.000 85.000
Personal Services $5,955,238 $6,117,789
All Other $3,605,552 $3,605,552
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,560,790 $9,723,341
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $420,714 $432,502
All Other $2,850,793 $2,850,793
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,271,507 $3,283,295
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 252.000 252.000
Personal Services $19,082,266 $19,457,690
All Other $3,833,353 $3,833,353
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $22,915,619 $23,291,043
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center as a result
of the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($457,133) ($523,509)
All Other ($6,340) ($7,261)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($463,473) ($530,770)
Dorothea Dix Psychiatric Center Z222
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $716,807 $675,837
__________ __________
Page 190 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $716,807 $675,837
DOROTHEA DIX PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z222
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $420,714 $432,502
All Other $3,567,600 $3,526,630
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,988,314 $3,959,132
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 252.000 252.000
Personal Services $18,625,133 $18,934,181
All Other $3,827,013 $3,826,092
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $22,452,146 $22,760,273
Drinking Water Enforcement 0728
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,795,500 $4,795,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,795,500 $4,795,500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $703,443 $721,927
All Other $2,387,868 $2,387,868
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,091,311 $3,109,795
DRINKING WATER ENFORCEMENT 0728
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,795,500 $4,795,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,795,500 $4,795,500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $703,443 $721,927
All Other $2,387,868 $2,387,868
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,091,311 $3,109,795
Page 191 - 132LR1775(23)

Driver Education & Evaluation Program - Off Sub Abuse & MH S Z200
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $650,683 $677,352
All Other $1,028,931 $1,028,931
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,679,614 $1,706,283
Driver Education & Evaluation Program - Off Sub Abuse & MH S Z200
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $92,285 $92,285
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $92,285 $92,285
DRIVER EDUCATION & EVALUATION PROGRAM - OFF SUB ABUSE & MH
S Z200
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $650,683 $677,352
All Other $1,121,216 $1,121,216
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,771,899 $1,798,568
Early Childhood Consultation Program Z280
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $353,305 $360,835
All Other $1,750,480 $1,750,480
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,103,785 $2,111,315
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $134,881 $137,504
All Other $1,943,014 $1,943,014
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $2,077,895 $2,080,518
EARLY CHILDHOOD CONSULTATION PROGRAM Z280
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 192 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $353,305 $360,835
All Other $1,750,480 $1,750,480
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,103,785 $2,111,315
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $134,881 $137,504
All Other $1,943,014 $1,943,014
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $2,077,895 $2,080,518
Food Supplement Administration Z019
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,370,882 $8,370,882
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,370,882 $8,370,882
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,690,095 $19,690,095
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,690,095 $19,690,095
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $725,500 $725,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $725,500 $725,500
FOOD SUPPLEMENT ADMINISTRATION Z019
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,370,882 $8,370,882
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,370,882 $8,370,882
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,690,095 $19,690,095
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,690,095 $19,690,095
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $725,500 $725,500
Page 193 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $725,500 $725,500
Forensic Services Z203
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $947,419 $975,755
All Other $351,864 $351,864
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,299,283 $1,327,619
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,097 $13,097
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,097 $13,097
FORENSIC SERVICES Z203
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $947,419 $975,755
All Other $351,864 $351,864
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,299,283 $1,327,619
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,097 $13,097
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,097 $13,097
General Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns 0130
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,398,875 $10,398,875
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,398,875 $10,398,875
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $629,337 $641,482
All Other $2,058,346 $2,058,346
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,687,683 $2,699,828
Page 194 - 132LR1775(23)

General Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns 0130
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Family Independence
Program Manager position to a Public Service Coordinator II position in the General
Assistance - Reimbursement to Cities and Towns program, Other Special Revenue Funds
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,160 $19,499
All Other $331 $456
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $14,491 $19,955
GENERAL ASSISTANCE - REIMBURSEMENT TO CITIES AND TOWNS 0130
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,398,875 $10,398,875
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,398,875 $10,398,875
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $643,497 $660,981
All Other $2,058,677 $2,058,802
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,702,174 $2,719,783
Head Start 0545
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,794,458 $4,794,458
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,794,458 $4,794,458
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,637 $107,637
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $107,637 $107,637
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,354,580 $1,354,580
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,354,580 $1,354,580
HEAD START 0545
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 195 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,794,458 $4,794,458
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,794,458 $4,794,458
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,637 $107,637
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $107,637 $107,637
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,354,580 $1,354,580
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,354,580 $1,354,580
Homeless Youth Program 0923
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $930,742 $930,742
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $930,742 $930,742
HOMELESS YOUTH PROGRAM 0923
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $930,742 $930,742
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $930,742 $930,742
Housing First Program Z374
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $287,177 $300,346
All Other $13,074 $13,074
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,251 $313,420
HOUSING FIRST PROGRAM Z374
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $287,177 $300,346
All Other $13,074 $13,074
__________ __________
Page 196 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,251 $313,420
IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0137
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,999,999 $20,999,999
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,999,999 $20,999,999
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $42,493,283 $42,493,283
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $42,493,283 $42,493,283
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $476,737 $476,737
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $476,737 $476,737
IV-E Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0137
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $769,070 $715,160
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $769,070 $715,160
IV-E FOSTER CARE/ADOPTION ASSISTANCE 0137
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,769,069 $21,715,159
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,769,069 $21,715,159
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $42,493,283 $42,493,283
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $42,493,283 $42,493,283
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $476,737 $476,737
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $476,737 $476,737
Page 197 - 132LR1775(23)

Lifespan Waiver Z370
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $770,908 $770,908
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $770,908 $770,908
LIFESPAN WAIVER Z370
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $770,908 $770,908
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $770,908 $770,908
Long Term Care - Office of Aging and Disability Services 0420
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $381,038 $392,553
All Other $52,049,022 $52,049,022
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,430,060 $52,441,575
LONG TERM CARE - OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES 0420
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $381,038 $392,553
All Other $52,049,022 $52,049,022
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,430,060 $52,441,575
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,374,791 $5,374,791
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,374,791 $5,374,791
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,082,095 $6,082,095
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $6,082,095 $6,082,095
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Page 198 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $346,343 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $346,343 $0
Low-cost Drugs To Maine's Elderly 0202
Initiative: Provides funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $273,783 $291,226
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $273,783 $291,226
LOW-COST DRUGS TO MAINE'S ELDERLY 0202
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,994,917 $5,666,017
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,994,917 $5,666,017
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,082,095 $6,082,095
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $6,082,095 $6,082,095
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 107.000 107.000
Personal Services $14,059,136 $14,462,729
All Other $9,646,266 $9,646,266
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,705,402 $24,108,995
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 111.000 111.000
Personal Services $13,364,106 $13,711,430
All Other $104,073,657 $104,073,657
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $117,437,763 $117,785,087
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Page 199 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $1,722,036 $1,769,904
All Other $17,194,907 $17,194,907
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $18,916,943 $18,964,811
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 70.500 70.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $6,545,115 $6,704,376
All Other $9,928,136 $9,928,136
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,473,251 $16,632,512
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $280,158 $286,640
All Other $1,488,674 $1,488,674
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $1,768,832 $1,775,314
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $8,000,000 $8,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $8,000,000 $8,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $120,864 $126,911
All Other $14,019,992 $14,019,992
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $14,140,856 $14,146,903
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,350,000 $1,350,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $1,350,000 $1,350,000
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate I
position to an Accounting Associate II position and provides funding for related All Other
costs.
Page 200 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,376 $7,813
All Other $110 $115
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,486 $7,928
MAINE CENTER FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION 0143
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 107.000 107.000
Personal Services $14,059,136 $14,462,729
All Other $9,646,266 $9,646,266
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,705,402 $24,108,995
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 111.000 111.000
Personal Services $13,371,482 $13,719,243
All Other $104,073,767 $104,073,772
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $117,445,249 $117,793,015
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,722,036 $1,769,904
All Other $17,194,907 $17,194,907
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $18,916,943 $18,964,811
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 70.500 70.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $6,545,115 $6,704,376
All Other $9,928,136 $9,928,136
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,473,251 $16,632,512
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $280,158 $286,640
All Other $1,488,674 $1,488,674
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $1,768,832 $1,775,314
Page 201 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $8,000,000 $8,000,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $8,000,000 $8,000,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $120,864 $126,911
All Other $14,019,992 $14,019,992
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $14,140,856 $14,146,903
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,350,000 $1,350,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $1,350,000 $1,350,000
Maine Children's Cancer Research Fund Z279
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE CHILDREN'S CANCER RESEARCH FUND Z279
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Maine Health Insurance Marketplace Trust Fund Z292
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,405,049 $1,455,232
All Other $12,477,246 $12,477,246
__________ __________
Page 202 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,882,295 $13,932,478
MAINE HEALTH INSURANCE MARKETPLACE TRUST FUND Z292
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,405,049 $1,455,232
All Other $12,477,246 $12,477,246
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,882,295 $13,932,478
Maine Rx Plus Program 0927
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $135,786 $135,786
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $135,786 $135,786
MAINE RX PLUS PROGRAM 0927
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $135,786 $135,786
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $135,786 $135,786
Maine School Oral Health Fund Z025
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,405 $23,405
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,405 $23,405
MAINE SCHOOL ORAL HEALTH FUND Z025
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,405 $23,405
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,405 $23,405
Maine Water Well Drilling Program 0697
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 203 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $33,512 $34,081
All Other $44,389 $44,389
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $77,901 $78,470
MAINE WATER WELL DRILLING PROGRAM 0697
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $33,512 $34,081
All Other $44,389 $44,389
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $77,901 $78,470
Maternal and Child Health 0191
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,971,411 $8,971,411
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,971,411 $8,971,411
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $2,742,215 $2,812,342
All Other $1,487,039 $1,487,039
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $4,229,254 $4,299,381
MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH 0191
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,971,411 $8,971,411
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,971,411 $8,971,411
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $2,742,215 $2,812,342
All Other $1,487,039 $1,487,039
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $4,229,254 $4,299,381
Maternal and Child Health Block Grant Match Z008
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 204 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,074,508 $1,089,938
All Other $4,444,089 $4,444,089
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,518,597 $5,534,027
MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT MATCH Z008
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,074,508 $1,089,938
All Other $4,444,089 $4,444,089
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,518,597 $5,534,027
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,560,989 $35,560,989
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $35,560,989 $35,560,989
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $752,621 $948,508
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $752,621 $948,508
Medicaid Services - Developmental Services Z210
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for
reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96 and 97, Appendix C.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $169,275 $172,751
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $169,275 $172,751
MEDICAID SERVICES - DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES Z210
Page 205 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $36,482,885 $36,682,248
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,482,885 $36,682,248
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Medicaid Waiver for Brain Injury Residential /Community Serv Z218
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,592,666 $9,592,666
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,592,666 $9,592,666
Medicaid Waiver for Brain Injury Residential /Community Serv Z218
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $185,304 $233,534
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $185,304 $233,534
MEDICAID WAIVER FOR BRAIN INJURY RESIDENTIAL /COMMUNITY
SERV Z218
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,777,970 $9,826,200
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,777,970 $9,826,200
Medicaid Waiver for Other Related Conditions Z217
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,014,106 $4,014,106
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,014,106 $4,014,106
Medicaid Waiver for Other Related Conditions Z217
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 206 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $77,542 $97,724
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $77,542 $97,724
MEDICAID WAIVER FOR OTHER RELATED CONDITIONS Z217
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,091,648 $4,111,830
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,091,648 $4,111,830
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $727,254,408 $727,254,408
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $727,254,408 $727,254,408
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,691,450,165 $2,691,450,165
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,691,450,165 $2,691,450,165
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,400,154 $32,400,154
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $32,400,154 $32,400,154
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $239,237,620 $239,237,620
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $239,237,620 $239,237,620
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $39,443,775 $39,443,775
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $39,443,775 $39,443,775
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $96,729,843 $0
__________ __________
Page 207 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $96,729,843 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $361,802,773 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $361,802,773 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,207,432 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,207,432 $0
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,354,198 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $8,354,198 $0
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,528,680 $19,641,956
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,528,680 $19,641,956
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($24,333,365) ($30,666,706)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($24,333,365) ($30,666,706)
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $625,883 $788,784
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $625,883 $788,784
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($612) ($72,337)
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL ($612) ($72,337)
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Adjusts funding between the General Fund and Other Special Revenue Funds
within the MaineCare pharmacy program to reflect the drug rebates received annually.
Page 208 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($18,500,000) ($18,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($18,500,000) ($18,500,000)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,500,000 $18,500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $18,500,000 $18,500,000
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Annualizes changes in each year of the biennium from Public Law 2023, chapter
643, which changed the hospital tax year from fiscal year 2019-20 to 2021-22, updated the
tax rate applied to acute care hospitals from 2.23% to 3.25% and eliminated the hospital
tax for critical access hospitals, effective January 1, 2025.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($29,472,420) ($29,472,420)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($29,472,420) ($29,472,420)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,472,420 $29,472,420
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $29,472,420 $29,472,420
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for agency home supports in the department's rule Chapter 101:
MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 21, Allowances for Home and
Community Benefits for Members with Intellectual Disabilities or Autism Spectrum
Disorder.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $230,253 $231,384
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $230,253 $231,384
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,511,612 $37,398,548
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $37,511,612 $37,398,548
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding for the annual Medicare Part D rate increase.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,529,525 $9,072,938
__________ __________
Page 209 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,529,525 $9,072,938
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for
reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96 and 97, Appendix C.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,607,030 $2,659,659
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,607,030 $2,659,659
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,618,547 $6,544,243
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $6,618,547 $6,544,243
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $183,337 $181,940
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $183,337 $181,940
MEDICAL CARE - PAYMENTS TO PROVIDERS 0147
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $802,907,319 $710,887,925
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $802,907,319 $710,887,925
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,073,049,732 $2,704,726,250
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,073,049,732 $2,704,726,250
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,026,037 $33,188,938
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $33,026,037 $33,188,938
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $288,417,472 $287,210,040
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $288,417,472 $287,210,040
Page 210 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $47,980,698 $39,553,378
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $47,980,698 $39,553,378
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $42,954,707 $42,954,707
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $42,954,707 $42,954,707
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $829,768 $1,045,735
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $829,768 $1,045,735
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - CHILD MEDICAID Z207
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $43,784,475 $44,000,442
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $43,784,475 $44,000,442
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.000 41.000
Personal Services $2,905,792 $2,977,720
All Other $17,288,404 $17,288,404
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,194,196 $20,266,124
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,801,991 $1,801,991
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,801,991 $1,801,991
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $57,861 $59,861
All Other $6,755,463 $6,755,463
__________ __________
Page 211 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $6,813,324 $6,815,324
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,388,417 $2,388,417
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,388,417 $2,388,417
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $80,484 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $80,484 $0
Mental Health Services - Children Z206
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 2 Developmental Disability
Resource Coordinator positions to Social Services Program Specialist II positions,
retroactive to June 22, 2018, and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,475 $9,120
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,475 $9,120
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - CHILDREN Z206
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.000 41.000
Personal Services $2,994,751 $2,986,840
All Other $17,288,404 $17,288,404
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,283,155 $20,275,244
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,801,991 $1,801,991
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,801,991 $1,801,991
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $57,861 $59,861
All Other $6,755,463 $6,755,463
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $6,813,324 $6,815,324
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
Page 212 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $2,388,417 $2,388,417
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,388,417 $2,388,417
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 60.000 60.000
Personal Services $7,428,667 $7,603,623
All Other $29,043,800 $29,043,800
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,472,467 $36,647,423
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,142,929 $12,142,929
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,142,929 $12,142,929
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $132,341 $133,078
All Other $9,154,081 $9,154,081
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $9,286,422 $9,287,159
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,138,475 $3,138,475
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $3,138,475 $3,138,475
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - COMMUNITY Z198
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 60.000 60.000
Personal Services $7,428,667 $7,603,623
All Other $29,043,800 $29,043,800
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $36,472,467 $36,647,423
Page 213 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,142,929 $12,142,929
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,142,929 $12,142,929
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $132,341 $133,078
All Other $9,154,081 $9,154,081
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $9,286,422 $9,287,159
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,138,475 $3,138,475
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $3,138,475 $3,138,475
Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $58,145,410 $58,145,410
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $58,145,410 $58,145,410
Mental Health Services - Community Medicaid Z201
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,123,211 $1,415,554
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,123,211 $1,415,554
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - COMMUNITY MEDICAID Z201
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $59,268,621 $59,560,964
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $59,268,621 $59,560,964
Multicultural Services Z034
Page 214 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $150,725 $154,576
All Other $18,707 $18,707
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $169,432 $173,283
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,469,748 $1,469,748
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,469,748 $1,469,748
Multicultural Services Z034
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Specialist II
position to a Public Service Coordinator I position funded 60% General Fund and 40%
Other Special Revenue Funds in the Department of Health and Human Services Central
Operations program and one Public Service Manager II position from range 30 to range 31.
This initiative also transfers and reallocates the Public Service Manager II position from
100% General Fund in the Multicultural Services program to 60% General Fund and 40%
Other Special Revenue Funds in the Department of Health and Human Services Central
Operations program and adjusts funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($150,725) ($154,576)
All Other ($7,256) ($7,256)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($157,981) ($161,832)
MULTICULTURAL SERVICES Z034
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $0 $0
All Other $11,451 $11,451
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,451 $11,451
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,469,748 $1,469,748
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,469,748 $1,469,748
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 215 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $162,458,290 $162,458,290
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $162,458,290 $162,458,290
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $367,442,020 $367,442,020
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $367,442,020 $367,442,020
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,414,371 $46,414,371
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $46,414,371 $46,414,371
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,034,851 $5,085,018
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,034,851 $5,085,018
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,034,851) ($5,085,018)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($4,034,851) ($5,085,018)
NURSING FACILITIES 0148
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $166,493,141 $167,543,308
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $166,493,141 $167,543,308
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $363,407,169 $362,357,002
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $363,407,169 $362,357,002
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,414,371 $46,414,371
__________ __________
Page 216 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $46,414,371 $46,414,371
Office for Family Independence Z020
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $2,485,141 $2,540,344
All Other $6,645,180 $6,645,180
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,130,321 $9,185,524
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 40.000 40.000
Personal Services $3,576,290 $3,656,281
All Other $13,174,202 $13,174,202
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,750,492 $16,830,483
OFFICE FOR FAMILY INDEPENDENCE Z020
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $2,485,141 $2,540,344
All Other $6,645,180 $6,645,180
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,130,321 $9,185,524
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 40.000 40.000
Personal Services $3,576,290 $3,656,281
All Other $13,174,202 $13,174,202
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,750,492 $16,830,483
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $17,538,108 $18,012,471
All Other $2,704,836 $2,704,836
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,242,944 $20,717,307
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 472.000 472.000
Page 217 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $28,195,816 $28,957,169
All Other $6,750,022 $6,750,022
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,945,838 $35,707,191
Office for Family Independence - District 0453
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $224,741 $224,741
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $224,741 $224,741
OFFICE FOR FAMILY INDEPENDENCE - DISTRICT 0453
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $17,538,108 $18,012,471
All Other $2,929,577 $2,929,577
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,467,685 $20,942,048
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 472.000 472.000
Personal Services $28,195,816 $28,957,169
All Other $6,750,022 $6,750,022
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $34,945,838 $35,707,191
Office of Advocacy - BDS Z209
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $163,727 $163,727
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,727 $163,727
OFFICE OF ADVOCACY - BDS Z209
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $163,727 $163,727
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,727 $163,727
Office of Aging and Disability Services Adult Protective Services Z040
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 218 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 147.000 147.000
Personal Services $15,487,357 $15,842,245
All Other $2,522,087 $2,522,087
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,009,444 $18,364,332
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,368,358 $1,397,873
All Other $239,069 $239,069
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,607,427 $1,636,942
Office of Aging and Disability Services Adult Protective Services Z040
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization one Social Services Program
Specialist I position to a Management Analyst II position funded in the Office of Aging
and Disability Services Central Office program, General Fund and one Social Services
Program Specialist I position to a Management Analyst II position and one Social Services
Program Specialist II position to a Social Services Program Manager position funded in the
Office of Aging and Disability Services Adult Protective Services program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,664 $16,820
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,664 $16,820
OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES ADULT PROTECTIVE
SERVICES Z040
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 147.000 147.000
Personal Services $15,499,021 $15,859,065
All Other $2,522,087 $2,522,087
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,021,108 $18,381,152
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,368,358 $1,397,873
All Other $239,069 $239,069
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,607,427 $1,636,942
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 42.000 42.000
Personal Services $5,218,198 $5,315,549
Page 219 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $4,690,071 $4,690,071
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,908,269 $10,005,620
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $767,077 $786,921
All Other $14,907,382 $14,907,382
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $15,674,459 $15,694,303
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,983 $20,983
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,983 $20,983
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $415,000 $415,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $415,000 $415,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $670,860 $670,860
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $670,860 $670,860
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,782,751 $2,782,751
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,782,751 $2,782,751
Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office 0140
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization one Social Services Program
Specialist I position to a Management Analyst II position funded in the Office of Aging
and Disability Services Central Office program, General Fund and one Social Services
Program Specialist I position to a Management Analyst II position and one Social Services
Program Specialist II position to a Social Services Program Manager position funded in the
Office of Aging and Disability Services Adult Protective Services program, General Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,736 $8,738
__________ __________
Page 220 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,736 $8,738
OFFICE OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES CENTRAL OFFICE 0140
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 42.000 42.000
Personal Services $5,226,934 $5,324,287
All Other $4,690,071 $4,690,071
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,917,005 $10,014,358
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $767,077 $786,921
All Other $14,907,382 $14,907,382
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $15,674,459 $15,694,303
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,983 $20,983
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $20,983 $20,983
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $415,000 $415,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $415,000 $415,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $670,860 $670,860
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $670,860 $670,860
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,782,751 $2,782,751
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $2,782,751 $2,782,751
Office of Behavioral Health Z199
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 221 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,650,756 $1,694,193
All Other $25,638,930 $25,638,930
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,289,686 $27,333,123
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $181,215 $186,170
All Other $18,147,414 $18,147,414
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $18,328,629 $18,333,584
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,070,802 $1,070,802
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,070,802 $1,070,802
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,002,692 $1,002,692
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,002,692 $1,002,692
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $750,408 $768,285
All Other $25,147,361 $25,147,361
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $25,897,769 $25,915,646
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,640,385 $5,640,385
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $5,640,385 $5,640,385
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,350,000 $3,350,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $3,350,000 $3,350,000
OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH Z199
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 222 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,650,756 $1,694,193
All Other $25,638,930 $25,638,930
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $27,289,686 $27,333,123
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $181,215 $186,170
All Other $18,147,414 $18,147,414
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $18,328,629 $18,333,584
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,070,802 $1,070,802
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,070,802 $1,070,802
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,002,692 $1,002,692
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,002,692 $1,002,692
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $750,408 $768,285
All Other $25,147,361 $25,147,361
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $25,897,769 $25,915,646
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,640,385 $5,640,385
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP TOTAL $5,640,385 $5,640,385
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,350,000 $3,350,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $3,350,000 $3,350,000
Office of Behavioral Health-Medicaid Seed Z202
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 223 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $14,072,318 $14,072,318
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,072,318 $14,072,318
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,363,425 $1,363,425
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,363,425 $1,363,425
Office of Behavioral Health-Medicaid Seed Z202
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $271,839 $342,592
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $271,839 $342,592
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $26,338 $33,193
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $26,338 $33,193
OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH-MEDICAID SEED Z202
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,344,157 $14,414,910
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,344,157 $14,414,910
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,389,763 $1,396,618
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,389,763 $1,396,618
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 96.000 96.000
Personal Services $7,964,096 $8,130,611
All Other $2,074,064 $2,074,064
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,038,160 $10,204,675
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 224 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $1,896,668 $1,896,668
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,896,668 $1,896,668
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,097,076 $3,161,809
All Other $1,028,550 $1,028,550
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,125,626 $4,190,359
Office of Child and Family Services - Central 0307
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Social Services
Manager I position to a Child Protective Services Caseworker Supervisor position in the
Office of Child and Family Services - Central program and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,681 $14,685
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,681 $14,685
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,709 $5,711
All Other $309 $309
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,018 $6,020
OFFICE OF CHILD AND FAMILY SERVICES - CENTRAL 0307
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 96.000 96.000
Personal Services $7,978,777 $8,145,296
All Other $2,074,064 $2,074,064
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,052,841 $10,219,360
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,896,668 $1,896,668
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,896,668 $1,896,668
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,102,785 $3,167,520
All Other $1,028,859 $1,028,859
__________ __________
Page 225 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,131,644 $4,196,379
Office of Child and Family Services - District 0452
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 690.500 690.500
Personal Services $65,963,442 $67,722,048
All Other $5,228,196 $5,228,196
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $71,191,638 $72,950,244
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,498,223 $17,965,695
All Other $2,181,634 $2,181,634
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,679,857 $20,147,329
OFFICE OF CHILD AND FAMILY SERVICES - DISTRICT 0452
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 690.500 690.500
Personal Services $65,963,442 $67,722,048
All Other $5,228,196 $5,228,196
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $71,191,638 $72,950,244
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $17,498,223 $17,965,695
All Other $2,181,634 $2,181,634
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,679,857 $20,147,329
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 68.000 68.000
Personal Services $8,991,705 $9,224,162
All Other $23,249,278 $23,249,278
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $32,240,983 $32,473,440
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $11,935,889 $12,246,359
All Other $86,634,828 $86,634,828
Page 226 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $98,570,717 $98,881,187
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,250,256 $1,250,256
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,250,256 $1,250,256
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,995,471 $5,995,471
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $5,995,471 $5,995,471
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,505,768 $1,505,768
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA TOTAL $1,505,768 $1,505,768
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $178,895 $228,402
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $178,895 $228,402
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $183,045 $233,700
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $183,045 $233,700
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $219,969 $199,255
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $219,969 $199,255
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $80,487 $0
Page 227 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $1,867 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $82,354 $0
Office of MaineCare Services 0129
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 2 Developmental Disability
Resource Coordinator positions to Social Services Program Specialist II positions,
retroactive to June 22, 2018, and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,470 $9,123
All Other $199 $214
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $8,669 $9,337
OFFICE OF MAINECARE SERVICES 0129
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 68.000 68.000
Personal Services $8,991,705 $9,224,162
All Other $23,648,142 $23,676,935
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $32,639,847 $32,901,097
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 90.000 90.000
Personal Services $12,024,846 $12,255,482
All Other $86,819,939 $86,868,742
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $98,844,785 $99,124,224
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,250,256 $1,250,256
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,250,256 $1,250,256
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,995,471 $5,995,471
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $5,995,471 $5,995,471
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,505,768 $1,505,768
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA TOTAL $1,505,768 $1,505,768
Page 228 - 132LR1775(23)

Office of Violence Prevention Z411
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $370,912 $375,220
All Other $1,520,364 $1,520,364
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,891,276 $1,895,584
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $214,669 $217,533
All Other $13,461 $13,461
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $228,130 $230,994
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $109,526 $110,958
All Other $6,903 $6,903
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $116,429 $117,861
OFFICE OF VIOLENCE PREVENTION Z411
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $370,912 $375,220
All Other $1,520,364 $1,520,364
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,891,276 $1,895,584
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $214,669 $217,533
All Other $13,461 $13,461
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $228,130 $230,994
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $109,526 $110,958
All Other $6,903 $6,903
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $116,429 $117,861
Opioid Use Disorder Prevention and Treatment Fund Z289
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 229 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,992,175 $3,992,175
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,992,175 $3,992,175
OPIOID USE DISORDER PREVENTION AND TREATMENT FUND Z289
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,992,175 $3,992,175
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,992,175 $3,992,175
Plumbing - Control Over 0205
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $494,353 $506,115
All Other $332,020 $332,020
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $826,373 $838,135
PLUMBING - CONTROL OVER 0205
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $494,353 $506,115
All Other $332,020 $332,020
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $826,373 $838,135
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $24,716,019 $24,716,019
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $24,716,019 $24,716,019
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to increase MaineCare appropriations and allocations
across programs to reflect increases in costs and enrollment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,102,535 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,102,535 $0
PNMI Room and Board Z009
Page 230 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for
reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter
III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96 and 97, Appendix C.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $80,579 $80,579
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $80,579 $80,579
PNMI ROOM AND BOARD Z009
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $31,899,133 $24,796,598
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $31,899,133 $24,796,598
Prescription Drug Academic Detailing Z055
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $206,253 $206,253
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $206,253 $206,253
PRESCRIPTION DRUG ACADEMIC DETAILING Z055
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $206,253 $206,253
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $206,253 $206,253
Private Well Safe Drinking Water Fund Z255
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,840 $52,840
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $52,840 $52,840
PRIVATE WELL SAFE DRINKING WATER FUND Z255
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,840 $52,840
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $52,840 $52,840
Progressive Treatment Program Fund Z362
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 231 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $160,000 $160,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,000 $160,000
PROGRESSIVE TREATMENT PROGRAM FUND Z362
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,000 $160,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,000 $160,000
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $120,155 $124,006
All Other $9,128,859 $9,128,859
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,249,014 $9,252,865
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $105,568 $106,343
All Other $12,180,274 $12,180,274
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,285,842 $12,286,617
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,971,118 $1,971,118
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,971,118 $1,971,118
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $66,162 $66,162
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $66,162 $66,162
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,579 $104,308
All Other $13,497,213 $13,497,213
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $13,600,792 $13,601,521
PURCHASED SOCIAL SERVICES 0228
Page 232 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $120,155 $124,006
All Other $9,128,859 $9,128,859
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,249,014 $9,252,865
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $105,568 $106,343
All Other $12,180,274 $12,180,274
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,285,842 $12,286,617
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,971,118 $1,971,118
__________ __________
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE TOTAL $1,971,118 $1,971,118
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $66,162 $66,162
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $66,162 $66,162
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $103,579 $104,308
All Other $13,497,213 $13,497,213
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $13,600,792 $13,601,521
Rape Crisis Control 0488
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,720 $32,720
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $32,720 $32,720
RAPE CRISIS CONTROL 0488
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $32,720 $32,720
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $32,720 $32,720
Page 233 - 132LR1775(23)

Recovery Community Centers Fund Z406
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
RECOVERY COMMUNITY CENTERS FUND Z406
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Residential Treatment Facilities Assessment Z197
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,300,000 $3,300,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,300,000 $3,300,000
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT FACILITIES ASSESSMENT Z197
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,300,000 $3,300,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,300,000 $3,300,000
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,319,961 $1,350,063
All Other $9,107,072 $9,107,072
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,427,033 $10,457,135
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 349.000 349.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.240 0.240
Personal Services $24,588,743 $25,197,718
All Other $2,581,842 $2,581,842
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $27,170,585 $27,779,560
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Page 234 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $661,345 $620,375
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $661,345 $620,375
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $64,681 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $64,681 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,666 $0
All Other $52 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,718 $0
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 4 Psychologist III positions
and one Psychologist IV position to Psychologist positions and provides funding for related
All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,929 $16,362
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,929 $16,362
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,002 $28,266
All Other $395 $398
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $28,397 $28,664
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($388,730) ($475,897)
All Other ($5,473) ($6,701)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($394,203) ($482,598)
Riverview Psychiatric Center Z219
Page 235 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Adjusts funding for positions in the Riverview Psychiatric Center as a result of
the decrease in the 2026 Federal Medical Assistance Percentage. The new rate is 61.48%
for fiscal year 2025-26 and 61.29% for fiscal year 2026-27.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($1,173) ($1,314)
All Other ($12) ($13)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($1,185) ($1,327)
RIVERVIEW PSYCHIATRIC CENTER Z219
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,395,571 $1,366,425
All Other $9,768,417 $9,727,447
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,163,988 $11,093,872
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 349.000 349.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.240 0.240
Personal Services $24,230,508 $24,748,773
All Other $2,576,804 $2,575,526
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $26,807,312 $27,324,299
State Supplement to Federal Supplemental Security Income 0131
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,552,699 $7,552,699
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,552,699 $7,552,699
STATE SUPPLEMENT TO FEDERAL SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME
0131
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,552,699 $7,552,699
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,552,699 $7,552,699
State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0139
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $667,969 $683,083
Page 236 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $46,088,567 $46,088,567
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,756,536 $46,771,650
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,348,628 $2,348,628
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,348,628 $2,348,628
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $286,262 $292,733
All Other $1,062,393 $1,062,393
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,348,655 $1,355,126
State-funded Foster Care/Adoption Assistance 0139
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,336 $37,336
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,336 $37,336
STATE-FUNDED FOSTER CARE/ADOPTION ASSISTANCE 0139
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $667,969 $683,083
All Other $46,125,903 $46,125,903
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,793,872 $46,808,986
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,348,628 $2,348,628
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,348,628 $2,348,628
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $286,262 $292,733
All Other $1,062,393 $1,062,393
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,348,655 $1,355,126
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families 0138
Page 237 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,163,821 $22,163,821
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,163,821 $22,163,821
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,300 $4,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,300 $4,300
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $593,385 $613,204
All Other $82,974,440 $82,974,440
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $83,567,825 $83,587,644
MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,450,000 $1,450,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $1,450,000 $1,450,000
TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES 0138
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,163,821 $22,163,821
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,163,821 $22,163,821
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,300 $4,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,300 $4,300
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $593,385 $613,204
All Other $82,974,440 $82,974,440
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $83,567,825 $83,587,644
Page 238 - 132LR1775(23)

MAINE RECOVERY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,450,000 $1,450,000
__________ __________
MAINE RECOVERY FUND TOTAL $1,450,000 $1,450,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Seed Z214
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $128,676 $128,676
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $128,676 $128,676
Traumatic Brain Injury Seed Z214
Initiative: Adjusts funding as a result of the increase in the state share of the blended Federal
Medical Assistance Percentage from fiscal year 2024-25.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,486 $3,133
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,486 $3,133
TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY SEED Z214
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $131,162 $131,809
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $131,162 $131,809
Universal Childhood Immunization Program Z121
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,427,340 $12,427,340
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,427,340 $12,427,340
UNIVERSAL CHILDHOOD IMMUNIZATION PROGRAM Z121
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,427,340 $12,427,340
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $12,427,340 $12,427,340
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,133,620,667 $2,024,296,995
Page 239 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $3,830,044,671 $3,461,578,391
FUND FOR A HEALTHY MAINE $63,811,338 $64,028,962
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $673,431,091 $675,423,411
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $290,669,154 $282,537,389
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND ARRA $1,505,768 $1,505,768
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $9,629,802 $9,629,802
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $16,923,607 $16,929,654
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND - ARP $52,087,561 $52,087,561
MAINE RECOVERY FUND $6,150,000 $6,150,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $7,077,873,659 $6,594,167,933
Sec. A-31. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION, MAINE
Historic Commercial Rehabilitation Fund Z067
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HISTORIC COMMERCIAL REHABILITATION FUND Z067
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Historic Preservation Commission 0036
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $644,928 $676,976
All Other $97,747 $97,747
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $742,675 $774,723
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $622,912 $653,031
All Other $317,206 $317,206
__________ __________
Page 240 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $940,118 $970,237
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 3.731 3.731
Personal Services $460,631 $491,488
All Other $95,531 $95,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $556,162 $587,019
Historic Preservation Commission 0036
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,661 $6,661
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,661 $6,661
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,807 $3,807
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,807 $3,807
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $953 $953
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $953 $953
Historic Preservation Commission 0036
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,799 $4,048
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,799 $4,048
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,755 $2,539
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,755 $2,539
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 241 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $1,754 $2,538
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,754 $2,538
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION 0036
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $644,928 $676,976
All Other $107,207 $108,456
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $752,135 $785,432
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $622,912 $653,031
All Other $322,768 $323,552
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $945,680 $976,583
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 3.731 3.731
Personal Services $460,631 $491,488
All Other $98,238 $99,022
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $558,869 $590,510
Historic Preservation Revolving Fund Z109
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HISTORIC PRESERVATION REVOLVING FUND Z109
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HISTORIC PRESERVATION COMMISSION,
MAINE
Page 242 - 132LR1775(23)

DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $752,135 $785,432
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $945,680 $976,583
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $559,869 $591,510
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,257,684 $2,353,525
Sec. A-32. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HISTORICAL SOCIETY, MAINE
Historical Society 0037
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $44,864 $44,864
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,864 $44,864
HISTORICAL SOCIETY 0037
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $44,864 $44,864
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $44,864 $44,864
Sec. A-33. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOSPICE COUNCIL, MAINE
Maine Hospice Council 0663
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $63,506 $63,506
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $63,506 $63,506
MAINE HOSPICE COUNCIL 0663
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $63,506 $63,506
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $63,506 $63,506
Sec. A-34. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Page 243 - 132LR1775(23)

Emergency Housing Matching Grant Program Fund Z390
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
EMERGENCY HOUSING MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM FUND Z390
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Emergency Housing Relief Fund Program Z340
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
EMERGENCY HOUSING RELIEF FUND PROGRAM Z340
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,845,500 $23,845,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,845,500 $23,845,500
HOUSING AUTHORITY - STATE 0442
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,845,500 $23,845,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $23,845,500 $23,845,500
Housing First - MSHA Z381
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
Page 244 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
HOUSING FIRST - MSHA Z381
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Low-income Home Energy Assistance - MSHA 0708
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $545 $545
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $545 $545
LOW-INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE - MSHA 0708
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $545 $545
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $545 $545
Maine Energy, Housing and Economic Recovery Program Z124
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,316,535 $4,316,535
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,316,535 $4,316,535
MAINE ENERGY, HOUSING AND ECONOMIC RECOVERY PROGRAM Z124
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,316,535 $4,316,535
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,316,535 $4,316,535
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
SHELTER OPERATING SUBSIDY 0661
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 245 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,000 $2,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,500,000 $2,500,000
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,500,000 $2,500,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $30,663,580 $30,663,580
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $33,163,580 $33,163,580
Sec. A-35. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,477,793 $1,571,440
All Other $127,849 $127,849
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,605,642 $1,699,289
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $497,024 $528,541
All Other $200,972 $200,972
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $697,996 $729,513
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,864 $107,864
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $107,864 $107,864
Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,094 $22,094
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,094 $22,094
Page 246 - 132LR1775(23)

Human Rights Commission - Regulation 0150
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $148 $2,184
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $148 $2,184
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION - REGULATION 0150
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,477,793 $1,571,440
All Other $150,091 $152,127
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,627,884 $1,723,567
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $497,024 $528,541
All Other $200,972 $200,972
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $697,996 $729,513
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $107,864 $107,864
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $107,864 $107,864
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,627,884 $1,723,567
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $697,996 $729,513
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $107,864 $107,864
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $2,433,744 $2,560,944
Sec. A-36. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HUMANITIES COUNCIL, MAINE
Humanities Council 0942
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 247 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $163,357 $163,357
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,357 $163,357
HUMANITIES COUNCIL 0942
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $163,357 $163,357
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,357 $163,357
Sec. A-37. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
INDIAN TRIBAL-STATE COMMISSION, MAINE
Maine Indian Tribal-state Commission 0554
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $268,500 $268,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $268,500 $268,500
MAINE INDIAN TRIBAL-STATE COMMISSION 0554
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $268,500 $268,500
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $268,500 $268,500
Sec. A-38. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0530
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $432,846 $456,120
All Other $355,085 $355,085
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $787,931 $811,205
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,816 $3,816
__________ __________
Page 248 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,816 $3,816
Administrative Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0530
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Secretary Associate
position to a Secretary Specialist position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,181 $9,859
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,181 $9,859
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0530
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $442,027 $465,979
All Other $355,085 $355,085
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $797,112 $821,064
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,816 $3,816
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,816 $3,816
ATV Enforcement Fund Z276
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $124,947 $124,947
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $124,947 $124,947
ATV ENFORCEMENT FUND Z276
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $124,947 $124,947
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $124,947 $124,947
ATV Safety and Educational Program 0559
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,170 $23,170
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,170 $23,170
Page 249 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $70,974 $71,038
All Other $49,916 $49,917
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $120,890 $120,955
ATV SAFETY AND EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM 0559
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $23,170 $23,170
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,170 $23,170
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $70,974 $71,038
All Other $49,916 $49,917
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $120,890 $120,955
Boating Access Sites 0631
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $173,616 $173,616
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $173,616 $173,616
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $76,574 $80,163
All Other $122,233 $122,233
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $198,807 $202,396
BOATING ACCESS SITES 0631
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $173,616 $173,616
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $173,616 $173,616
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $76,574 $80,163
All Other $122,233 $122,233
__________ __________
Page 250 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $198,807 $202,396
Camp North Woods Fund Z193
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
CAMP NORTH WOODS FUND Z193
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
Endangered Nongame Operations 0536
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $39,245 $42,189
All Other $4,731 $4,731
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $43,976 $46,920
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $518,926 $549,738
All Other $584,982 $584,982
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,103,908 $1,134,720
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $218,793 $231,416
All Other $126,072 $126,072
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $344,865 $357,488
Endangered Nongame Operations 0536
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 IF&W Resource Biologist
positions to 4 IF&W Senior Resource Biologist positions and reduces All Other to fund the
positions.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,821 $7,087
All Other ($6,821) ($7,087)
Page 251 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,824 $7,085
All Other ($6,824) ($7,085)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $0
ENDANGERED NONGAME OPERATIONS 0536
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $39,245 $42,189
All Other $4,731 $4,731
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $43,976 $46,920
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $525,747 $556,825
All Other $578,161 $577,895
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,103,908 $1,134,720
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $225,617 $238,501
All Other $119,248 $118,987
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $344,865 $357,488
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 127.000 127.000
Personal Services $18,231,182 $19,147,047
All Other $4,305,476 $4,305,476
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,536,658 $23,452,523
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.232 1.232
Personal Services $969,745 $1,023,891
All Other $583,980 $583,981
Page 252 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,553,725 $1,607,872
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $299,958 $314,871
All Other $938,446 $938,438
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,238,404 $1,253,309
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for dispatch services provided by the Department of
Public Safety.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $324,411 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $324,411 $0
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $217,333 $307,591
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $217,333 $307,591
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides funding for dispatch services provided by the Department of Public
Safety.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $351,840 $448,580
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $351,840 $448,580
Enforcement Operations - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0537
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Secretary Associate
position to an Office Specialist II position and reduces All Other funding.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,180 $11,145
All Other ($7,180) ($11,145)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
ENFORCEMENT OPERATIONS - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0537
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 253 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 127.000 127.000
Personal Services $18,238,362 $19,158,192
All Other $5,191,880 $5,050,502
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,430,242 $24,208,694
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.232 1.232
Personal Services $969,745 $1,023,891
All Other $583,980 $583,981
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,553,725 $1,607,872
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $299,958 $314,871
All Other $938,446 $938,438
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,238,404 $1,253,309
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.000 57.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.731 1.731
Personal Services $5,123,547 $5,426,166
All Other $1,929,807 $1,929,807
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,053,354 $7,355,973
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $1,660,952 $1,756,301
All Other $746,411 $746,411
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,407,363 $2,502,712
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $105,456 $112,783
All Other $158,364 $158,364
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $263,820 $271,147
Page 254 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $3,200,000 $3,200,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $3,200,000 $3,200,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one IF&W Senior Resource
Biologist position to an IF&W Resource Supervisor position and reallocates the cost from
70% Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 30%
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund to
100% Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, Other Special Revenue Funds and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $41,354 $45,113
All Other $1,118 $1,214
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $42,472 $46,327
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Reduces funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Executive II position to a Public Service Manager II position and transfers and reallocates
the cost from 38% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 32% Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Fisheries and Hatcheries
Operations program, 70% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund, and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $43,395 $47,074
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $43,395 $47,074
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $47,728 $51,851
All Other $1,142 $1,241
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $48,870 $53,092
Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations 0535
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 7 IF&W Resource
Technician positions to 7 IF&W Resource Biologist positions and provides funding for
related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $26,905 $37,480
Page 255 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $26,905 $37,480
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $26,910 $37,479
All Other $644 $897
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $27,554 $38,376
FISHERIES AND HATCHERIES OPERATIONS 0535
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 57.000 57.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.731 1.731
Personal Services $5,193,847 $5,510,720
All Other $1,929,807 $1,929,807
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,123,654 $7,440,527
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $1,735,590 $1,845,631
All Other $748,197 $748,549
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,483,787 $2,594,180
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $146,810 $157,896
All Other $159,482 $159,578
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $306,292 $317,474
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $3,200,000 $3,200,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $3,200,000 $3,200,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Landowner Relations Z140
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.500 1.500
Page 256 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $112,656 $121,635
All Other $51,162 $51,162
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,818 $172,797
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,010 $15,685
All Other $116,298 $116,298
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $131,308 $131,983
LANDOWNER RELATIONS Z140
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.500 1.500
Personal Services $112,656 $121,635
All Other $51,162 $51,162
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $163,818 $172,797
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,010 $15,685
All Other $116,298 $116,298
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $131,308 $131,983
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $1,282,241 $1,364,151
All Other $676,466 $676,466
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,958,707 $2,040,617
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $76,328 $76,328
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $76,328 $76,328
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $248,294 $264,863
All Other $373,195 $373,195
Page 257 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $621,489 $638,058
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,977 $53,977
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,977 $53,977
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,741 $33,741
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $33,741 $33,741
Licensing Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0531
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 9 Office Associate II
positions to 9 Office Specialist I positions and one Office Associate II position to a Senior
Programmer Analyst position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,404 $11,391
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,404 $11,391
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,803 $6,030
All Other $92 $96
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,895 $6,126
LICENSING SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0531
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $1,292,645 $1,375,542
All Other $730,443 $730,443
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,023,088 $2,105,985
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $76,328 $76,328
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $76,328 $76,328
Page 258 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $254,097 $270,893
All Other $407,028 $407,032
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $661,125 $677,925
Maine Outdoor Heritage Fund 0829
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,500 $1,500
All Other $871,906 $871,906
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $873,406 $873,406
MAINE OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUND 0829
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,500 $1,500
All Other $871,906 $871,906
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $873,406 $873,406
Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0529
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $721,383 $750,065
All Other $3,269,799 $3,269,799
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,991,182 $4,019,864
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $461,685 $488,858
All Other $1,137,782 $1,137,782
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,599,467 $1,626,640
Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0529
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $586,021 $588,729
__________ __________
Page 259 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $586,021 $588,729
Office of the Commissioner - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0529
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $103,514 $146,808
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $103,514 $146,808
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,115 $24,188
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $22,115 $24,188
OFFICE OF THE COMMISSIONER - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE
0529
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $721,383 $750,065
All Other $3,959,334 $4,005,336
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,680,717 $4,755,401
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $461,685 $488,858
All Other $1,159,897 $1,161,970
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,621,582 $1,650,828
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $675,006 $718,774
All Other $601,237 $601,237
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,276,243 $1,320,011
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.230 1.230
Page 260 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $678,088 $719,537
All Other $870,085 $870,085
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,548,173 $1,589,622
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $19,435 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,435 $0
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Secretary Associate
position to a Secretary Specialist position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,334 $9,845
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,334 $9,845
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Assistant
Superintendent Maine Wildlife Park position from range 18 to range 21 and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,760 $11,602
All Other $174 $188
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,934 $11,790
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 3 Wildlife Keeper positions
to 3 Wildlife Care and Education Technician positions and provides funding for related All
Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,106 $11,232
All Other $146 $180
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,252 $11,412
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Office Associate II
position to an Office Specialist I position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,452 $4,903
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,452 $4,903
Page 261 - 132LR1775(23)

Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Relations
Specialist position to a Public Relations Representative position and reallocates the cost
from 100% General Fund to 90% General Fund and 10% Other Special Revenue Funds
and provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($2,569) ($2,756)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,569) ($2,756)
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,843 $10,618
All Other $159 $172
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,002 $10,790
Public Information and Education, Division of 0729
Initiative: Reduces funding for the approved reorganization of one seasonal Wildlife
Keeper position to a full-time Parks Maintenance Coordinator position and eliminates one
seasonal Wildlife Keeper position and reduces funding for related All Other costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT (1.230) (1.230)
Personal Services ($12,731) ($9,125)
All Other ($204) ($146)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($12,935) ($9,271)
PUBLIC INFORMATION AND EDUCATION, DIVISION OF 0729
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
Personal Services $702,658 $730,766
All Other $601,237 $601,237
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,303,895 $1,332,003
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 7.000 7.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.000 0.000
Personal Services $695,066 $743,864
All Other $870,360 $870,479
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,565,426 $1,614,343
Page 262 - 132LR1775(23)

Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $2,172,465 $2,294,876
All Other $1,650,844 $1,650,844
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,823,309 $3,945,720
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 59.000 59.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.356 1.356
Personal Services $5,147,075 $5,437,958
All Other $3,901,746 $3,901,746
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,048,821 $9,339,704
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $752,220 $799,359
All Other $1,747,956 $1,747,956
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,176 $2,547,315
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 9 Office Associate II
positions to 9 Office Specialist I positions and one Office Associate II position to a Senior
Programmer Analyst position and provides funding for related All Other costs.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $59,350 $63,856
All Other $1,420 $1,528
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,770 $65,384
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one IF&W Resource
Supervisor position to a Public Service Manager II position and transfers the cost from
General Fund to Federal Expenditures Fund. This initiative also reduces All Other to fund
the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services $3,212 $5,080
All Other ($3,212) ($5,080)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Page 263 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $7,498 $11,864
All Other ($7,498) ($11,864)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one IF&W Resource
Biologist position to an IF&W Resource Supervisor position and reduces All Other to fund
the position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,987 $3,336
All Other ($2,987) ($3,336)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,972 $7,788
All Other ($6,972) ($7,788)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 4 IF&W Resource Biologist
positions to 4 IF&W Senior Resource Biologist positions and reduces All Other to fund the
positions.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($1,982) ($765)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($1,982) ($765)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($4,621) ($1,782)
All Other ($112) ($43)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($4,733) ($1,825)
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one IF&W Senior Resource
Biologist position to an IF&W Resource Supervisor position and reallocates the cost from
70% Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, Other Special Revenue Funds and 30%
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program, General Fund to
Page 264 - 132LR1775(23)

100% Fisheries and Hatcheries Operations program, Other Special Revenue Funds and
provides funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($31,790) ($34,368)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($31,790) ($34,368)
Resource Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0534
Initiative: Reduces funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Executive II position to a Public Service Manager II position and transfers and reallocates
the cost from 38% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund within the Resource
Management Services - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife program and 32% Fisheries and
Hatcheries Operations program, Federal Expenditures Fund to the Fisheries and Hatcheries
Operations program, 70% Federal Expenditures Fund and 30% General Fund, and provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($50,191) ($54,368)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($50,191) ($54,368)
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT (1.000) (1.000)
Personal Services ($63,576) ($68,866)
All Other ($1,535) ($1,663)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL ($65,111) ($70,529)
RESOURCE MANAGEMENT SERVICES - INLAND FISHERIES AND
WILDLIFE 0534
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $2,094,701 $2,213,791
All Other $1,644,645 $1,642,428
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,739,346 $3,856,219
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 59.000 59.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.356 1.356
Personal Services $5,152,698 $5,450,818
All Other $3,887,049 $3,881,916
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,039,747 $9,332,734
Page 265 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $752,220 $799,359
All Other $1,747,956 $1,747,956
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,176 $2,547,315
Search and Rescue 0538
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $483,183 $495,976
All Other $120,220 $120,220
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $603,403 $616,196
SEARCH AND RESCUE 0538
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $483,183 $495,976
All Other $120,220 $120,220
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $603,403 $616,196
Waterfowl Habitat Acquisition and Management 0561
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,525,000 $1,525,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,525,000 $1,525,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $83,085 $83,085
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $83,085 $83,085
WATERFOWL HABITAT ACQUISITION AND MANAGEMENT 0561
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,525,000 $1,525,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,525,000 $1,525,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 266 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $83,085 $83,085
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $83,085 $83,085
Whitewater Rafting - Inland Fisheries and Wildlife 0539
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.308 0.308
Personal Services $94,536 $101,276
All Other $43,798 $43,798
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $138,334 $145,074
WHITEWATER RAFTING - INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE 0539
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.308 0.308
Personal Services $94,536 $101,276
All Other $43,798 $43,798
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $138,334 $145,074
Whitewater Rafting Fund 0533
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,404 $18,404
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $18,404 $18,404
WHITEWATER RAFTING FUND 0533
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $18,404 $18,404
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $18,404 $18,404
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $43,932,421 $45,378,976
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $15,956,111 $16,444,450
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $9,955,867 $10,147,748
Page 267 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $3,200,000 $3,200,000
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $73,044,399 $75,171,174
Sec. A-39. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 602.000 602.000
Personal Services $71,183,996 $72,857,229
All Other $29,223,689 $29,223,689
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,407,685 $102,080,918
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $166,201 $168,749
All Other $1,088,957 $1,088,957
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,255,158 $1,257,706
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
Personal Services $4,631,529 $4,730,645
All Other $3,107,393 $3,107,393
Capital Expenditures $950,000 $950,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,688,922 $8,788,038
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a volume increase in guardian ad litem, interpreter
and mental health examiner services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $350,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $350,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for increased lease costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $90,000 $0
__________ __________
Page 268 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $90,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for security equipment, including ammunition,
shields, rifles, trauma kits, radios, projectile electroshock devices and body armor.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $147,079 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $147,079 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for tenant improvements.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $126,500 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $126,500 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for Google Enterprise licensing costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for Microsoft 365 migration costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for increased insurance rates.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,173 $11,173
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,173 $11,173
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $28,676 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $28,676 $0
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Page 269 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Employee Relations
Specialist position to a Manager of Human Resources and People Operations position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,621 $7,623
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,621 $7,623
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of 2 Business
Analyst/Technology Trainer positions from range 14 to range 16.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $22,961 $24,741
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,961 $24,741
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of all Deputy Marshal
positions from range 11 to range 12.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $510,374 $521,154
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $510,374 $521,154
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of all Corporal positions from
range 12 to range 13.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $41,306 $41,487
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $41,306 $41,487
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of all Sergeant positions from
range 14 to range 15.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $65,989 $65,833
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $65,989 $65,833
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Court Access
Coordinator position from range 19 to range 20.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,910 $12,914
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,910 $12,914
Page 270 - 132LR1775(23)

Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Assistant Clerk position
to an Associate Clerk position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,892 $6,177
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,892 $6,177
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Help Desk Support
Lead position to a Help Desk Lead position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,175 $7,786
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,175 $7,786
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Court Operations
Specialist position to a Court Operations Analyst position. This initiative also provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $4,032 $4,034
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,032 $4,034
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,126 $16,140
All Other $150 $150
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,276 $16,290
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Deputy Chief Marshal
position from range 19 to range 20.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $12,923 $12,927
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,923 $12,927
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Process Auditor
position to a Data and Process Analyst position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $11,075 $11,075
__________ __________
Page 271 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,075 $11,075
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Court Management
Analyst position to a Senior Court Management Analyst position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,079 $10,082
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,079 $10,082
COURTS - SUPREME, SUPERIOR AND DISTRICT 0063
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 602.000 602.000
Personal Services $71,925,009 $73,583,062
All Other $30,148,441 $29,234,862
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $102,073,450 $102,817,924
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $166,201 $168,749
All Other $1,088,957 $1,088,957
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,255,158 $1,257,706
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.000 19.000
Personal Services $4,647,655 $4,746,785
All Other $3,107,543 $3,107,543
Capital Expenditures $950,000 $950,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,705,198 $8,804,328
Judicial - Debt Service Z097
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,043,927 $16,043,927
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,043,927 $16,043,927
JUDICIAL - DEBT SERVICE Z097
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $16,043,927 $16,043,927
Page 272 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,043,927 $16,043,927
Maine Civil Legal Services Fund Z367
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,300,000 $1,300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,300,000 $1,300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,346 $2,500,346
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,346 $2,500,346
MAINE CIVIL LEGAL SERVICES FUND Z367
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,300,000 $1,300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,300,000 $1,300,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,500,346 $2,500,346
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,500,346 $2,500,346
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $119,417,377 $120,161,851
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $1,255,158 $1,257,706
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,205,544 $11,304,674
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $131,878,079 $132,724,231
Sec. A-40. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Bureau of Labor Standards 0158
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $133,679 $140,619
Page 273 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $28,270 $28,270
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $161,949 $168,889
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $150,245 $159,666
All Other $68,588 $68,588
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $218,833 $228,254
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
ADMINISTRATION - BUREAU OF LABOR STANDARDS 0158
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $133,679 $140,619
All Other $28,270 $28,270
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $161,949 $168,889
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $150,245 $159,666
All Other $68,588 $68,588
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $218,833 $228,254
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $400,000 $400,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $400,000 $400,000
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $495,688 $530,428
All Other $227,631 $227,631
__________ __________
Page 274 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $723,319 $758,059
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,570,343 $1,648,884
All Other $3,453,477 $3,453,477
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,023,820 $5,102,361
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $168,424 $186,004
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $168,424 $186,004
Administration - Labor 0030
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $42,743 $42,743
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $42,743 $42,743
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $539,415 $539,415
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $539,415 $539,415
ADMINISTRATION - LABOR 0030
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $495,688 $530,428
All Other $270,374 $270,374
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $766,062 $800,802
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,570,343 $1,648,884
All Other $4,161,316 $4,178,896
__________ __________
Page 275 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,731,659 $5,827,780
Blind and Visually Impaired - Division for the 0126
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,289,657 $1,371,129
All Other $3,259,508 $3,259,508
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,549,165 $4,630,637
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,292,668 $2,441,815
All Other $2,325,337 $2,325,337
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,618,005 $4,767,152
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $217,044 $217,044
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $217,044 $217,044
BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED - DIVISION FOR THE 0126
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $1,289,657 $1,371,129
All Other $3,259,508 $3,259,508
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,549,165 $4,630,637
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,292,668 $2,441,815
All Other $2,325,337 $2,325,337
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,618,005 $4,767,152
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $217,044 $217,044
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $217,044 $217,044
Employment Security Services 0245
Page 276 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 190.000 190.000
Personal Services $19,040,679 $20,305,648
All Other $15,967,011 $15,967,011
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $35,007,690 $36,272,659
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,118,275 $1,191,705
All Other $8,663,531 $8,663,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,781,806 $9,855,236
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,973,622 $1,973,622
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $1,973,622 $1,973,622
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY TRUST FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000,000 $250,000,000
__________ __________
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY TRUST FUND TOTAL $250,000,000 $250,000,000
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,824 $0
All Other ($16,824) $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY SERVICES 0245
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 190.000 190.000
Personal Services $19,057,503 $20,305,648
All Other $15,950,187 $15,967,011
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $35,007,690 $36,272,659
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Page 277 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $1,118,275 $1,191,705
All Other $8,663,531 $8,663,531
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,781,806 $9,855,236
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,973,622 $1,973,622
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $1,973,622 $1,973,622
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY TRUST FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000,000 $250,000,000
__________ __________
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY TRUST FUND TOTAL $250,000,000 $250,000,000
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $606,848 $650,019
All Other $167,677 $167,677
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $774,525 $817,696
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 92.500 92.500
Personal Services $8,454,271 $9,037,888
All Other $15,577,318 $15,577,318
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $24,031,589 $24,615,206
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $648,768 $687,779
All Other $707,300 $707,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,356,068 $1,395,079
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,455,232 $1,455,232
__________ __________
Page 278 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,455,232 $1,455,232
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
COMPETITIVE SKILLS SCHOLARSHIP FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $883,706 $940,225
All Other $6,552,554 $6,552,554
__________ __________
COMPETITIVE SKILLS SCHOLARSHIP FUND $7,436,260 $7,492,779
TOTAL
EMPLOYMENT SERVICES ACTIVITY 0852
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $606,848 $650,019
All Other $167,677 $167,677
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $774,525 $817,696
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 92.500 92.500
Personal Services $8,454,271 $9,037,888
All Other $15,577,318 $15,577,318
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $24,031,589 $24,615,206
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $648,768 $687,779
All Other $707,300 $707,300
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,356,068 $1,395,079
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,455,232 $1,455,232
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,455,232 $1,455,232
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
COMPETITIVE SKILLS SCHOLARSHIP FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Page 279 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $883,706 $940,225
All Other $6,552,554 $6,552,554
__________ __________
COMPETITIVE SKILLS SCHOLARSHIP FUND $7,436,260 $7,492,779
TOTAL
Labor Relations Board 0160
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.500 3.500
Personal Services $465,876 $492,191
All Other $83,461 $83,461
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $549,337 $575,652
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $95,000 $95,000
All Other $45,477 $45,477
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $140,477 $140,477
LABOR RELATIONS BOARD 0160
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.500 3.500
Personal Services $465,876 $492,191
All Other $83,461 $83,461
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $549,337 $575,652
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $95,000 $95,000
All Other $45,477 $45,477
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $140,477 $140,477
Maine Apprenticeship Program Z375
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $381,373 $409,470
All Other $575,000 $575,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $956,373 $984,470
Page 280 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $442,929 $472,487
All Other $1,701,076 $1,701,076
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,144,005 $2,173,563
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $89,643 $15,763
All Other $9,500 $9,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $99,143 $25,263
MAINE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM Z375
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $381,373 $409,470
All Other $575,000 $575,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $956,373 $984,470
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $442,929 $472,487
All Other $1,701,076 $1,701,076
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,144,005 $2,173,563
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $89,643 $15,763
All Other $9,500 $9,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $99,143 $25,263
Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund Z383
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 31.000 31.000
Personal Services $3,245,944 $3,446,802
All Other $10,015,000 $10,015,000
__________ __________
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $13,260,944 $13,461,802
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
Page 281 - 132LR1775(23)

Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund Z383
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
All Other $440,344 $84,059
__________ __________
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $440,344 $84,059
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE INSURANCE FUND Z383
PROGRAM SUMMARY
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE 2025-26 2026-27
INSURANCE FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 31.000 31.000
Personal Services $3,245,944 $3,446,802
All Other $10,455,344 $10,099,059
__________ __________
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $13,701,288 $13,545,861
INSURANCE FUND TOTAL
Regulation and Enforcement 0159
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $1,536,793 $1,633,440
All Other $407,346 $407,346
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,944,139 $2,040,786
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,481,636 $1,574,279
All Other $135,292 $135,292
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,616,928 $1,709,571
REGULATION AND ENFORCEMENT 0159
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 14.000 14.000
Personal Services $1,536,793 $1,633,440
All Other $407,346 $407,346
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,944,139 $2,040,786
Page 282 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,481,636 $1,574,279
All Other $135,292 $135,292
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,616,928 $1,709,571
Rehabilitation Services 0799
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,005,796 $2,137,919
All Other $3,369,946 $3,369,946
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,375,742 $5,507,865
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 98.000 98.000
Personal Services $9,651,072 $10,317,834
All Other $9,611,495 $9,611,495
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,262,567 $19,929,329
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,646 $105,640
All Other $391,109 $391,109
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $489,755 $496,749
REHABILITATION SERVICES 0799
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,005,796 $2,137,919
All Other $3,369,946 $3,369,946
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,375,742 $5,507,865
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 98.000 98.000
Personal Services $9,651,072 $10,317,834
All Other $9,611,495 $9,611,495
__________ __________
Page 283 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $19,262,567 $19,929,329
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,646 $105,640
All Other $391,109 $391,109
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $489,755 $496,749
Safety Education and Training Programs 0161
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,458,664 $1,546,833
All Other $984,782 $984,782
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,443,446 $2,531,615
Safety Education and Training Programs 0161
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,395 $99,560
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,395 $99,560
SAFETY EDUCATION AND TRAINING PROGRAMS 0161
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.000 15.000
Personal Services $1,458,664 $1,546,833
All Other $1,085,177 $1,084,342
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,543,841 $2,631,175
State Workforce Investment Board Z158
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $467,528 $494,184
All Other $53,163 $53,163
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $520,691 $547,347
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000 $3,000
Page 284 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000 $3,000
STATE WORKFORCE INVESTMENT BOARD Z158
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $467,528 $494,184
All Other $53,163 $53,163
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $520,691 $547,347
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000 $3,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000 $3,000
Workforce Research Z164
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $347,107 $368,117
All Other $212,552 $212,552
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $559,659 $580,669
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.500 15.500
Personal Services $1,749,849 $1,857,356
All Other $1,032,270 $1,032,270
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,782,119 $2,889,626
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $54,379 $54,379
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $54,379 $54,379
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $33,118 $33,118
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $33,118 $33,118
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 285 - 132LR1775(23)

WORKFORCE RESEARCH Z164
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $347,107 $368,117
All Other $212,552 $212,552
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $559,659 $580,669
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 15.500 15.500
Personal Services $1,749,849 $1,857,356
All Other $1,032,270 $1,032,270
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,782,119 $2,889,626
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $54,379 $54,379
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $54,379 $54,379
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $33,118 $33,118
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $33,118 $33,118
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $15,636,951 $16,107,466
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $90,202,427 $93,132,707
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $20,817,172 $21,046,182
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $1,488,350 $1,488,350
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $1,973,622 $1,973,622
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE $13,701,288 $13,545,861
INSURANCE FUND
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY TRUST FUND $250,000,000 $250,000,000
COMPETITIVE SKILLS SCHOLARSHIP FUND $7,436,260 $7,492,779
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $401,256,070 $404,786,967
Page 286 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. A-41. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LAW AND LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE LIBRARY
Law and Legislative Reference Library 0636
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.500 12.500
Personal Services $1,622,246 $1,744,293
All Other $356,757 $356,757
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,979,003 $2,101,050
LAW AND LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE LIBRARY 0636
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.500 12.500
Personal Services $1,622,246 $1,744,293
All Other $356,757 $356,757
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,979,003 $2,101,050
Sec. A-42. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LEGISLATURE
Citizen Trade Policy Commission Z173
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,320 $1,320
All Other $12,800 $12,800
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,120 $14,120
CITIZEN TRADE POLICY COMMISSION Z173
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,320 $1,320
All Other $12,800 $12,800
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,120 $14,120
Interstate Cooperation - Commission on 0053
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $209,557 $209,557
Page 287 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $209,557 $209,557
INTERSTATE COOPERATION - COMMISSION ON 0053
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $209,557 $209,557
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $209,557 $209,557
Legislature 0081
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 162.500 162.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 27.716 27.716
Personal Services $32,710,854 $35,758,400
All Other $4,988,734 $5,051,408
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,699,588 $40,809,808
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
LEGISLATURE 0081
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 162.500 162.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 27.716 27.716
Personal Services $32,710,854 $35,758,400
All Other $4,988,734 $5,051,408
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $37,699,588 $40,809,808
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
State House and Capitol Park Commission 0615
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $67,834 $67,834
__________ __________
Page 288 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $67,834 $67,834
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
STATE HOUSE AND CAPITOL PARK COMMISSION 0615
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $67,834 $67,834
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $67,834 $67,834
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Study Commissions - Funding 0444
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,725 $3,725
All Other $18,471 $18,471
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,196 $22,196
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
STUDY COMMISSIONS - FUNDING 0444
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,725 $3,725
All Other $18,471 $18,471
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $22,196 $22,196
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 289 - 132LR1775(23)

Uniform State Laws - Commission on 0242
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
UNIFORM STATE LAWS - COMMISSION ON 0242
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
LEGISLATURE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $38,023,295 $41,133,515
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,000 $11,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $38,034,295 $41,144,515
Sec. A-43. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
Administration - Library 0215
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $195,518 $203,394
All Other $85,938 $85,938
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $281,456 $289,332
ADMINISTRATION - LIBRARY 0215
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $195,518 $203,394
All Other $85,938 $85,938
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $281,456 $289,332
Blind and Visually Impaired News Access Fund Z275
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 290 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,000 $40,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $40,000 $40,000
BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED NEWS ACCESS FUND Z275
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,000 $40,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $40,000 $40,000
Maine Public Library Fund Z144
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,000 $52,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $52,000 $52,000
MAINE PUBLIC LIBRARY FUND Z144
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,000 $52,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $52,000 $52,000
Maine State Library 0217
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 30.000 30.000
Personal Services $3,114,891 $3,275,719
All Other $1,321,511 $1,321,511
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,436,402 $4,597,230
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,163,170 $1,223,292
All Other $569,790 $569,790
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,732,960 $1,793,082
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $719,977 $719,977
__________ __________
Page 291 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $719,977 $719,977
MAINE STATE LIBRARY 0217
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 30.000 30.000
Personal Services $3,114,891 $3,275,719
All Other $1,321,511 $1,321,511
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,436,402 $4,597,230
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,163,170 $1,223,292
All Other $569,790 $569,790
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,732,960 $1,793,082
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $719,977 $719,977
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $719,977 $719,977
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $242,786 $242,786
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $242,786 $242,786
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,957 $12,957
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,957 $12,957
Statewide Library Information System 0185
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,018 $55,577
__________ __________
Page 292 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,018 $55,577
STATEWIDE LIBRARY INFORMATION SYSTEM 0185
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $301,761 $311,320
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $301,761 $311,320
LIBRARY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $5,019,619 $5,197,882
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $1,732,960 $1,793,082
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $811,977 $811,977
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $7,564,556 $7,802,941
Sec. A-44. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE CHILDREN'S CABINET EARLY CHILDHOOD ADVISORY COUNCIL
Maine Children's Cabinet Early Childhood Advisory Council Z282
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE CHILDREN'S CABINET EARLY CHILDHOOD ADVISORY COUNCIL
Z282
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
Page 293 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Sec. A-45. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE LOBSTER MARKETING COLLABORATIVE
Lobster Promotion Fund 0701
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,686,000 $2,686,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,686,000 $2,686,000
LOBSTER PROMOTION FUND 0701
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,686,000 $2,686,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,686,000 $2,686,000
Sec. A-46. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Maine Office of Community Affairs Z396
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $165,739 $167,186
All Other $12,000 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $177,739 $179,186
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS Z396
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 294 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $165,739 $167,186
All Other $12,000 $12,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $177,739 $179,186
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Sec. A-47. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE REDEVELOPMENT LAND BANK AUTHORITY
Maine Redevelopment Land Bank Fund Z346
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,845,000 $1,845,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,845,000 $1,845,000
MAINE REDEVELOPMENT LAND BANK FUND Z346
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,845,000 $1,845,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,845,000 $1,845,000
Sec. A-48. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS BOARD
Maine Retirement Savings Program Z326
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM 2025-26 2026-27
ENTERPRISE FUND
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
Page 295 - 132LR1775(23)

MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM $500 $500
ENTERPRISE FUND TOTAL
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM Z326
PROGRAM SUMMARY
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM 2025-26 2026-27
ENTERPRISE FUND
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
MAINE RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM $500 $500
ENTERPRISE FUND TOTAL
Sec. A-49. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE STATE CEMETERY PRESERVATION COMMISSION
Cemetery Preservation Fund Z408
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,500 $85,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $85,500 $85,500
CEMETERY PRESERVATION FUND Z408
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,500 $85,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $85,500 $85,500
Sec. A-50. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE-ISLAND OF IRELAND TRADE COMMISSION
Maine-Island of Ireland Trade Commission Z407
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
MAINE-ISLAND OF IRELAND TRADE COMMISSION Z407
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 296 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. A-51. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $2,155,829 $2,299,811
All Other $1,013,463 $1,013,463
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,169,292 $3,313,274
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,096,351 $1,171,059
All Other $1,470,712 $1,470,712
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,567,063 $2,641,771
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,566,991 $1,663,409
All Other $1,046,291 $1,046,291
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,613,282 $2,709,700
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,729 $8,729
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,729 $8,729
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,853 $7,853
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,853 $7,853
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $313 $313
Page 297 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $313 $313
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,558 $22,330
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,558 $22,330
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,374 $13,892
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $12,374 $13,892
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $846 $2,055
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $846 $2,055
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $13,371 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $13,371 $0
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Executive II position from range 34 to range 36.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,353 $15,951
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,353 $15,951
BUREAU OF MARINE SCIENCE 0027
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $2,184,553 $2,315,762
All Other $1,042,750 $1,044,522
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,227,303 $3,360,284
Page 298 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,096,351 $1,171,059
All Other $1,490,939 $1,492,457
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,587,290 $2,663,516
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,566,991 $1,663,409
All Other $1,047,450 $1,048,659
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,614,441 $2,712,068
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.500 18.500
Personal Services $2,407,971 $2,551,407
All Other $4,115,476 $4,115,476
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,523,447 $6,666,883
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $652,344 $692,689
All Other $1,096,398 $1,096,398
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,748,742 $1,789,087
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,074,941 $2,190,456
All Other $1,245,223 $1,245,223
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,320,164 $3,435,679
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $870,519 $870,519
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $870,519 $870,519
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 299 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $294,835 $309,075
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $294,835 $309,075
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $131,817 $138,184
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $131,817 $138,184
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $29,545 $50,709
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $29,545 $50,709
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,202 $36,389
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $21,202 $36,389
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,727 $3,727
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,727 $3,727
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $664 $664
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $664 $664
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $84 $84
__________ __________
Page 300 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $84 $84
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $317 $837
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $317 $837
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides funding for the increase in the cost of legal services provided by the
Department of the Attorney General.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,249 $9,387
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,249 $9,387
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,199 $0
All Other $312 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $7,511 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $29,531 $0
All Other $1,277 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $30,808 $0
BUREAU OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT 0258
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.500 18.500
Personal Services $2,407,971 $2,551,407
All Other $4,446,149 $4,489,211
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,854,120 $7,040,618
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $659,543 $692,689
All Other $1,097,374 $1,097,062
Page 301 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,756,917 $1,789,751
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,104,472 $2,190,456
All Other $1,399,603 $1,419,880
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,504,075 $3,610,336
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $870,519 $870,519
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $870,519 $870,519
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,750,322 $2,919,605
All Other $460,637 $460,637
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,210,959 $3,380,242
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $280,174 $295,642
All Other $365,883 $365,883
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $646,057 $661,525
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $939,125 $997,770
All Other $148,231 $148,231
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,087,356 $1,146,001
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
Page 302 - 132LR1775(23)

claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,884 $3,884
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,884 $3,884
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,471 $13,315
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,471 $13,315
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13 $28
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $13 $28
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $54,328 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,328 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $2,417 $0
All Other $104 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,521 $0
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Marine Resource
Specialist II position to a Marine Resource Scientist I position. This initiative also provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,738 $4,140
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,738 $4,140
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,737 $4,138
Page 303 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $161 $179
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,898 $4,317
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Microbiologist
Supervisor position to a Senior Laboratory Scientist position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,919 $9,279
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,919 $9,279
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Marine Resource
Specialist II position to a Marine Resource Scientist I position. This initiative also provides
funding for related All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,275 $7,083
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,275 $7,083
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,378 $1,556
All Other $60 $67
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,438 $1,623
Bureau of Public Health Z154
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Public Service
Executive II position from range 34 to range 36.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $15,353 $15,951
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,353 $15,951
BUREAU OF PUBLIC HEALTH Z154
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,838,935 $2,956,058
All Other $469,992 $477,836
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,308,927 $3,433,894
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 304 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $280,174 $295,642
All Other $365,896 $365,911
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $646,070 $661,553
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $946,657 $1,003,464
All Other $148,556 $148,477
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,095,213 $1,151,941
Lobster Innovation Fund Z391
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
LOBSTER INNOVATION FUND Z391
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Lobster Legal Defense Fund Z365
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,970 $1,970
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,970 $1,970
LOBSTER LEGAL DEFENSE FUND Z365
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,970 $1,970
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,970 $1,970
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.000 41.000
Personal Services $6,399,805 $6,714,113
Page 305 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $1,543,883 $1,543,883
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,943,688 $8,257,996
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $296,831 $314,573
All Other $120,036 $120,036
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $416,867 $434,609
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,417,213 $1,492,067
All Other $1,871,400 $1,871,403
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,288,613 $3,363,470
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for increased fees from the Department of Public
Safety for dispatch services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,037 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,037 $0
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,992 $21,992
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,992 $21,992
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $383 $383
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $383 $383
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 306 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $18,991 $47,031
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $18,991 $47,031
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $349 $858
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $349 $858
Marine Patrol - Bureau of 0029
Initiative: Provides funding for increased fees from the Department of Public Safety for
dispatch services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,109 $12,686
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,109 $12,686
MARINE PATROL - BUREAU OF 0029
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 41.000 41.000
Personal Services $6,399,805 $6,714,113
All Other $1,605,012 $1,625,592
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,004,817 $8,339,705
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $296,831 $314,573
All Other $120,036 $120,036
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $416,867 $434,609
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,417,213 $1,492,067
All Other $1,872,132 $1,872,644
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,289,345 $3,364,711
Sea Run Fisheries and Habitat Z295
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $503,654 $526,830
Page 307 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $67,986 $67,986
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $571,640 $594,816
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $1,559,420 $1,638,333
All Other $1,075,589 $1,075,592
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,635,009 $2,713,925
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $213,643 $224,452
All Other $300,074 $300,074
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $513,717 $524,526
Sea Run Fisheries and Habitat Z295
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,215 $3,215
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,215 $3,215
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $48 $48
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $48 $48
Sea Run Fisheries and Habitat Z295
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide central fleet management services provided by
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,322 $8,014
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $3,322 $8,014
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,509 $14,975
Page 308 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $14,509 $14,975
SEA RUN FISHERIES AND HABITAT Z295
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $503,654 $526,830
All Other $71,201 $71,201
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $574,855 $598,031
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $1,559,420 $1,638,333
All Other $1,078,911 $1,083,606
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,638,331 $2,721,939
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $213,643 $224,452
All Other $314,631 $315,097
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $528,274 $539,549
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $21,970,022 $22,772,532
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $8,045,475 $8,271,368
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,033,818 $11,381,075
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $870,519 $870,519
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $41,919,834 $43,295,494
Sec. A-52. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
Maine Maritime Academy - Debt Service Z304
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 309 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $3,723,498 $3,723,498
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,723,498 $3,723,498
MAINE MARITIME ACADEMY - DEBT SERVICE Z304
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,723,498 $3,723,498
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,723,498 $3,723,498
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $202,920 $202,920
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $202,920 $202,920
MAINE MARITIME ACADEMY SCHOLARSHIP FUND - CASINO Z167
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $202,920 $202,920
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $202,920 $202,920
Maritime Academy - Operations 0035
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,675,667 $12,675,667
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,675,667 $12,675,667
MARITIME ACADEMY - OPERATIONS 0035
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $12,675,667 $12,675,667
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $12,675,667 $12,675,667
Maritime Academy - Schooner Bowdoin Z253
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
MARITIME ACADEMY - SCHOONER BOWDOIN Z253
Page 310 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $16,449,165 $16,449,165
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $202,920 $202,920
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $16,652,085 $16,652,085
Sec. A-53. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MUNICIPAL BOND BANK, MAINE
Maine Municipal Bond Bank - Maine Rural Water Association 0699
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $69,331 $69,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $69,331 $69,331
MAINE MUNICIPAL BOND BANK - MAINE RURAL WATER ASSOCIATION
0699
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $69,331 $69,331
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $69,331 $69,331
Sec. A-54. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MUSEUM, MAINE STATE
Maine State Museum 0180
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $2,348,899 $2,473,275
All Other $298,630 $298,630
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,647,529 $2,771,905
Page 311 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $180,899 $180,899
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $180,899 $180,899
Maine State Museum 0180
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,828 $15,828
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,828 $15,828
Maine State Museum 0180
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,533 $14,522
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,533 $14,522
MAINE STATE MUSEUM 0180
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 21.000 21.000
Personal Services $2,348,899 $2,473,275
All Other $325,991 $328,980
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,674,890 $2,802,255
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $180,899 $180,899
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $180,899 $180,899
Maine State Museum - Operating Fund Z179
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,623 $9,077
All Other $28,000 $28,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $36,623 $37,077
MAINE STATE MUSEUM - OPERATING FUND Z179
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 312 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $8,623 $9,077
All Other $28,000 $28,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $36,623 $37,077
Research and Collection - Museum 0174
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $130,606 $130,606
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $130,606 $130,606
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,448 $6,726
All Other $163,238 $163,238
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $169,686 $169,964
RESEARCH AND COLLECTION - MUSEUM 0174
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $130,606 $130,606
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $130,606 $130,606
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,448 $6,726
All Other $163,238 $163,238
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $169,686 $169,964
MUSEUM, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $2,674,890 $2,802,255
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $130,606 $130,606
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $387,208 $387,940
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $3,192,704 $3,320,801
Sec. A-55. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
NEW ENGLAND INTERSTATE WATER POLLUTION CONTROL
COMMISSION
Page 313 - 132LR1775(23)

Maine Joint Environmental Training Coordinating Committee 0980
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,950 $52,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,950 $52,950
MAINE JOINT ENVIRONMENTAL TRAINING COORDINATING
COMMITTEE 0980
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,950 $52,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,950 $52,950
Sec. A-56. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
OFFICE OF AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE
Office of Affordable Health Care Z320
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $443,277 $469,803
All Other $190,321 $190,321
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $633,598 $660,124
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
OFFICE OF AFFORDABLE HEALTH CARE Z320
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $443,277 $469,803
All Other $190,321 $190,321
__________ __________
Page 314 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $633,598 $660,124
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Sec. A-57. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PERMANENT COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF RACIAL, INDIGENOUS
AND TRIBAL POPULATIONS
Racial, Indigenous and Tribal Populations Z319
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $818,186 $868,497
All Other $538,870 $538,870
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,357,056 $1,407,367
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,500 $50,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,500 $50,500
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $332,253 $332,253
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $332,253 $332,253
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Racial, Indigenous and Tribal Populations Z319
Page 315 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $20,869 $20,869
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $20,869 $20,869
Racial, Indigenous and Tribal Populations Z319
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,810 $11,810
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $11,810 $11,810
Racial, Indigenous and Tribal Populations Z319
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reorganization of one Public Service
Executive I position to a Public Service Executive II position.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $16,545 $18,918
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $16,545 $18,918
RACIAL, INDIGENOUS AND TRIBAL POPULATIONS Z319
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 6.000 6.000
Personal Services $834,731 $887,415
All Other $571,549 $571,549
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,406,280 $1,458,964
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,500 $50,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,500 $50,500
Page 316 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $332,253 $332,253
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $332,253 $332,253
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
PERMANENT COMMISSION ON THE STATUS
OF RACIAL, INDIGENOUS AND TRIBAL
POPULATIONS
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,406,280 $1,458,964
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $50,500 $50,500
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $332,253 $332,253
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $1,789,533 $1,842,217
Sec. A-58. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PINE TREE LEGAL ASSISTANCE
Legal Assistance 0553
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $650,000 $650,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $650,000 $650,000
LEGAL ASSISTANCE 0553
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $650,000 $650,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $650,000 $650,000
Sec. A-59. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
POTATO BOARD, MAINE
Potato Board 0429
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,902 $160,902
Page 317 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,902 $160,902
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,586,129 $1,586,129
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,586,129 $1,586,129
POTATO BOARD 0429
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $160,902 $160,902
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $160,902 $160,902
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,586,129 $1,586,129
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,586,129 $1,586,129
Sec. A-60. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Administrative Services - Professional and Financial Regulation 0094
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,030 $10,030
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,030 $10,030
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,571,665 $1,664,136
All Other $4,691,559 $4,691,559
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,263,224 $6,355,695
Administrative Services - Professional and Financial Regulation 0094
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $327,755 $320,218
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $327,755 $320,218
Page 318 - 132LR1775(23)

Administrative Services - Professional and Financial Regulation 0094
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $126,419 $126,419
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $126,419 $126,419
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES - PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL
REGULATION 0094
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,030 $10,030
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,030 $10,030
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,571,665 $1,664,136
All Other $5,145,733 $5,138,196
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,717,398 $6,802,332
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 - Homeowner Assistance Fund Z301
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $500 $500
AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021 - HOMEOWNER ASSISTANCE
FUND Z301
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP TOTAL $500 $500
Bureau of Consumer Credit Protection 0091
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,636,496 $2,805,103
All Other $617,164 $617,164
Page 319 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,253,660 $3,422,267
BUREAU OF CONSUMER CREDIT PROTECTION 0091
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $2,636,496 $2,805,103
All Other $617,164 $617,164
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,253,660 $3,422,267
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $260,139 $275,553
All Other $111,354 $111,354
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $371,493 $386,907
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,998 $2,998
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,998 $2,998
Engineers - State Board of Licensure for Professional 0369
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,110 $2,110
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,110 $2,110
ENGINEERS - STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR PROFESSIONAL 0369
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $260,139 $275,553
All Other $116,462 $116,462
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $376,601 $392,015
Page 320 - 132LR1775(23)

Financial Institutions - Bureau of 0093
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,314,011 $2,453,788
All Other $645,359 $645,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,959,370 $3,099,147
FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS - BUREAU OF 0093
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $2,314,011 $2,453,788
All Other $645,359 $645,359
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,959,370 $3,099,147
Insurance - Bureau of 0092
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 73.000 73.000
Personal Services $9,411,882 $10,019,439
All Other $3,817,929 $3,817,929
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,229,811 $13,837,368
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
INSURANCE - BUREAU OF 0092
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000 $10,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,000 $10,000
Page 321 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 73.000 73.000
Personal Services $9,411,882 $10,019,439
All Other $3,817,929 $3,817,929
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,229,811 $13,837,368
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.500 12.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.847 0.847
Personal Services $1,528,438 $1,630,403
All Other $955,713 $955,713
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,484,151 $2,586,116
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,394 $19,586
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $19,394 $19,586
Licensure in Medicine - Board of 0376
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,615 $4,615
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,615 $4,615
LICENSURE IN MEDICINE - BOARD OF 0376
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Page 322 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.500 12.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 0.847 0.847
Personal Services $1,528,438 $1,630,403
All Other $979,722 $979,914
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,508,160 $2,610,317
Manufactured Housing Board 0351
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,486 $22,486
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $22,486 $22,486
MANUFACTURED HOUSING BOARD 0351
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $22,486 $22,486
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $22,486 $22,486
Nursing - Board of 0372
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,144 $10,144
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,144 $10,144
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $934,362 $991,258
All Other $609,816 $609,816
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,544,178 $1,601,074
Nursing - Board of 0372
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,568 $13,752
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $13,568 $13,752
NURSING - BOARD OF 0372
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 323 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $10,144 $10,144
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,144 $10,144
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 8.000 8.000
Personal Services $934,362 $991,258
All Other $623,384 $623,568
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,557,746 $1,614,826
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 70.000 70.000
Personal Services $7,842,601 $8,324,304
All Other $3,021,872 $3,021,872
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,864,473 $11,346,176
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Office Specialist I
position to an Office Specialist II position. This reclassification is retroactive to August 15,
2024.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,471 $6,001
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,471 $6,001
OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL AND OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION 0352
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 70.000 70.000
Personal Services $7,853,072 $8,330,305
All Other $3,021,872 $3,021,872
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,874,944 $11,352,177
Page 324 - 132LR1775(23)

FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Office of Securities 0943
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,113 $10,113
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,113 $10,113
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $2,061,327 $2,202,276
All Other $752,567 $752,567
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,813,894 $2,954,843
OFFICE OF SECURITIES 0943
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,113 $10,113
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,113 $10,113
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 17.000 17.000
Personal Services $2,061,327 $2,202,276
All Other $752,567 $752,567
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,813,894 $2,954,843
Optometry - Board of 0385
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $72,890 $76,252
All Other $39,484 $39,484
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $112,374 $115,736
Optometry - Board of 0385
Page 325 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $917 $917
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $917 $917
Optometry - Board of 0385
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,559 $1,559
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,559 $1,559
OPTOMETRY - BOARD OF 0385
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $72,890 $76,252
All Other $41,960 $41,960
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $114,850 $118,212
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $94,596 $101,727
All Other $218,900 $218,900
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $313,496 $320,627
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,121 $2,121
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,121 $2,121
Osteopathic Licensure - Board of 0383
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division based on
Page 326 - 132LR1775(23)

claims experience, coverage increases, attorney's fees on claims and actuarially
recommended reserves.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,393 $2,393
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,393 $2,393
OSTEOPATHIC LICENSURE - BOARD OF 0383
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $94,596 $101,727
All Other $223,414 $223,414
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $318,010 $325,141
Securities Restitution Assistance Fund Z352
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $532,000 $532,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $532,000 $532,000
SECURITIES RESTITUTION ASSISTANCE FUND Z352
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $532,000 $532,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $532,000 $532,000
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL
REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $62,773 $62,773
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $45,256,444 $47,060,645
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $1,000 $1,000
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $500 $500
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $45,320,717 $47,124,918
Sec. A-61. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROGRAM EVALUATION AND GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY,
OFFICE OF
Page 327 - 132LR1775(23)

Office of Program Evaluation and Government Accountability 0976
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,628,871 $1,733,865
All Other $149,088 $149,088
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,777,959 $1,882,953
OFFICE OF PROGRAM EVALUATION AND GOVERNMENT
ACCOUNTABILITY 0976
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,628,871 $1,733,865
All Other $149,088 $149,088
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,777,959 $1,882,953
Sec. A-62. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROPERTY TAX REVIEW, STATE BOARD OF
Property Tax Review - State Board of 0357
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $97,231 $97,231
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $97,231 $97,231
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000 $3,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000 $3,000
Property Tax Review - State Board of 0357
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $9,820 $9,820
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $9,820 $9,820
Property Tax Review - State Board of 0357
Page 328 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,320 $3,320
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,320 $3,320
PROPERTY TAX REVIEW - STATE BOARD OF 0357
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $110,371 $110,371
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $110,371 $110,371
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,000 $3,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $3,000 $3,000
PROPERTY TAX REVIEW, STATE BOARD OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $110,371 $110,371
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $3,000 $3,000
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $113,371 $113,371
Sec. A-63. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION, MAINE
Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation 0033
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,650,000 $1,650,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,650,000 $1,650,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Page 329 - 132LR1775(23)

MAINE PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION 0033
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,650,000 $1,650,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,650,000 $1,650,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $500 $500
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Sec. A-64. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 74.500 74.500
Personal Services $9,355,517 $9,951,445
All Other $40,951,535 $40,951,535
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,307,052 $50,902,980
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,157,000 $1,157,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,157,000 $1,157,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500,000 $1,500,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $585,437 $328,557
Page 330 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $585,437 $328,557
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,447 $60,028
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $53,447 $60,028
MAINE COMMISSION ON PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES Z112
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 74.500 74.500
Personal Services $9,355,517 $9,951,445
All Other $41,590,419 $41,340,120
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,945,936 $51,291,565
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,157,000 $1,157,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,157,000 $1,157,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $1,500,000 $1,500,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $1,500,000 $1,500,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE
COMMISSION ON
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $50,945,936 $51,291,565
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,157,000 $1,157,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $1,500,000 $1,500,000
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $53,602,936 $53,948,565
Page 331 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. A-65. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Public Safety 0088
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $326,681 $341,603
All Other $968,273 $968,273
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,294,954 $1,309,876
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $332,724 $355,710
All Other $2,003,543 $2,003,543
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,336,267 $2,359,253
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $228,435 $237,830
All Other $256,483 $256,483
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $484,918 $494,313
Administration - Public Safety 0088
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,379 $27,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $25,379 $27,950
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,808 $1,808
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,808 $1,808
ADMINISTRATION - PUBLIC SAFETY 0088
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Page 332 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $326,681 $341,603
All Other $993,652 $996,223
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,320,333 $1,337,826
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $332,724 $355,710
All Other $2,005,351 $2,005,351
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $2,338,075 $2,361,061
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $228,435 $237,830
All Other $256,483 $256,483
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $484,918 $494,313
Background Checks - Certified Nursing Assistants 0992
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $104,744 $108,543
All Other $12,544 $12,544
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,288 $121,087
Background Checks - Certified Nursing Assistants 0992
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $493 $493
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $493 $493
BACKGROUND CHECKS - CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANTS 0992
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $104,744 $108,543
All Other $13,037 $13,037
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,781 $121,580
Capitol Police - Bureau of 0101
Page 333 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.500 24.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $2,828,056 $2,947,587
All Other $522,570 $522,570
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,350,626 $3,470,157
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $701,683 $725,206
All Other $59,696 $59,696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $761,379 $784,902
Capitol Police - Bureau of 0101
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $51,984 $51,984
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $51,984 $51,984
CAPITOL POLICE - BUREAU OF 0101
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.500 24.500
POSITIONS - FTE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $2,828,056 $2,947,587
All Other $574,554 $574,554
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,402,610 $3,522,141
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,000 $5,000
Page 334 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 5.000 5.000
Personal Services $701,683 $725,206
All Other $59,696 $59,696
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $761,379 $784,902
Computer Crimes 0048
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $2,458,413 $2,582,156
All Other $673,285 $673,285
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,131,698 $3,255,441
Computer Crimes 0048
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $65,497 $65,497
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $65,497 $65,497
Computer Crimes 0048
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 9 Computer Forensic Analyst
positions from range 27 to range 28.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $23,392 $24,922
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $23,392 $24,922
COMPUTER CRIMES 0048
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 16.000 16.000
Personal Services $2,481,805 $2,607,078
All Other $738,782 $738,782
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,220,587 $3,345,860
Consolidated Emergency Communications Z021
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY 2025-26 2026-27
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 66.000 66.000
Personal Services $9,580,651 $10,171,931
Page 335 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $927,485 $927,485
__________ __________
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $10,508,136 $11,099,416
COMMUNICATIONS FUND TOTAL
Consolidated Emergency Communications Z021
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY 2025-26 2026-27
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
All Other $98,949 $98,949
__________ __________
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $98,949 $98,949
COMMUNICATIONS FUND TOTAL
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS Z021
PROGRAM SUMMARY
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY 2025-26 2026-27
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 66.000 66.000
Personal Services $9,580,651 $10,171,931
All Other $1,026,434 $1,026,434
__________ __________
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $10,607,085 $11,198,365
COMMUNICATIONS FUND TOTAL
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $185,151 $192,763
All Other $851,639 $851,639
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,036,790 $1,044,402
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,339,324 $1,417,097
All Other $191,362 $191,362
__________ __________
Page 336 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,530,686 $1,608,459
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $36,124 $36,124
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $36,124 $36,124
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ACADEMY 0290
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $185,151 $192,763
All Other $851,639 $851,639
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,036,790 $1,044,402
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,000 $25,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $25,000 $25,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 13.000 13.000
Personal Services $1,339,324 $1,417,097
All Other $227,486 $227,486
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,566,810 $1,644,583
Division of Building Codes and Standards Z073
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $184,724 $198,460
All Other $60,109 $60,109
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $244,833 $258,569
DIVISION OF BUILDING CODES AND STANDARDS Z073
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $184,724 $198,460
Page 337 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $60,109 $60,109
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $244,833 $258,569
Drug Enforcement Agency 0388
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $368,155 $393,811
All Other $6,436,572 $6,436,572
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,804,727 $6,830,383
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,569,893 $1,569,893
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,569,893 $1,569,893
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $66,099 $71,375
All Other $263,692 $263,692
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $329,791 $335,067
Drug Enforcement Agency 0388
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $70,564 $70,564
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $70,564 $70,564
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $13,820 $13,820
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $13,820 $13,820
DRUG ENFORCEMENT AGENCY 0388
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $368,155 $393,811
All Other $6,507,136 $6,507,136
__________ __________
Page 338 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,875,291 $6,900,947
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,583,713 $1,583,713
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,583,713 $1,583,713
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $66,099 $71,375
All Other $263,692 $263,692
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $329,791 $335,067
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,431,359 $1,502,000
All Other $635,597 $635,597
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,066,956 $2,137,597
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $128,924 $138,142
All Other $130,529 $130,529
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $259,453 $268,671
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,875 $104,625
All Other $169,377 $169,377
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $268,252 $274,002
Emergency Medical Services 0485
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,835 $8,835
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,835 $8,835
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES 0485
Page 339 - 132LR1775(23)

PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 12.000 12.000
Personal Services $1,431,359 $1,502,000
All Other $644,432 $644,432
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,075,791 $2,146,432
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $128,924 $138,142
All Other $130,529 $130,529
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $259,453 $268,671
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $98,875 $104,625
All Other $169,377 $169,377
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $268,252 $274,002
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,387,649 $1,470,254
All Other $66,216 $66,216
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,453,865 $1,536,470
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $101,675 $101,675
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $101,675 $101,675
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 33.000 33.000
Personal Services $4,772,804 $5,025,614
All Other $1,150,750 $1,150,858
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,923,554 $6,176,472
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Page 340 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,925 $35,680
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $33,925 $35,680
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $155,641 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $155,641 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $461,534 $0
All Other $2,733 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $464,267 $0
Fire Marshal - Office of 0327
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of 12 Public Safety Inspector
II positions from range 20 to range 25, retroactive to June 27, 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $69,308 $74,178
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $69,308 $74,178
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $203,059 $218,802
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $203,059 $218,802
FIRE MARSHAL - OFFICE OF 0327
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 9.000 9.000
Personal Services $1,612,598 $1,544,432
All Other $100,141 $101,896
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,712,739 $1,646,328
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $101,675 $101,675
Page 341 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $101,675 $101,675
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 33.000 33.000
Personal Services $5,437,397 $5,244,416
All Other $1,153,483 $1,150,858
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $6,590,880 $6,395,274
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,213,890 $2,329,843
All Other $20,088 $20,088
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,233,978 $2,349,931
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $181,288 $193,913
All Other $9,751,567 $9,751,576
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,932,855 $9,945,489
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $40,106 $34,979
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $40,106 $34,979
GAMBLING CONTROL BOARD Z002
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 20.000 20.000
Personal Services $2,213,890 $2,329,843
All Other $20,088 $20,088
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,233,978 $2,349,931
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Page 342 - 132LR1775(23)

Personal Services $181,288 $193,913
All Other $9,791,673 $9,786,555
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,972,961 $9,980,468
Highway Safety DPS 0457
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,252,611 $1,326,982
All Other $4,467,990 $4,467,990
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,720,601 $5,794,972
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,425 $11,185
All Other $33,306 $33,306
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $43,731 $44,491
HIGHWAY SAFETY DPS 0457
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 11.000 11.000
Personal Services $1,252,611 $1,326,982
All Other $4,467,990 $4,467,990
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $5,720,601 $5,794,972
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,425 $11,185
All Other $33,306 $33,306
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $43,731 $44,491
Licensing and Enforcement - Public Safety 0712
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $430,174 $451,394
All Other $80,439 $80,439
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $510,613 $531,833
Licensing and Enforcement - Public Safety 0712
Page 343 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,739 $6,113
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,739 $6,113
LICENSING AND ENFORCEMENT - PUBLIC SAFETY 0712
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $430,174 $451,394
All Other $84,178 $86,552
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $514,352 $537,946
Safe Homes Program Fund Z341
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,500 $25,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,500 $25,500
SAFE HOMES PROGRAM FUND Z341
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $25,500 $25,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,500 $25,500
State Police 0291
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 344.500 344.500
Personal Services $41,427,013 $43,282,507
Page 344 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $13,259,553 $13,259,553
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $54,686,566 $56,542,060
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $607,809 $639,170
All Other $1,367,156 $1,367,156
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,974,965 $2,006,326
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $244,035 $258,915
All Other $2,293,715 $2,293,715
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,537,750 $2,552,630
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for increased dispatch costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $731,144 $731,144
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $731,144 $731,144
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $430,196 $430,196
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $430,196 $430,196
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved range change of 9 Computer Forensic Analyst
positions from range 27 to range 28.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,990 $2,136
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,990 $2,136
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $924 $985
All Other $38 $40
__________ __________
Page 345 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $962 $1,025
STATE POLICE 0291
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 344.500 344.500
Personal Services $41,429,003 $43,284,643
All Other $14,420,893 $14,420,893
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $55,849,896 $57,705,536
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 4.000 4.000
Personal Services $607,809 $639,170
All Other $1,367,156 $1,367,156
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,974,965 $2,006,326
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 2.000 2.000
Personal Services $244,959 $259,900
All Other $2,293,753 $2,293,755
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,538,712 $2,553,655
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $603,427 $635,894
All Other $1,326,409 $1,326,471
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,929,836 $1,962,365
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $31,820 $0
All Other $525 $0
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $32,345 $0
TRAFFIC SAFETY - COMMERCIAL VEHICLE ENFORCEMENT 0715
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 346 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $635,247 $635,894
All Other $1,326,934 $1,326,471
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,962,181 $1,962,365
Turnpike Enforcement 0547
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 37.000 37.000
Personal Services $8,015,571 $8,341,505
All Other $1,161,360 $1,161,489
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,176,931 $9,502,994
Turnpike Enforcement 0547
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $53,442 $53,442
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $53,442 $53,442
TURNPIKE ENFORCEMENT 0547
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 37.000 37.000
Personal Services $8,015,571 $8,341,505
All Other $1,214,802 $1,214,931
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $9,230,373 $9,556,436
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $78,360,148 $80,658,929
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $13,971,163 $14,109,283
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $32,058,140 $32,347,260
CONSOLIDATED EMERGENCY $10,607,085 $11,198,365
COMMUNICATIONS FUND
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $134,996,536 $138,313,837
Sec. A-66. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
Page 347 - 132LR1775(23)

Emergency Services Communication Bureau 0994
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,355,867 $1,421,594
All Other $6,390,563 $6,390,563
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,746,430 $7,812,157
Emergency Services Communication Bureau 0994
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $126,276 $134,276
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $126,276 $134,276
EMERGENCY SERVICES COMMUNICATION BUREAU 0994
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 10.000 10.000
Personal Services $1,355,867 $1,421,594
All Other $6,516,839 $6,524,839
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,872,706 $7,946,433
Oversight and Evaluation Fund Z106
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $252,660 $252,660
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $252,660 $252,660
OVERSIGHT AND EVALUATION FUND Z106
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 348 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $252,660 $252,660
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $252,660 $252,660
Public Utilities - Administrative Division 0184
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $58,934 $58,934
All Other $1,066 $1,066
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Personal Services $11,108,765 $11,611,875
All Other $5,492,973 $5,492,973
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,601,738 $17,104,848
Public Utilities - Administrative Division 0184
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $191,580 $197,174
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $191,580 $197,174
PUBLIC UTILITIES - ADMINISTRATIVE DIVISION 0184
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $58,934 $58,934
All Other $1,066 $1,066
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $60,000 $60,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 69.000 69.000
Personal Services $11,108,765 $11,611,875
All Other $5,684,553 $5,690,147
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $16,793,318 $17,302,022
PUC - Interconnection Ombudsman Fund Z393
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
Page 349 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $185,746 $200,764
All Other $15,891 $15,891
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $201,637 $216,655
PUC - INTERCONNECTION OMBUDSMAN FUND Z393
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $185,746 $200,764
All Other $15,891 $15,891
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $201,637 $216,655
PUC - Unused NEB Credits for Low-Income Assistance Z392
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
PUC - UNUSED NEB CREDITS FOR LOW-INCOME ASSISTANCE Z392
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $60,500 $60,500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $25,120,821 $25,718,270
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $25,181,321 $25,778,770
Sec. A-67. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MAINE PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
Retirement System - Retirement Allowance Fund 0085
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $212,118 $212,118
Page 350 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $212,118 $212,118
RETIREMENT SYSTEM - RETIREMENT ALLOWANCE FUND 0085
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $212,118 $212,118
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $212,118 $212,118
Sec. A-68. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SACO RIVER CORRIDOR COMMISSION
Saco River Corridor Commission 0322
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,960 $46,960
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,960 $46,960
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
SACO RIVER CORRIDOR COMMISSION 0322
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $46,960 $46,960
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $46,960 $46,960
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Sec. A-69. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Archives 0050
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 351 - 132LR1775(23)

POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.500 19.500
Personal Services $2,144,355 $2,224,160
All Other $1,041,411 $1,041,411
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,185,766 $3,265,571
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,673 $27,673
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $27,673 $27,673
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,535 $33,535
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $33,535 $33,535
Administration - Archives 0050
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
rate structure.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,545 $1,545
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,545 $1,545
ADMINISTRATION - ARCHIVES 0050
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 19.500 19.500
Personal Services $2,144,355 $2,224,160
All Other $1,042,956 $1,042,956
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,187,311 $3,267,116
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $27,673 $27,673
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $27,673 $27,673
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $33,535 $33,535
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $33,535 $33,535
Administration - Motor Vehicles 0077
Page 352 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $485,423 $485,423
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $485,423 $485,423
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $138,010 $145,012
All Other $209,043 $209,043
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $347,053 $354,055
ADMINISTRATION - MOTOR VEHICLES 0077
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $485,423 $485,423
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $485,423 $485,423
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $138,010 $145,012
All Other $209,043 $209,043
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $347,053 $354,055
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 44.000 44.000
Personal Services $4,640,343 $4,953,722
All Other $2,597,985 $2,597,985
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,238,328 $7,551,707
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $266,514 $284,434
All Other $200,833 $200,833
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $467,347 $485,267
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Page 353 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Provides one-time funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
increases.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,838 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,838 $0
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the increase in election ballot printing, postage
and other election costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $408,431 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $408,431 $0
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
rate structure.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $19,838 $19,838
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $19,838 $19,838
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the retroactive costs of approved reclassifications.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,978 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,978 $0
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides funding for the approved reclassification of one Accounting Associate
I position to an Office Specialist I position, retroactive to August 2023.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $3,660 $3,960
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,660 $3,960
BUREAU OF CORPORATIONS, ELECTIONS AND COMMISSIONS 0692
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 44.000 44.000
Personal Services $4,658,981 $4,957,682
All Other $3,046,092 $2,617,823
Page 354 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,705,073 $7,575,505
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $266,514 $284,434
All Other $200,833 $200,833
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $467,347 $485,267
Federal Elections Grant 0693
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $113,089 $21,002
All Other $4,551,242 $4,551,242
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,664,331 $4,572,244
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
FEDERAL ELECTIONS GRANT 0693
PROGRAM SUMMARY
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $113,089 $21,002
All Other $4,551,242 $4,551,242
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $4,664,331 $4,572,244
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Municipal Excise Tax Reimbursement Fund 0871
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,100,000 $1,100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,100,000 $1,100,000
MUNICIPAL EXCISE TAX REIMBURSEMENT FUND 0871
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 355 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,100,000 $1,100,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,100,000 $1,100,000
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $10,892,384 $10,842,621
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $5,177,427 $5,085,340
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,997,935 $2,022,857
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $18,067,746 $17,950,818
Sec. A-70. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ST. CROIX INTERNATIONAL WATERWAY COMMISSION
St. Croix International Waterway Commission 0576
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,000 $85,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $85,000 $85,000
ST. CROIX INTERNATIONAL WATERWAY COMMISSION 0576
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $85,000 $85,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $85,000 $85,000
Sec. A-71. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
STATE HOUSE PRESERVATION AND MAINTENANCE, RESERVE FUND
FOR
Reserve Fund for State House Preservation and Maintenance 0975
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $800,000 $800,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $800,000 $800,000
RESERVE FUND FOR STATE HOUSE PRESERVATION AND MAINTENANCE
0975
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 356 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $800,000 $800,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $800,000 $800,000
Sec. A-72. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TELECOMMUNICATIONS RELAY SERVICES COUNCIL
Telecommunications Relay Services Council Fund Z266
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
TELECOMMUNICATIONS RELAY SERVICES COUNCIL FUND Z266
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $600,000 $600,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $600,000 $600,000
Sec. A-73. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
Administration - Treasury 0022
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $1,995,830 $2,112,682
All Other $776,277 $776,277
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,772,107 $2,888,959
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $448,417 $448,417
__________ __________
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND TOTAL $448,417 $448,417
ADMINISTRATION - TREASURY 0022
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 18.000 18.000
Personal Services $1,995,830 $2,112,682
Page 357 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $776,277 $776,277
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,772,107 $2,888,959
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $448,417 $448,417
__________ __________
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND TOTAL $448,417 $448,417
Debt Service - Treasury 0021
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $117,205,145 $117,205,145
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,205,145 $117,205,145
Debt Service - Treasury 0021
Initiative: Reduces funding on a one-time basis based on debt service payments on
currently authorized general obligation bonds.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($4,727,658) ($5,313,358)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($4,727,658) ($5,313,358)
DEBT SERVICE - TREASURY 0021
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $112,477,487 $111,891,787
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $112,477,487 $111,891,787
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund 0472
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $56,150,941 $56,150,941
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $56,150,941 $56,150,941
DISPROPORTIONATE TAX BURDEN FUND 0472
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $56,150,941 $56,150,941
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $56,150,941 $56,150,941
Kim Wallace Adaptive Equipment Loan Program Fund Z278
Page 358 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,500 $2,000,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,000,500 $2,000,500
KIM WALLACE ADAPTIVE EQUIPMENT LOAN PROGRAM FUND Z278
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,500 $2,000,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $2,000,500 $2,000,500
Maliseet Sales Tax Fund Z359
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,000 $37,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $37,000 $37,000
MALISEET SALES TAX FUND Z359
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $37,000 $37,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $37,000 $37,000
Passamaquoddy Sales Tax Fund 0915
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,607 $17,607
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,607 $17,607
PASSAMAQUODDY SALES TAX FUND 0915
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $17,607 $17,607
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $17,607 $17,607
Penobscot Sales Tax Fund Z360
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,500 $5,500
__________ __________
Page 359 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,500 $5,500
PENOBSCOT SALES TAX FUND Z360
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,500 $5,500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,500 $5,500
State - Municipal Revenue Sharing 0020
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $208,603,769 $208,603,769
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $208,603,769 $208,603,769
STATE - MUNICIPAL REVENUE SHARING 0020
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $208,603,769 $208,603,769
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $208,603,769 $208,603,769
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $115,249,594 $114,780,746
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $266,815,317 $266,815,317
ABANDONED PROPERTY FUND $448,417 $448,417
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $382,513,328 $382,044,480
Sec. A-74. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Casco Bay Estuary Project - University of Southern Maine 0983
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,000 $35,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $35,000 $35,000
CASCO BAY ESTUARY PROJECT - UNIVERSITY OF SOUTHERN MAINE
0983
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 360 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,000 $35,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $35,000 $35,000
Debt Service - University of Maine System 0902
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,767,950 $15,767,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,767,950 $15,767,950
DEBT SERVICE - UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM 0902
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $15,767,950 $15,767,950
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $15,767,950 $15,767,950
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $239,521,228 $239,521,228
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $239,521,228 $239,521,228
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $115,000 $115,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $115,000 $115,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $3,600,000 $3,600,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $3,600,000 $3,600,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL ACTIVITIES - UMS 0031
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $239,521,228 $239,521,228
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $239,521,228 $239,521,228
Page 361 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $115,000 $115,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $115,000 $115,000
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE 2025-26 2026-27
FISCAL RECOVERY
All Other $3,600,000 $3,600,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP STATE $3,600,000 $3,600,000
FISCAL RECOVERY TOTAL
Labor and Community Education Center Z348
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
LABOR AND COMMUNITY EDUCATION CENTER Z348
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000
Maine Economic Improvement Fund 0986
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,850,000 $21,850,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,850,000 $21,850,000
MAINE ECONOMIC IMPROVEMENT FUND 0986
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $21,850,000 $21,850,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $21,850,000 $21,850,000
New Ventures Maine Z169
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,428,282 $1,428,282
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,428,282 $1,428,282
Page 362 - 132LR1775(23)

NEW VENTURES MAINE Z169
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,428,282 $1,428,282
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,428,282 $1,428,282
Tick Laboratory and Pest Management Fund Z290
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
TICK LABORATORY AND PEST MANAGEMENT FUND Z290
PROGRAM SUMMARY
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
University of Maine Cooperative Extension Z172
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE COOPERATIVE EXTENSION Z172
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $200,000 $200,000
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,712,476 $4,712,476
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,712,476 $4,712,476
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SCHOLARSHIP FUND Z011
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,712,476 $4,712,476
Page 363 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,712,476 $4,712,476
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $279,352,460 $279,352,460
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $5,027,476 $5,027,476
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND - ARP $3,600,000 $3,600,000
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $287,979,936 $287,979,936
Sec. A-75. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD
Administration - Workers' Compensation Board 0183
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 107.000 107.000
Personal Services $12,442,700 $13,110,179
All Other $2,983,829 $2,983,829
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,426,529 $16,094,008
Administration - Workers' Compensation Board 0183
Initiative: Provides funding for statewide technology services provided by the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $346,214 $347,471
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $346,214 $347,471
Administration - Workers' Compensation Board 0183
Initiative: Provides funding for the department's share of the cost for the financial and
human resources service centers within the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $35,317 $48,315
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $35,317 $48,315
ADMINISTRATION - WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD 0183
PROGRAM SUMMARY
Page 364 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 107.000 107.000
Personal Services $12,442,700 $13,110,179
All Other $3,365,360 $3,379,615
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $15,808,060 $16,489,794
Employment Rehabilitation Program 0195
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $125,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $125,000 $125,000
EMPLOYMENT REHABILITATION PROGRAM 0195
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $125,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $125,000 $125,000
Workers' Compensation Board 0751
Initiative: BASELINE BUDGET
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,400 $14,400
All Other $10,820 $10,820
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,220 $25,220
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD 0751
PROGRAM SUMMARY
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $14,400 $14,400
All Other $10,820 $10,820
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $25,220 $25,220
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $15,958,280 $16,640,014
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $15,958,280 $16,640,014
PART B
Page 365 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. B-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,626 $6,029
All Other $236 $254
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,862 $6,283
DACF Administration 0401
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,302 $7,572
All Other $1,303 $1,351
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $8,605 $8,923
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $10,361 $10,761
All Other $229 $238
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $10,590 $10,999
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $10,590 $10,999
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $14,467 $15,206
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $25,057 $26,205
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Remediation and Waste Management 0247
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $7,552 $8,212
All Other $257 $279
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,809 $8,491
Page 366 - 132LR1775(23)

Water Quality 0248
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $5,585 $9,370
All Other $190 $318
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,775 $9,688
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $13,584 $18,179
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $13,584 $18,179
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Employment Security Services 0245
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $6,596 $8,301
All Other ($6,596) ($8,301)
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $0
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,519 $10,324
All Other $411 $446
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,930 $10,770
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $20,554 $24,150
Page 367 - 132LR1775(23)

All Other $888 $1,044
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $21,442 $25,194
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $9,930 $10,770
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $21,442 $25,194
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $31,372 $35,964
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Traffic Safety - Commercial Vehicle Enforcement 0715
Initiative: RECLASSIFICATIONS
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $9,222 $10,874
All Other $342 $311
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $9,564 $11,185
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $9,564 $11,185
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $9,564 $11,185
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $30,084 $32,954
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $49,493 $58,579
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $79,577 $91,533
PART C
Sec. C-1. Mill expectation. The mill expectation pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 20-A, section 15671-A for fiscal year 2025-26 is 6.10.
Sec. C-2. Total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade
12. The total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 for fiscal year
2025-26 is as follows:
2025-26
TOTAL
Total Operating Allocation
Page 368 - 132LR1775(23)

Total operating allocation pursuant to the Maine $1,654,892,993
Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 15683
Total operating allocation for public charter schools $35,480,746
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15683-B
Total adjustments to state subsidy pursuant to Title $706,366,492
20-A, section 15689 included in subsidizable costs
and total other subsidizable costs pursuant to Title
20-A, section 15681-A
Total Operating Allocation and Subsidizable Costs
Total operating allocation pursuant to Title 20-A, $2,396,740,231
section 15683 and total other subsidizable costs
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15681-A
Total Debt Service Allocation
Total debt service allocation pursuant to Title 20-A, $114,070,354
section 15683-A
Total Adjustments and Targeted Education Funds
Adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689
Audit adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A, $0
section 15689, subsection 4
Educating students in long-term drug treatment $249,607
centers adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689, subsection 5
Minimum teacher salary adjustment pursuant $0
to Title 20-A, section 15689, subsection 7-A
Regionalization, consolidation and efficiency $5,878,826
assistance adjustments pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689, subsection 9
MaineCare seed payments adjustments $1,334,776
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689,
subsection 14
Special education budgetary hardship $100,000
adjustment pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15689, subsection 15
Page 369 - 132LR1775(23)

English learner budgetary hardship adjustment $500,000
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689,
subsection 16
Total adjustments to the state share of total $8,063,209
allocation pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689
Targeted education funds pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A
Special education costs for state agency clients $26,000,000
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 1
Essential programs and services components $250,000
contract pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15689-A, subsection 3
Data management and support services for $10,000,000
essential programs and services pursuant to
Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 10
Postsecondary course payments pursuant to $5,500,000
Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 11
National board certification salary supplement $0
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 12
Learning through technology program pursuant $14,000,000
to Title 20-A, section 15689-A, subsection
12-A
Jobs for Maine's Graduates, including costs of $3,881,379
postsecondary education, pursuant to Title
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 13
Maine School of Science and Mathematics $3,615,347
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 14
Maine Educational Center for the Deaf and $9,758,979
Hard of Hearing pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A, subsection 15
Transportation administration pursuant to Title $521,035
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 16
Page 370 - 132LR1775(23)

Special education for juvenile offenders $407,999
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15689-A,
subsection 17
Comprehensive early college programs funding $1,000,000
(bridge year program) pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15689-A, subsection 23
Community schools pursuant to Title 20-A, $250,000
section 15689-A, subsection 25
Musical instruments and professional $50,000
development in rural schools pursuant to Title
20-A, section 15689-A, subsection 28
Total targeted education funds pursuant to Title $75,234,739
20-A, section 15689-A
Enhancing student performance and opportunity
pursuant to Title 20-A, section 15688-A
Career and technical education costs pursuant $76,245,618
to Title 20-A, section 15688-A, subsection 1
College transitions programs through adult $450,000
education programs pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15688-A, subsection 2
National industry standards for career and $2,000,000
technical education pursuant to Title 20-A,
section 15688-A, subsection 6
Career and technical education middle school $500,000
grant program pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15688, subsection 8
Career and technical education early childhood $100,000
education program expansion support pursuant
to Title 20-A, section 15688-A, subsection 10
Total enhancing student performance and $79,295,618
opportunity pursuant to Title 20-A, section
15688-A
Total Cost of Funding Public Education from
Kindergarten to Grade 12
Page 371 - 132LR1775(23)

Total cost of funding public education from $2,673,404,151
kindergarten to grade 12 for fiscal year pursuant to
Title 20-A, chapter 606-B, not including normal
retirement costs
Total normal cost of teacher retirement $64,842,491
Total cost of funding public education from $2,738,246,642
kindergarten to grade 12 for fiscal year pursuant to
Title 20-A, chapter 606-B, including normal
retirement costs
Total cost of state contribution to unfunded $285,557,687
actuarial liabilities of the Maine Public Employees
Retirement System that are attributable to teachers,
retired teacher health insurance and retired teacher
life insurance for fiscal year 2025-26 pursuant to
Title 5, chapters 421 and 423, excluding the normal
cost of teacher retirement
Total cost of funding public education from $3,023,804,329
kindergarten to grade 12, plus state contributions to
the unfunded actuarial liabilities of the Maine
Public Employees Retirement System that are
attributable to teachers, retired teacher health
insurance and retired teacher life insurance for
fiscal year 2025-26 pursuant to Title 5, chapters 421
and 423
Sec. C-3. Local and state contributions to total cost of funding public
education from kindergarten to grade 12. The local contribution and the state
contribution appropriation provided for general purpose aid for local schools for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026 is calculated as follows:
2025-26 2025-26
LOCAL STATE
Local and State Contributions to the
Total Cost of Funding Public Education
from Kindergarten to Grade 12
Local and state contributions to the total $1,232,210,988 $1,506,035,654
cost of funding public education from
kindergarten to grade 12 pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 15683, subject to statewide
distributions required by law
Page 372 - 132LR1775(23)

State contribution to the total cost of $285,557,687
unfunded actuarial liabilities of the
Maine Public Employees Retirement
System that are attributable to teachers,
teacher retirement health insurance and
teacher retirement life insurance for
fiscal year 2025-26 pursuant to Title 5,
chapters 421 and 423 excluding the
normal cost of teacher retirement
State contribution to the total cost of $1,791,593,341
funding public education from
kindergarten to grade 12 plus state
contribution to the total cost of unfunded
actuarial liabilities of the Maine Public
Employees Retirement System that are
attributable to teachers, teacher
retirement health insurance and teacher
retirement life insurance pursuant to
Title 5, chapters 421 and 423
Sec. C-4. Authorization of payments. If the State's continued obligation for any
individual component contained in those sections of this Part that set the total cost of
funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 and the local and state
contributions for that purpose exceeds the level of funding provided for that component,
any unexpended balances occurring in other programs may be applied to avoid proration
of payments for any individual component. Any unexpended balances from this Part may
not lapse but must be carried forward for the same purpose.
Sec. C-5. Limit of State's obligation. Those sections of this Part that set the total
cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade 12 and the local and state
contributions for that purpose may not be construed to require the State to provide payments
that exceed the appropriation of funds for general purpose aid for local schools for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026.
PART D
Sec. D-1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Adult Use Cannabis Public Health and Safety Fund and Municipal Opt-In Fund
Z263
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $1,148,338 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
Page 373 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,148,338 $0 $0
TOTAL
Property Tax Stabilization Z368
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to fully reimburse municipalities for lost revenue
in the property tax year beginning April 1, 2023 due to the property tax stabilization
program for senior citizens established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section
6281.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $1,000,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,000,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
Property Tax Stabilization Mandate Z369
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to reimburse municipalities for state-mandated
costs related to implementation and administration in the property tax year beginning April
1, 2023 of the property tax stabilization program for senior citizens established in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 6281.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $46,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $46,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
ADMINISTRATIVE AND
FINANCIAL SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $2,194,338 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $2,194,338 $0 $0
FUNDS
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Animal Welfare Fund 0946
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for extraordinary costs associated with animal
welfare seizures.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $250,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
Page 374 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $250,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
Division of Forest Protection Z232
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for statewide insurance coverage provided through
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, risk management division for
essential aircraft liability coverage based on claims experience, coverage increases,
attorney's fees on claims and actuarially recommended reserves.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $8,601 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $8,601 $0 $0
Forest Resource Management Z233
Initiative: Provides funding for spruce budworm response to protect the State's forest
resources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $2,000,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,000,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
Harness Racing Commission 0320
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($962,281) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($962,281) $0 $0
TOTAL
Milk Commission 0188
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($5,880,687) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($5,880,687) $0 $0
TOTAL
Off-Road Recreational Vehicles Program Z224
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
Page 375 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($619,689) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($619,689) $0 $0
TOTAL
AGRICULTURE,
CONSERVATION AND
FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $8,601 $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($5,212,657) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($5,204,056) $0 $0
FUNDS
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Chief Medical Examiner - Office of 0412
Initiative: Provides funding to cover an increase in toxicology expenses.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $52,195 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $52,195 $0 $0
ATTORNEY GENERAL,
DEPARTMENT OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $52,195 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $52,195 $0 $0
FUNDS
CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION, STATE
Maine Charter School Commission Z137
Initiative: Provides funding to align allocation with projected revenues.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $110,932 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $110,932 $0 $0
TOTAL
Page 376 - 132LR1775(23)

CHARTER SCHOOL
COMMISSION, STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $110,932 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $110,932 $0 $0
FUNDS
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($219,077) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($219,077) $0 $0
TOTAL
COMMUNITY COLLEGE
SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES
OF THE MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($219,077) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($219,077) $0 $0
FUNDS
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Corrections Fuel Z366
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the increased costs of fuel.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $743,241 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $743,241 $0 $0
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT
OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Page 377 - 132LR1775(23)

GENERAL FUND $743,241 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $743,241 $0 $0
FUNDS
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding for the Disaster Recovery Fund to meet state funding
requirements for emergency declarations.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $5,000,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $5,000,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding to support the activities of the Maine Emergency Management
Agency in light of stagnant and reduced federal funding.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $0 $0
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides funding for workers' compensation premiums for emergency
management volunteers.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $104,780 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $104,780 $0 $0
Veterans Services 0110
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $31,984 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $31,984 $0 $0
TOTAL
Page 378 - 132LR1775(23)

DEFENSE, VETERANS AND
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $354,780 $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $5,031,984 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $5,386,764 $0 $0
FUNDS
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Tourism 0577
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $694,814 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $694,814 $0 $0
TOTAL
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $694,814 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $694,814 $0 $0
FUNDS
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($1,588,909) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($1,588,909) $0 $0
TOTAL
Page 379 - 132LR1775(23)

EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($1,588,909) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($1,588,909) $0 $0
FUNDS
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Dairy Improvement Fund Z143
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($30,319) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($30,319) $0 $0
TOTAL
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF
MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($30,319) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($30,319) $0 $0
FUNDS
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the MaineCare program.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $117,618,761 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $117,618,761 $0 $0
Nursing Facilities 0148
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($3,639,290) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
Page 380 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($3,639,290) $0 $0
TOTAL
HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $117,618,761 $0 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($3,639,290) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $113,979,471 $0 $0
FUNDS
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Adjusts funding to bring allocations in line with projected available resources
for fiscal year 2024-25.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $340,409 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $340,409 $0 $0
TOTAL
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE
STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $340,409 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $340,409 $0 $0
FUNDS
INLAND FISHERIES AND WILDLIFE, DEPARTMENT OF
ATV Safety and Educational Program 0559
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $3,443 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $3,443 $0 $0
TOTAL
Page 381 - 132LR1775(23)

INLAND FISHERIES AND
WILDLIFE, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $3,443 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $3,443 $0 $0
FUNDS
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Corrects negative allocation in the Workforce Development Other Special
Revenue Funds account.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $1,500,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $1,500,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $1,500,000 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $1,500,000 $0 $0
FUNDS
MARINE RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Marine Science 0027
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the department's obligation of the total cost for
federal Public Assistance 406 Mitigation funding from the United States Department of
Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency related to storm damages
from January 2024. Any unexpended balance remaining of these appropriated funds at the
end of fiscal year 2024-25 must be carried forward and be available for the same purpose
in fiscal year 2025-26.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Capital Expenditures $400,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $400,000 $0 $0
Bureau of Policy and Management 0258
Page 382 - 132LR1775(23)

Initiative: Continues one limited-period Marine Resource Scientist III position and 2
limited-period Marine Resource Scientist II positions previously continued by Financial
Order 003622 F5 through June 7, 2025 and transfers All Other to Personal Services to fund
the positions.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $39,503 $0 $0
All Other ($39,503) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $0 $0
MARINE RESOURCES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $400,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $400,000 $0 $0
FUNDS
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
Maine Maritime Academy Scholarship Fund - Casino Z167
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($13,282) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($13,282) $0 $0
TOTAL
MARITIME ACADEMY, MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($13,282) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($13,282) $0 $0
FUNDS
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES, MAINE COMMISSION ON
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services Z112
Initiative: Provides allocation to align with projected resources.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $0 $0
Page 383 - 132LR1775(23)

__________ __________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $125,000 $0 $0
TOTAL
PUBLIC DEFENSE SERVICES,
MAINE COMMISSION ON
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES $125,000 $0 $0
FUND
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $125,000 $0 $0
FUNDS
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Gambling Control Board Z002
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $74,568 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $74,568 $0 $0
TOTAL
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT
OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $74,568 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $74,568 $0 $0
FUNDS
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Archives 0050
Initiative: Provides funding for increases in technology costs in accordance with
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of Information Technology
increases.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,545 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,545 $0 $0
Page 384 - 132LR1775(23)

SECRETARY OF STATE,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $1,545 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $1,545 $0 $0
FUNDS
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE OF
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund 0472
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $2,795,810 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $2,795,810 $0 $0
TOTAL
State - Municipal Revenue Sharing 0020
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other $11,183,237 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,183,237 $0 $0
TOTAL
TREASURER OF STATE, OFFICE
OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $13,979,047 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $13,979,047 $0 $0
FUNDS
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
University of Maine Scholarship Fund Z011
Initiative: Adjusts funding to align with revenue projections from the December 1, 2024
revenue forecast.
Page 385 - 132LR1775(23)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
FUNDS
All Other ($303,594) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($303,594) $0 $0
TOTAL
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE
SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES
OF THE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE ($303,594) $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL ($303,594) $0 $0
FUNDS
SECTION TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $119,179,123 $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES $125,000 $0 $0
FUND
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE $12,922,407 $0 $0
FUNDS
__________ __________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $132,226,530 $0 $0
PART E
Sec. E-1. Tax expenditures. In accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
5, section 1666 and to the extent not otherwise provided in this Act, funding is continued
for each individual tax expenditure, as defined in Title 5, section 1666, reported in the
budget document submitted to the 132nd Legislature by the Governor on January 10, 2025.
PART F
Sec. F-1. Transfer of interest earnings; General Fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall
transfer $42,393,017 from the interest earnings on the Federal Expenditures Fund - ARP
State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
PART G
Sec. G-1. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Sale of State Property Other Special Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $350 from the
Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Sale of State Property Other Special
Page 386 - 132LR1775(23)

Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than
June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-2. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Maine Military Authority Facilities - Limestone Other Special Revenue Funds
account. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer $40,229 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Maine
Military Authority Facilities - Limestone Other Special Revenue Funds account to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-3. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
BPI Insurance & Loss Prevention Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$1,500 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, BPI Insurance &
Loss Prevention Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-4. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Monument for Women Veterans Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$500 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Monument for
Women Veterans Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-5. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
BPI Food Vending Services Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$1,784 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, BPI Food Vending
Services Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-6. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Employee Suggestion System Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$4,355 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Employee
Suggestion System Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-7. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Fund for Efficient Delivery of Local & Regional Services Other Special
Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer $3,600 from the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Fund for Efficient Delivery of Local & Regional Services Other Special Revenue
Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30,
2026.
Sec. G-8. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Human Resources Training Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$3,633 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Human Resources
Page 387 - 132LR1775(23)

Training Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-9. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Accident - Sickness - Health Insurance Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$596 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Accident - Sickness
- Health Insurance Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-10. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Reimbursement-Homestead Property Tax Exemption-OSR Other Special
Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer $3,943,283 from the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Reimbursement-Homestead Property Tax Exemption-OSR Other
Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later
than June 30, 2026.
Sec. G-11. Transfer; Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Property Tax Stabilization Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer
$2,300,081 from the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Property Tax
Stabilization Other Special Revenue Funds account to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART H
Sec. H-1. Attrition savings. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the attrition rate for the 2026-2027 biennium is 5% for judicial branch and executive branch
departments and agencies only. The attrition rate for subsequent biennia is 1.6%.
Sec. H-2. Calculation and transfer; attrition savings. The State Budget Officer
shall calculate the amount of the savings in this Part that applies against each General Fund
account for all executive branch departments and agencies statewide and shall transfer the
amounts by financial order upon the approval of the Governor. These transfers are
considered adjustments to appropriations in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27. The State
Budget Officer shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Appropriations and
Financial Affairs a report of the transferred amounts no later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. H-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Executive Branch Departments and Independent Agencies - Statewide 0017
Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect projected savings from an increase in the attrition rate
from 1.6% to 5% for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($19,333,382) ($20,023,933)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($19,333,382) ($20,023,933)
Page 388 - 132LR1775(23)

ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($19,333,382) ($20,023,933)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($19,333,382) ($20,023,933)
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Reduces funding to reflect projected savings from an increase in the attrition rate
from 1.6% to 5% for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services ($2,100,122) ($2,140,911)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,100,122) ($2,140,911)
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($2,100,122) ($2,140,911)
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($2,100,122) ($2,140,911)
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND ($21,433,504) ($22,164,844)
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS ($21,433,504) ($22,164,844)
PART I
Sec. I-1. Transfer of funds from unencumbered balance forward;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Division of Forest
Protection; fiscal year 2024-25. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the State Controller shall leave $250,000 of unencumbered balance forward remaining in
the Personal Services line category and $300,000 of unencumbered balance forward
remaining in the All Other line category in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Division of Forest Protection program, General Fund account at the close of
fiscal year 2024-25 and shall transfer all remaining money from the unencumbered balance
forward in the Personal Services line category above $250,000 and in the All Other line
category above $300,000 on or before August 1, 2025 to the Capital Expenditures line
category in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Division of Forest
Protection program, General Fund account to carry out the mission of the forest protection
unit of the Bureau of Forestry.
Page 389 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. I-2. Transfer of funds from unencumbered balance forward;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Division of Forest
Protection; fiscal year 2025-26. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the State Controller shall leave $250,000 of unencumbered balance forward remaining in
the Personal Services line category and $300,000 of unencumbered balance forward
remaining in the All Other line category in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Division of Forest Protection program, General Fund account at the close of
fiscal year 2025-26 and shall transfer all remaining money from the unencumbered balance
forward in the Personal Services line category above $250,000 and in the All Other line
category above $300,000 on or before August 1, 2026 to the Capital Expenditures line
category in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Division of Forest
Protection program, General Fund account to carry out the mission of the forest protection
unit of the Bureau of Forestry.
PART J
Sec. J-1. Transfer from General Fund; Board of Trustees of the Maine
Community College System, MCCS Free Community College - Two
Enrollment Years Program; fiscal year 2025-26. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer
$7,300,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the MCCS Free
Community College - Two Enrollment Years program, Other Special Revenue Funds
account within the Board of Trustees of the Maine Community College System to continue
support of the 2 years of free community college for all eligible students who meet the
conditions in Public Law 2023, chapter 412, Part QQQ, section 3, subsection 2.
PART K
Sec. K-1. Transfer; Education Stabilization Fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $45,000,000 from the
Education Stabilization Fund, established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 15698, to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30,
2026.
Sec. K-2. Transfer; Department of Education, Fund for the Efficient
Delivery of Educational Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $2,214,574 from the Department of Education,
Fund for the Efficient Delivery of Educational Services, Other Special Revenue Funds
account to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART L
Sec. L-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Education, General Purpose
Aid for Local Schools. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
$10,000,000 from unencumbered balance forward from the Department of Education,
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools, General Fund carrying account, All Other line
category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30,
2026.
PART M
Page 390 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. M-1. 38 MRSA §341-G, first ¶, as amended by PL 2003, c. 245, §2, is further
amended to read:
There is established the The Board of Environmental Protection Fund is established to
be used by the board as a nonlapsing fund to carry out its duties under this Title.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds identified in
subsection 1 transfer annually to the Board of Environmental Protection Fund in an amount
not to exceed $325,000 $450,000. Money in the Board of Environmental Protection Fund
may only be expended in accordance with allocations approved by the Legislature.
PART N
Sec. N-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human Services,
Office for Family Independence program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall carry forward any unexpended balance remaining
of the $1,217,885 appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter 412, Part A in the Department
of Health and Human Services, Office for Family Independence program, General Fund
account, All Other line category at the end of fiscal year 2024-25 to fiscal year 2025-26 for
required technology development and testing.
PART O
Sec. O-1. Transfer; Department of Health and Human Services,
MaineCare General Fund accounts. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 5, section 1585 or any other provision of law to the contrary, until June 30, 2027,
available balances of appropriations in MaineCare General Fund accounts within the
Department of Health and Human Services may be transferred between accounts by
financial order upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the
Governor.
PART P
Sec. P-1. Lapsed balances; Department of Health and Human Services,
Maine Background Check Program Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, $1,500,000 of the unexpended
balance from the Maine Background Check Program Other Special Revenue Funds account
within the Department of Health and Human Services lapses to the unappropriated surplus
of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART Q
Sec. Q-1. Emergency rule-making authority; health and human services
matters. The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to adopt
emergency rules under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 8054 and 8073 as
necessary to implement those provisions of this Act over which the department has subject
matter jurisdiction for which specific authority has not been provided in any other Part of
this Act, notwithstanding the requirement that the department determine that immediate
adoption is necessary to avoid a threat to public health, safety or general welfare.
PART R
Sec. R-1. 34-B MRSA §3613, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. EEEE,
§1 and affected by §3, is amended to read:
Page 391 - 132LR1775(23)

2. Crisis receiving centers. The department shall establish 2 crisis receiving centers
to support individuals dealing with behavioral health, mental health or substance use issues.
The receiving centers must be established in Aroostook Androscoggin County and
Penobscot County. The department shall ensure that the crisis receiving centers provide
culturally sensitive trauma-informed care. The department shall develop a plan to expand
crisis receiving centers statewide, with at least one crisis receiving center located in each
county of the State.
Sec. R-2. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human Services,
Mental Health Services ‐ Community. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to
the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $1,900,000 one-time funding appropriated in Public
Law 2023, chapter 643, Part EEEE, section 2 in the Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community program, General Fund account, All Other
line category for start-up costs to establish 2 crisis receiving centers, one each in Aroostook
and Penobscot counties, to fiscal year 2025-26, to be used to establish 2 crisis receiving
centers, one each in Androscoggin and Penobscot counties.
PART S
Sec. S-1. 12 MRSA §10202, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2023, c. 17, Pt. N, §1, is
further amended to read:
9. Fiscal Stability Program. The Fiscal Stability Program is established to ensure
that the general public and hunters and anglers share the cost of the fish and wildlife
conservation programs of the department. To achieve this goal, beginning with the 2026-
2027 2028-2029 biennial budget and for each biennial budget thereafter, the biennial
budget submitted by the executive branch must include an additional General Fund
appropriation of 18% in excess of the department's requested biennial budget.
PART T
Sec. T-1. Transfer; Department of Public Safety, Administration - Public
Safety. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026,
the State Controller shall transfer $2,400,000 from the Department of Public Safety,
Administration - Public Safety program, Other Special Revenue Funds account to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund. Funds transferred pursuant to this section
were transferred to the Department of Public Safety, Administration - Public Safety
program, Other Special Revenue Funds account from the General Fund in Public Law
2023, chapter 643, Part VVV to fund certain first responder overtime costs associated with
the Lewiston mass casualty event on October 25, 2023 and the subsequent apprehension
operation.
PART U
Sec. U-1. Transfer from Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Statewide-Family and Medical Leave; employees of state
postsecondary education institutions. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, on or before June 30, 2025, the State Controller shall transfer the unobligated
balance from the Statewide-Family and Medical Leave, General Fund and Highway Fund
accounts within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services in the following
Page 392 - 132LR1775(23)

order: the University of Maine System, Board of Trustees, Educational and General
Activities, General Fund account; Maine Community College System, Board of Trustees,
General Fund account; and Maine Maritime Academy, General Fund account for the
purpose of supporting the State's paid family and medical leave premiums for eligible
University of Maine System, Maine Community College System and Maine Maritime
Academy employees. These funds may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and the approval of the Governor.
PART V
Sec. V-1. Suspension of appropriation limitation. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the requirements in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 1534 establishing a General Fund appropriation limitation and the criteria for
exceeding that limitation are suspended for fiscal years 2024-25 and 2025-26.
PART W
Sec. W-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services, State
Benefit Mandate Defrayal; lapsed balances. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, $3,300,000 of unencumbered balance forward in the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, State Benefit Mandate Defrayal program, General
Fund carrying account, All Other line category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the
General Fund no later than June 30, 2026.
PART X
Sec. X-1. Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement; lapsed balances.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, $14,000,000 of unencumbered
balance forward in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Homestead
Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement, General Fund carrying account, All Other line
category lapses to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30,
2026.
PART Y
Sec. Y-1. Transfer; Fund for a Healthy Maine; fiscal year 2025-26.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State
Controller shall transfer $7,500,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund
to the Fund for a Healthy Maine established under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22,
section 1511.
Sec. Y-2. Transfer; Fund for a Healthy Maine; fiscal year 2026-27.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State
Controller shall transfer $21,121,062 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund
to the Fund for a Healthy Maine established under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22,
section 1511.
PART Z
Sec. Z-1. Continuation of limited-period positions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, all limited-period positions throughout State Government
that are scheduled to expire during June 2025, are already funded through the end of fiscal
Page 393 - 132LR1775(23)

year 2024-25 and are proposed to continue in the 2026-2027 biennium are authorized to
continue until November 1, 2025.
PART AA
Sec. AA-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Children. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward
any unexpended balance remaining of the $1,000,000 appropriated in Public Law 2023,
chapter 643, Part A in the Department of Health and Human Services, Mental Health
Services - Children program, General Fund account, All Other line category for training
clinicians in assertive continuing care to facilitate the delivery of the evidence-based
practice for potential expansion of services for the acute mental health needs of adolescents
with co-occurring disorders to the next fiscal year to be used for the same purpose.
PART BB
Sec. BB-1. Carrying provision; Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, State Benefit Mandate Defrayal. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall
carry forward up to $3,300,000 of the funds appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter 643
in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, State Benefit Mandate
Defrayal program, General Fund account, All Other line category to the next fiscal year.
PART CC
Sec. CC-1. Carrying provision; Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the
State Controller shall carry forward up to $14,000,000 of the funds appropriated in Public
Law 2023, chapter 17 in the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Homestead Property Tax Exemption Reimbursement program, General Fund account, All
Other line category to the next fiscal year.
PART DD
Sec. DD-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $550,000 appropriated in Public Law 2021, chapter
635 and carried forward in Public Law 2023, chapter 643, Part JJJ, section 1 in the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture program,
General Fund account, All Other line category to the next fiscal year to be used for
replacement of the feed, seed and fertilizer database.
PART EE
Sec. EE-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture program. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry
forward any unexpended balance remaining of the $1,500,000 appropriated in Public Law
2023, chapter 412 and carried forward in Public Law 2023, chapter 643, Part JJJ, section 2
Page 394 - 132LR1775(23)

in the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture
program, General Fund account, Capital Expenditures line category to the next fiscal year
to be used for replacement of the licensing and inspection database for the division of
quality assurance and regulations.
PART FF
Sec. FF-1. Carrying provision; Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $750,000 appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter
412 and carried forward in Public Law 2023, chapter 643, Part I in the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture program, General Fund
account, Capital Expenditures line category to the next fiscal year to be used to upgrade
the Cony Road facility in Augusta.
PART GG
Sec. GG-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus; Disaster
Recovery Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June
30, 2025, the State Controller shall transfer $5,000,000 from the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund to the Disaster Recovery Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account
within the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management to fund the
State’s share of estimated disaster recovery costs.
PART HH
Sec. HH-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry
forward any unexpended balance remaining of the $953,300 appropriated in Public Law
2023, chapter 643, Part DDDD in the Department of Health and Human Services, Mental
Health Services - Community program, General Fund account, All Other line category to
establish 24 mental health law enforcement liaisons to support mental health crisis
intervention mobile response services to the next fiscal year to be used for the same
purposes.
PART II
Sec. II-1. 36 MRSA §2891, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. JJ, §1, is repealed.
Sec. II-2. 36 MRSA §2891-A is enacted to read:
§2891-A. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Acute care hospital. "Acute care hospital" means an institution licensed as an acute
care hospital by the department pursuant to Title 22, chapter 405 that is primarily engaged
in providing, by or under the supervision of physicians, inpatient diagnostic and therapeutic
services or rehabilitation services. "Acute care hospital" includes an acute care hospital that
provides organ transplant services.
Page 395 - 132LR1775(23)

2. Critical access hospital. "Critical access hospital" means an institution licensed as
a critical access hospital by the department pursuant to Title 22, chapter 405 that is a rural
hospital consisting of no more than 25 acute or skilled nursing care beds that may be used
for either acute inpatient or skilled nursing care.
3. Department. "Department" means the Department of Health and Human Services.
4. Hospital. "Hospital" means an acute care health care facility with permanent
inpatient beds planned, organized, operated and maintained to offer for a continuing period
of time facilities and services for the diagnosis and treatment of illness, injury and
deformity; with a governing board and an organized medical staff offering continuous 24-
hour professional nursing care; with a plan to provide emergency treatment 24 hours a day
and including other services as defined in rules of the department relating to licensure of
acute care hospitals, critical access hospitals, psychiatric hospitals and rehabilitation
hospitals; and that is licensed under Title 22, chapter 405.
For purposes of this chapter, "hospital" does not include a nursing home or, for state fiscal
years beginning on or after July 1, 2008, municipally funded hospitals, or, beginning
January 1, 2025, critical access hospitals.
5. Municipally funded hospital. "Municipally funded hospital" means Cary Medical
Center in Caribou.
6. Net operating revenue. "Net operating revenue" means gross charges of facilities
less any deducted amounts for charity care and payer discounts.
7. Psychiatric hospital. "Psychiatric hospital" means an institution licensed as a
psychiatric hospital by the department pursuant to Title 22, chapter 405 that is a specialized
hospital that provides inpatient and outpatient services for individuals with mental illness.
8. Rehabilitation hospital. "Rehabilitation hospital" means an institution licensed as
a rehabilitation hospital by the department pursuant to Title 22, chapter 405 that provides
essential therapy and coordinated care that assist patients in recovering from serious
disabling illness or injury.
Sec. II-3. 36 MRSA §2892, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. JJ, §2, is
further amended to read:
For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2004, a tax is imposed annually
against each hospital in the State. The tax is equal to 2.23% of the hospital's net operating
revenue as identified in the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's taxable
year. Beginning January 1, 2025, the tax for acute care hospitals and specialty
rehabilitation hospitals is equal to 3.25% of the hospital's net operating revenue as
identified in the hospital's audited financial statement for the hospital's fiscal year that
ended during calendar year 2022. Beginning January 1, 2025, the tax does not apply to
critical access hospitals. For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, the hospital's
taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2002. For the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, the hospital's taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year
that ended during calendar year 2003. For state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
2006 but before July 1, 2008, the hospital's taxable year is the hospital's fiscal year that
ended during calendar year 2004.
Page 396 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. II-4. 36 MRSA §2893, sub-§2-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. JJ,
§5, is amended to read:
B. For a an acute care hospital or a specialty rehabilitation hospital, an amount equal
to 3.25% of the hospital's net operating revenue as identified in the hospital's audited
financial statement for the hospital's fiscal year that ended during calendar year 2022
multiplied by one-half on or before May 15, 2025; and
PART JJ
Sec. JJ-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human Services,
Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining, up to $1,500,000, of the funds appropriated in Public Law
2023, chapter 643, Part GGGG in the Department of Health and Human Services, Mental
Health Services - Community program, General Fund account, All Other line category to
the next fiscal year to be used for employee recruitment and to provide retention incentives
to staff that provide medication management services pursuant to the department's rule
Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 65, Behavioral Health
Services.
PART KK
Sec. KK-1. Rename Reserve for Indigent Legal Services program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Reserve for Indigent Legal
Services program within the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services is renamed
the Reserve for Public Defense Services program.
PART LL
Sec. LL-1. Transfer of Personal Services balances to All Other; Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, for fiscal year 2024‐25, the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services
is authorized to transfer up to $5,300,000 of available balances of appropriations in the
Personal Services line category in the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services
program, after all financial commitments for salary, benefits and other obligations have
been met, to the All Other line category in order to fund costs associated with assigned
legal counsel. These amounts may be transferred by financial order upon the
recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These transfers
are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
Sec. LL-2. Carrying provision; Maine Commission on Public Defense
Services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year
2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward for the Maine Commission on Public
Defense Services any remaining balance in the Personal Services line category in the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services program, General Fund account to the next fiscal
year. The commission is authorized to transfer these funds to the All Other line category
in order to fund contractual services. These amounts may be transferred by financial order
upon the recommendation of the State Budget Officer and approval of the Governor. These
transfers are not considered adjustments to appropriations.
PART MM
Page 397 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. MM-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry
forward any unexpended balance remaining of the $900,000 appropriated in Public Law
2023, chapter 643, Part EEEE, section 2 in the Department of Health and Human Services,
Mental Health Services - Community program, General Fund account, All Other line
category to establish crisis receiving centers to fiscal year 2025-26 to be used to establish
crisis receiving centers in Androscoggin, Kennebec and Penobscot counties.
PART NN
Sec. NN-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human
Services, Office of Violence Prevention. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry forward any
unexpended balance remaining of the $1,000,000 appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter
643, Part FFFF in the Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Violence
Prevention program, General Fund account, All Other line category for annual grants to
communities to the next fiscal year for grants to communities.
PART OO
Sec. OO-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Animal Welfare
Fund. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2025,
the State Controller shall transfer $250,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General
Fund to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Animal Welfare Fund
program, Other Special Revenue Funds account for extraordinary costs related to the
seizing of animals.
PART PP
Sec. PP-1. Transfer from General Fund unappropriated surplus;
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Forest Resource
Management. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June
30, 2025, the State Controller shall transfer $2,000,000 from the unappropriated surplus of
the General Fund to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Forest
Resource Management program, Other Special Revenue Funds account to provide one-
time funding to address the management of and early intervention for spruce budworms.
PART QQ
Sec. QQ-1. Carrying provision; Department of Health and Human
Services, Mental Health Services - Community. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, at the end of fiscal year 2024-25, the State Controller shall carry
forward up to $1,400,000 of the funds appropriated in Public Law 2023, chapter 643, Part
EEEE, section 2 in the Department of Health and Human Services, Mental Health Services
- Community program, General Fund account, All Other line category for additional start-
up costs to establish crisis receiving centers to the next fiscal year to be used to establish a
crisis receiving center in Aroostook County.
PART RR
Page 398 - 132LR1775(23)

Sec. RR-1. 22 MRSA §5412, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 715, §1, is repealed.
Sec. RR-2. 22 MRSA §5413, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 715, §2, is repealed.
Sec. RR-3. 36 MRSA §191, sub-§2, ¶RRR, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 715, §3
and reallocated by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §125, is amended to read:
RRR. The For information related to tax years beginning in 2023 and 2024 only, the
disclosure of information to the Maine Health Insurance Marketplace to administer the
easy enrollment health insurance program pursuant to Title 22, former section 5412
and the health insurance check-off box pursuant to former section 5294.
Sec. RR-4. 36 MRSA §5294, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 715, §4 and corrected by
RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §128, is repealed.
PART SS
Sec. SS-1. 22 MRSA §4302-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 575, §1, is
amended to read:
1. Training required. No later than the 120th day after appointment or election, and
annually thereafter, an overseer, municipal official designated by the overseers to
administer this chapter and any municipal official appointed to administer this chapter shall
complete training on the requirements of this chapter.
Sec. SS-2. 22 MRSA §4302-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Communication of program requirements. The department annually shall
transmit to an overseer, municipal official designated by the overseers to administer this
chapter and any municipal official appointed to administer this chapter information about
the rules, requirements and compliance expectations of the municipal general assistance
program.
Sec. SS-3. Cost-of-living adjustment for essential support workers. The
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit the required methodology notice
necessary to seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human
Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement a cost-of-living
adjustment of 1.95% for reimbursement rates pursuant to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare
Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Sections 2, 12, 13, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 65, 92, 96
and 97, Appendix C as originally scheduled for January 1, 2025. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall submit the required methodology notice necessary to seek
approval under this section to implement a cost-of-living adjustment as soon as practicable
but no later than June 30, 2025, and, upon receipt of the approval, the department shall
provide the cost-of-living adjustment of 1.95% for reimbursement rates for essential
support workers pursuant to the MaineCare Benefits Manual sections referenced in this
section retroactive to the effective date approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services. Notwithstanding any reduction in the availability of funding due to projected or
actual MaineCare budget shortfalls, the department may not reduce or eliminate the cost-
of-living adjustment of 1.95% implemented pursuant to this section.
PART TT
Sec. TT-1. State Controller; post-closing. The State Controller is authorized to
keep open the official system of general accounts of State Government for fiscal year 2024-
Page 399 - 132LR1775(23)

25 in order to make post-closing entries and adjustments to carry out the provisions of this
Act.
Sec. TT-2. Retroactivity. This Part applies retroactively to June 30, 2025.
Page 400 - 132LR1775(23)